Foreign     Economic Review:  EASTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 09, 
09 March 1994 
   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a subtitled series 
published by FBIS Europe/Latin America Group.  The Survey series 
features brief summaries of foreign media reports on topical issues 
compiled from the most recent sources available to FBIS.  Any and 
all comment or analysis contained herein is attributable to the 
cited media source. 
   Europe Economic Review is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY 
published by the East and West Europe Divisions of Europe/Latin 
America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas bureaus.  Europe 
Economic Review is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Reports for West and East Europe 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear as full-text translations in other FBIS publications. 
   The contents of Europe Economic Review consist of abstracts of 
foreign media coverage of European economic developments under two 
main geographic headings: 
   -- Western Europe:  Drawing on West European, Canadian, and 
Turkish media, this section reports on national and regional 
economic issues, focusing on economic competitiveness, key 
industries, regional economic integration, internal economic 
policies and performance, and foreign trade and investment. 
  -- Eastern Europe:  Citing East European and, where appropriate, 
other foreign media sources, this section highlights East European 
efforts to rebuild national economies and achieve integration into 
the European Community and the global economy, focusing on policy 
debates and practical action geared toward the implementation of 
internal economic reforms and industrial restructuring and on 
developments in foreign trade, cooperation, and investment from 
national and regional perspectives. 
   Under these two main headings, summaries of foreign media reports 
on all categories of economic issues generally are grouped under 
subheadings by subject, country, or region. 
   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government. 
   ALBANIA 
   NEW TELEPHONE EXCHANGE IN LAC:  A new telephone exchange with 5OO 
numbers was inaugurated in Lac on 1 February.  This new exchange 
tripled the capacity of the existing one.  Future plans for 1994 
anticipate over 1,000 telephone numbers to be added to the existing 
ones in town.  The inauguration of this exchange was made possible 
due to cooperation with the Norwegian Telecom.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 1115 GMT 3 Feb 94 AU) 
   BUSINESSMEN'S CONFEDERATION:  A group of representatives from the 
existing businessmen associations held a meeting on 3 February to 
create the Confederation of Albanian Businessmen.  This association 
will be independent from the state, political parties, and religious 
communities.  Its program requires that the confederation appears in 
the country's economic and social life as an organization that will 
represent and support the interests of industrialists, constructors, 
merchants, traders and all businessmen who will be organized in 
their federations.  It will contribute to strengthen the democratic 
state and democracy in general as a worthy partner in the state- 
trade-union-employer triangle.  This confederation will be an active 
organization to protect the financial position of the Albanian 
businessmen in face of foreign capital competition.  The 
confederation will have relations with its analogous organizations 
abroad.  (Tirana ATA in English 1138 GMT 4 Feb 94; au0502183794 AU) 
   TRANSPORTATION MINISTER'S TALKS WITH GERMAN COUNTERPART: 
Transportation Minister Fatos Bitincka paid a one-day visit to Bonn 
at the invitation of his German counterpart, Wissmann.  During the 
talks, both sides agreed in principle to sign an agreement on roads, 
goods, and passengers and another one on maritime as soon as 
possible.  Wissmann said that Germany will continue to contribute to 
the development of Albanian infrastructure by granting its support 
through international organizations.  Bitincka also met with 
Schmidtbauer, minister at the cabinet of Chancellor Kohl.  They 
focused on developments in Albania and the situation in the region. 
Schmidtbauer assured Bitincka of a continuous support by the German 
Government in bilateral and multilateral aspects and presented some 
concrete possibilities of short-term, mid-term, and long-term 
cooperation.  Bitincka and his delegation also held a working 
meeting in German Ministry of Foreign Economic Cooperation.  (Tirana 
ATA in English 1108 GMT 5 Feb 94 AU) 
   EUROPEAN UNION ENVOY OUTLINES 1994 ASSISTANCE PLAN:  Elio 
Germano, EU Commission ambassador in Tirana, said today in a press 
conference that the European Union will continue to support the 
economic reform in Albania during 1994.  The 75 million ECU 
assistance, i.e. 10 million ECU more than in 1993, will be used in 
three directions:  35 million ECU for salaries, 20 millions for 
PHARE program, and 20 millions in the context of a regional program. 
In conformity with an agreement signed in principle by the Albanian 
Government, the regional program will be applied to agriculture, 
medicine and education fields as well as to develop the private 
sector and infrastructure.  The European Union, which started to 
operate in Albania in 1991, has so far assisted with 326 millions 
ECU ($38O millions).  The EU assistance has been used for the 
development of different sectors and for the growth of food 
products.  The assistance includes special programs for Albania, 
such as the Tempus Program, humanitarian aid given by governmental 
and non-governmental organizations, as well as concrete 
contributions by Italy, Greece and Germany.  (Tirana ATA in English 
0910 GMT 9 Feb 94 AU) 
   ITALY, EU TO FINANCE ENVIRONMENTAL PROJECT IN SHKODER:  A joint 
Italian-Albanian environmental protection project based in Shkoder 
began operation in December 1993.  The goal of the project is to 
protect the environment of the city, famous for its cultural and 
historical interest and its excellent museum.  The project will also 
have an educational component.  The "Lvia Project" has employed 690 
people so far engaged in the reforestation of the hills round the 
city, the improvement of roads, restoration of the Rozafa Castle, 
including work on hospitals, schools, libraries, and the city's 
museum.  Gjon Markagjoni, Caritas director for northern Albania, 
said that "this is a good beginning," adding that in the future, the 
project will also cover the communes of Lac and Vau i Dejes.  The 
additional activity will increase the number of workers by several 
hundreds.  The Italian Government has allocated 3 billion liras to 
this joint venture.  This sum will finance the "Lvia Project" only 
for several months.  However, Markagjoni confirms that the European 
Union will contribute to the project in the near future.  The EU 
financing will permit the employment of additional workers and 
expand project activities.  Another Caritas representative said that 
future plans on the project will also cover agriculture, 
particularly vineyards.  (Tirana ATA in English 1126 GMT 27 Jan 94 
AU) 
   ASSEMBLY ADOPTS AGREEMENTS WITH POLAND, SLOVENIA:  At its morning 
session, the People's Assembly approved a bill on the ratification 
of the agreement over taxes on incomes and capital between the 
Republics of Albania and Poland and a draft agreement on the mutual 
protection, promotion, and stimulation of investments between the 
Republics of Albania and Slovenia.  (Tirana ATA in English 1113 GMT 
27 Jan 94 AU) 
   PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION FARES TO RISE: Feim Godo, chief of the 
Road Transport Department at the Ministry of Transports and 
Communications, pointed out in an interview with Albanian Television 
on 27 January that the fuel price rise will also bring about an 
increase in public transportation fares.  Concerning the price of 
public urban, interurban, and railway transportation tickets, the 
ministry has specified a possible increase in tariffs, viewing the 
fuel price rise and the recent wage increase as a possible rise in 
inflation.  The Transports Ministry has envisaged a 40-percent 
increase in public transportation fares.  Godo states that the price 
of monthly public transportation cards will also be increased.  The 
ticket for an urban bus service will be five leks instead of three, 
thus denoting a 40-percent increase.  While the price of a monthly 
card will be 24-30 percent higher.  The train ticket fares will be 
about 30-40 percent lower than the price offered by private buses or 
cars.  Consequently, the state will cover losses in public urban and 
railway transportation to the amount of 350 million leks per year. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1113 GMT 28 Jan 94 AU) 
   DISTRIBUTION OF 2,000 CHINESE MINITRACTORS:  The Ministry of 
Agriculture and Food reports that on 24 January, 2,000 Chinese 
mini tractors, which reached Durres port on 15-17 January, were 
distributed to 11 private service centers in various districts of 
the country.  Ismail Bega, agricultural mechanisms director, stated 
that the mini tractors were sold to private farmers, mainly in 
northern areas, through four-year loans granted by the Agrarian 
Trade Bank at a 5-percent annual interest rate.  The Albanian 
Government bought these mini tractors in China at the cost of $4.4 
million to encourage local agricultural production.  Despite the 
poverty prevailing in the Albanian countryside, peasants bought the 
mini tractors in a short period of time, thus showing that the 
Albanian agricultural market badly needs agricultural facilities. 
   Land privatization, which was 92 percent completed by the end of 
1993, brought about the use of that part of the land that for 
various reasons remained untilled during the last two years.  A 
total of 9,000 agricultural appliances are presently functioning in 
the Albanian agriculture that counts 400,000 peasant families, each 
possessing a little more than one hectare of land.  Thanks to loans 
granted by the Albanian State Bank and various banks, and through 
private traders as well, during the last two years some 1,600 
tractors and 2,250 minitractors and cultivators have been brought to 
Albania from Germany, Italy, Britain, Greece, and other countries. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1125 GMT 29 Jan 94 AU) 
   SAUDI FIRM TO INVEST $100 MILLION:  RILINDJA DEMOKRATIKE reports 
today that the Saudi Arabian Holding Company will make an investment 
of $100 million in the fields of industry and agriculture in 
Albania.  (Tirana ATA in English 1306 GMT 29 Jan 94 AU) 
   CONSTRUCTION OF TIRANA-DURRES HIGHWAY TO BEGIN:  The Ministry of 
Transport has signed a contract for the construction of the first 5 
km of the Tirana-Durres highway.  The whole project is financed by 
the Albanian state.  The Albanian-Italian Euroteorema Joint Venture 
was announced winner of the tender.  The construction is expected to 
start in 45 days and be completed in a year or so.  The ministry 
sources confirm that this will open the way to other Albanian and 
foreign firms' making investments in the further construction of 
this highway.  Work to construct the first 5 km will start from 
Tirana.  The ministry has drafted other programs covering the 
restructuring of approximately 80 km of roads throughout the 
country.  Fatos Pojani, director of the Roads Department at the 
ministry, states that the World Bank has accorded a favorable loan 
to help in the construction of roads.  (Tirana ATA in English 1107 
GMT 30 Feb 94 AU) 
   TIRANA MUNICIPALITY AID TO FAMILIES:  During the second half of 
1993, the economic and social assistance sector in the Tirana 
municipality provided monthly economic assistance to 10,103 
families, to the sum of 126 million leks.  Economic aid for one 
family member has been given to 1,479 families, for two family 
members to 1,216 families, three members to 1,879 families, four 
members to 2,086 families and so on.  As for 1994, the necessary 
documentation is already compiled to grant economic assistance to 
this category of the population.  (Tirana ATA in English 1302 GMT 30 
Jan 94 AU) 
   TRAINING FOR BERAT UNEMPLOYED:  The Office of Social Assistance 
and Former Political Persecutees in Berat is arranging the training 
of unemployed people in order to employ them in the private sector. 
This will also contribute to the consolidation of the small business 
sector.  Tapir Numani, head of this office, said that 25 persons are 
being qualified at a private firm specializing in the production of 
bread and biscuits.  Every worker will receive 5,100 leks for three 
months with the condition that the firm's owner will employ 70 
percent of the workers trained there.  The same practice will also 
be followed in a construction firm.  At present, some 16,200 persons 
are receiving social assistance in Berat.  This figure has increased 
because the Textile Mill products are not being sold, so many 
textile workers have become jobless and are receiving assistance. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1123 GMT 31 Jan 94 AU) 
   STATE EMPLOYEES TO GET 'SIGNIFICANT' WAGE INCREASE:  Starting 
with 1 February, employees of budgetary institutions will have a 
salary increase of 33 percent.  Based on the decision by the 
Ministry of Labor and Emigration, a higher rise in wages is 
anticipated for senior state officials and institutions, including 
deputies.  This is the second year that the budgetary employees have 
received a significant salary rise.  The 1993 minimal wages, 
including the auxiliary sectors of state administration, will have a 
l00-percent increase, thus a monthly salary of 2,400 leks.  However, 
the minimum wage will be 1O times lower than the highest wage in the 
budgetary sector.  Both the rise and differentiation in salaries is 
made considering qualifications and positions in organizing and 
managing all state structures.  The decision on the salary rise came 
immediately after the Albanian Parliament approved the decision on 
taxes on personal incomes.  This decision does not cover monthly 
payments up to 4,000 leks and pensions.  (Tirana ATA in English 1108 
GMT 1 Feb 94 AU) 
   RESTITUTION PROBLEMS IN FIER:  The Commission for Restitution and 
Compensation of Properties in Fier have made only 60 decisions 
concerning houses, shops, and sites.  So far, the commission has 
received 220 requests for the restitution and compensation of 
properties.  Commission Chairman Shemedin Buci said that "we are 
facing many difficulties, although instructions have been very 
clear.  In some cases, two or three persons have claimed the same 
site.  That is why we have been cooperating with the district 
court."  Main reasons for the slowness in this process were the 
conflicts between the Town Planning Department and former owners who 
insist on taking the site pertaining to them, despite the town 
regulatory plan.  Another reason was also the uncontrolled sale of 
the buildings without first notifying their former owners.  (Tirana 
ATA in English 1127 GMT 1 Feb 94 AU) 
   PRIVATE FARMERS ASSOCIATIONS:  By the end of December 1993, the 
number of private farmers associations reached 90.  They are 
concentrated in central Albania in the region of Elbasan, where 
there are 21 of them, and in Lushnje, where 10 associations are now 
operating.  Their number is limited in the north of the country, 
which is a mountainous area with limited land and populated by 
people with a strong feeling for land ownership.  The area that a 
farmers association covers is approximately 750 hectares.  The 
establishment of these associations has enabled the farmers to buy 
agricultural facilities and fertilizers and employ their family 
members in them.  A great number of families have now become members 
of these associations.  The Farmers Association of Kercukaj in 
Kavaje, central Albania, has 300 families as members, whereas the 
Farmers Association in Lac has 246 member-families.  Stock-breeders, 
too, have set up their own associations.  The largest of such 
associations is in Seman, in the Fier region, with about 700 head of 
livestock.  A great number of the farmers who possess greenhouses in 
Rrashbull and Kruje, central Albania, have joined the stock-breeders 
associations.  (Tirana ATA in English 1112 GMT 2 Feb 94 AU) 
   SAUDI ARABIA, EUROPEAN UNION GRANT FOOD, MEDICAL AID:  The World 
Islamic Bank and the World Islamic Aid Organization of Saudi Arabia 
have recently donated humanitarian aid to Albania.  The Unite ship 
arrived in Durres port, containing 8OO tons of flour, 400 tons of 
rice, and 100 tons of sugar.  Abdulla Elgami, director of this 
organization, said that this aid and the next shipments are being 
donated to poor Albanian families.  The "Medecins Sans Frontieres" 
Organization has started work distributing medical aid and 
facilities to the Albanian hospitals.  The distribution will 
continue for two months and will help improve conditions for 
vaccines and solve the problem of vaccination in general.  The 
project will then continue with the distribution of medical 
equipment to outpatient clinics and medical centers all over 
Albania.  This aid is funded by the European Union and amounts to 
approximately 5 million ECU.  (Tirana ATA in English 1128 GMT 2 Feb 
94 AU) 
   HUMANITARIAN, TRADE ACTIVITY OF IRANIAN GROUP:  The Iranian 
private association, Alba-Iran, began its humanitarian and trade 
activity in Albania two years ago.  Its activity is concentrated in 
three main directions, health service, agriculture, and industry. 
The company has made some investments so far.  Mr. Abbas Khonsari, 
head of the association, stated that they have brought to Albania 25 
tractors, three harvesters, and different spare parts at reasonable 
prices.  The foundation representatives in Albania expects another 
shipment with humanitarian aid to arrive soon.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 1109 GMT 2 Feb 94 AU) 
   ISRAELI FIRM READY TO BEGIN BUILDING APARTMENTS:  "We are the 
first Israeli firm to invest in Albania," Oren Yona, vice president 
of YY International Investments Limited, said at a news conference 
organized in one of the halls of the Dajti Hotel in Tirana.  "Our 
first step was an agreement we signed with the Albanian Government 
and which is a proof of its readiness to cooperate.  We are on the 
verge of signing a contract for the construction of 1,600-2,000 
flats.  If work goes well, then the number of flats will increase to 
6,000-7,000," Yona said.  Responding to questions by reporters 
present in the conference, Yona said that his firm is ready to start 
work as soon as the contract is signed.  He also expressed his 
conviction that, with the present situation in Albania, which is 
changing everyday in favor of foreign investors, his work in Albania 
will go well.  (Tirana ATA in English 0912 GMT 21 Jan 94 AU) 
   MAT RIVER BRIDGE:  The bridge over the Mat River, which links 
Klos with remote areas of Mat district, was inaugurated on 18 
January.  It was a great investment of 9.5 million leks, which was 
accomplished in a relatively short period of time by a private 
construction firm.  Funds for the construction of this bridge have 
been allocated twice since 1963, but the bridge has not built before 
because there were only two construction enterprises in Albania that 
were specialized in such projects.  Recently, several construction 
enterprises in Mat competed for the bridge project.  (Tirana ATA in 
English 1311 GMT 21 Jan 94 AU) 
   BREAKS FOR FOREIGN INVESTORS:  Finance Minister Piro Dishnica 
confirms that foreign investments are significant for Albania's 
economic recovery.  Thus, foreign companies with a $50 million 
initial capital, opposed to some $100 million written in the 
contract, have launched their activity in Albania.  Other companies 
with a total of $70 million investment will launch their activity 
under contracts.  Foreign investors in Albania are free to transfer 
their profits.  All investors in the production sector are exempt 
from taxes for a four-year period.  The length of term may be 
prolonged for those companies that invest in the sector of tourism 
and continue to invest in production sectors.  Foreign investors are 
exempt from customs duty for the goods used in the process of 
creating investments.  (Tirana ATA in English 1104 GMT 23 Jan 94 AU) 
   IMF FUNDING FOR IRRIGATION SYSTEM REPAIR:  The Department of 
Agriculture and Food in Kavaje District reports that, after a study 
of the lowland area, Kavaje is one of the seven districts in which a 
pilot plan will be applied to repair irrigation and drainage 
systems.  Investment for the plan will come from the IMF.  Only 15 
out of 26 pumping stations in the Kavaje District functioned during 
1993.  The Peqin-Kavaje drainage system was also improved and is 
able to function after serious damage suffered during the transition 
period.  The 25 water reservoirs have also been repaired and are now 
functioning at full capacity.  (Tirana ATA in English 1113 GMT 24 
Jan 94 AU) 
   ISLAMIC GROUP AIDS SHKODER ORPHANAGE:  The Relief Benevolent 
Islamic Society has invested about $60,000 to reconstruct Shkoder 
Orphanage.  The restoration started in February 1993 and will be 
completed in March 1994.  The investments of this society comprise 
also the salaries of the orphanage staff, food and clothes for the 
children in the orphanage, as well as monthly pensions, i.e. $20 for 
about 2,000 orphan children.  (Tirana ATA in English 1116 GMT 24 Jan 
94 AU) 
   CABINET ACTS ON TAX LAW, FOREIGN AGREEMENTS, PROPERTY:  On 24 
January, the Council of Ministers discussed and adopted the Law on 
Notaries presented by the Justice Ministry.  The law sanctions the 
content and aim of notarial activity.  The Council of Ministers also 
approved the Law on Taxation Over Property in the Republic of 
Albania.  The above-mentioned law aims at increasing the fiscal 
contribution by the population presently living in the countryside. 
Compiled in complete accordance with the Law on Land, this law will 
help balance the contributions of urban and rural populations.  The 
cabinet also approved in principle the Law on the Agreement Between 
the Russian Federation and the Republic of Albania on Judicial Aid 
and Relations on Civil, Family, and Penal Cases.  It also approved 
the Law on the Ratification of the Agreement Between the Republic of 
Albania and the Republic of Tunisia for the Encouragement and 
Defense of Investments.  The meeting also discussed the draft 
decision on the criteria of assessing state property that will be 
privatized or given to joint ventures and the rent for state objects 
given to third parties for usage.  This draft was approved in 
principle.  Besides problems of valuation in the conditions of 
promoting privatization due to the privatization of small units, 
small and medium enterprises, the decision also solves the problems 
of the final liquidation of their activity and especially their 
obligations.  (Tirana ATA in English 0912 GMT 25 Jan 94 AU) 
   IOCU MEMBERSHIP FOR CONSUMER ASSOCIATION:  On 23 December 1993, 
the Albanian Consumer Association was accepted as a correspondent 
member of the International Organization of the Consumers' Union 
(IOCU), which has its headquarters in London.  This independent 
association was formed on 1 September 1991 and is the first 
organization of Albanian consumers recognized by international 
organizations.  Its main objective is to defend the interests of 
Albanian consumers.  (Tirana ATA in English 1135 GMT 25 Jan 94 AU) 
   LABOR MINISTRY, GREEK OAED 1994 COOPERATION PROGRAM:  The 
Albanian Ministry of Labor and Social Assistance and the Greek 
Unemployment Office (OAED) recently agreed on a joint cooperation 
program for 1994.  The medium-term program will include the exchange 
of specialists between the OAED and the Albanian Ministry of Labor 
and Social Assistance, a short training course by OAED for 6O 
Albanian youngsters at Greek professional schools, and the provision 
of new and reconditioned equipment for the professional education 
system in Albania.  The program will be implemented in the context 
of the PHARE Program of the European Union and will be signed by the 
Albanian Government during 1994.  Based on the needs in Albania, the 
PHARE Program will provide technical assistance in the organization, 
employment, professional training, and establishment of the 
necessary structures for the functioning of the programs.  In 
February, the two sides will sign a detailed financial agreement in 
Athens.  Some parts of 1994 activities will be financed by a 
European Union program.  (Tirana ATA in English 1124 GMT 25 Jan 94 
AU) 
   FOREIGN INVESTMENT IN ELBASAN DISTRICT:  Some 20 foreign 
companies, 18 of which are joint ventures with the state and two are 
private firms, are investing in Elbasan District.  A total of $7.5 
million have so far been invested in a variety of enterprises, and 
an additional $7 million will be invested during the first half of 
this year.  Twelve investments cover productive enterprises. 
(Tirana ATA in English 13O1 GMT 26 Jan 94 AU) 

   EUROPEAN UNION HUMANITARIAN AID:  A statement by the European 
Union (EU) Commission, a mission of which will visit Tirana confirms 
that the EU has granted an additional 1O million ECU to Albania as 
humanitarian aid.  Of that sum, 6.3 million ECU will be used to 
repair the country's eight-year schools according a plan provided by 
the Albanian Government.  The pupils of these schools are from six 
to 15 years of age.  One million ECU will be used to construct the 
houses of former political prisoners and provide them with social 
assistance.  The EU has financed a 2 million ECU program for 
building lOO flats for former political prisoners in Tirana.  The 
present grant will finance the construction of another 60 flats and 
additional social assistance. 
   In accordance with the request of the Albanian Government, the EU 
will grant 1.2 million ECU to finance a part of the principal 
repairs (walls, windows, shelters) of all the Albanian prisons and 
to equip them.  A pilot program for seven prisons selected by the 
Albanian Government will finance organized activities for the 
prisoners.  A sum of 1.5 million ECU is going to be used for small 
projects titled "Close to Albanian Citizens."  There are funds to be 
used by Albanian or foreign non-governmental organizations for such 
small projects.  The EU has already financed 24 projects of that 
kind, such as supplying medicines and clothes, reconstructing a 
center for Albanian handicapped children, and furnishing farmers 
with seeds and chemical products.  The EU has given a larger fund 
for such projects this time because they have previously been 
successful in Albania.  A EU Commission mission from Brussels will 
come to Albania in order to define the execution of these projects. 
(Tirana ATA in English 1316 GMT 26 Jan 94 AU) 
   TRANSPORTION AGREEMENT WITH DENMARK:  An agreement on the 
international transport of passengers and commodities was signed 
between the Kingdom of Denmark and the Republic of Albania in 
Copenhagen on January 25.  The agreement was signed by the Albanian 
minister of transport and communication, Mr. Fatos Bitincka, and the 
omnipotent of the Danish Government and state secretary for 
transport, Mr. Ole Zaki.  (Tirana ATA in English 1323 GMT 26 Jan 94 
AU) 
   BULGARIA 
   COMMISSION REVIEWS RECONSTRUCTION, DEVELOPMENT FUND:  On 2 
February the Parliamentary Economic Commission opened discussions on 
a report on the state and 1993 performance of the State 
Reconstruction and Development Fund.  The fund was set up in 1991 to 
consolidate funds extended to this country by international 
financial institutions and other persons and allocate them in the 
form of loans for the purposes of structural adjustment of 
Bulgaria's economy or for servicing Bulgaria's foreign debt.  The 
funds are kept in accounts at the central bank but there are nine 
commercial banks servicing them.  According to the figures submitted 
to the commission, the fund's proceeds slightly exceed 19 billion 
leva and the available funds amount to some 1O billion leva.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1545 GMT 2 Feb 94 AU) 
   FIRST PRIVATE BANK EXPECTS PROFIT FOR 1993:  In contrast to most 
of the Bulgarian commercial banks, the First Private Bank ended 1993 
with a profit, the bank's executive director Emiliyan Dimitrov 
informed the PARI daily.  The final figures are not yet known, but 
Dimitrov expected a net profit of about lOO million leva, most of 
which will be retained to build up the bank's reserves as required 
by law.  Dimitrov said that about 1O million leva would be 
distributed as dividends to shareholders.  Dimitrov attributed the 
lower profits in 1993 to the accumulation of bad debts, which 
increased from 9 percent in 1992 to 12-13 percent in 1993.  However, 
he considered this percentage normal for the conditions prevailing 
in Bulgaria.  One of the nonperforming loans is that made to the 
failed Yambol Bank.  However, Dimitrov said that the Bulgarian 
National Bank is likely to reach agreement soon with the committee 
of creditor banks.  (Sofia PARI in Bulgarian 2 Feb 94 p 4 AU) 
   RAYON PLANT ENGAGED IN WASTE REDUCTION PROJECT:  A project for 
the reduction of industrial waste, developed at the World Center for 
Environmental Protection in New York, will be implemented in the 
Sviloza Rayon Plant in Svishtov, northern Bulgaria, the director of 
the regional inspectorate of environmental protection, Kostadin 
Gugov, told the local BTA correspondent.  The plant will save 
between U.S. $25,000 and 50,000 as a result of the project, which is 
expected to be completed this year.  It is part of a long-term 
program for pollutants reduction along the Yantra river financed by 
the U.S. International Development Agency.  (Sofia BTA in English 
2319 GMT 3 Feb 94 AU) 
   JOINT INVESTMENT BANK PLANNED WITH RUSSIA:  Ten Bulgarian banks 
are going to set up a joint venture investment bank with Russian 
partners, TRUD reported on April, citing Bulgarian bankers. 
Touristsportbank, the Slavyani Bank, the Bulgarian Post Bank and the 
Capitalbank have submitted their documents for the registration of 
the new partnership.  They expect to receive a banking license in 
three months.  Several large Russian banks, power engineering 
companies, and insurers will be partners in the bank.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1212 GMT 4 Jan 94 AU) 
   FIRM'S STOCK TO TRADE ON NASDAQ:  For several days now the U.S. 
Stock Exchange National Association of Securities Dealers Automated 
Quotation System (NASDAQ) has been offering shares of Lifechoice 
International Inc., the joint-stock company said.  Its officials say 
this is the first of the moves aimed at taking the shareholders on 
the U.S. stock market which will bring about a higher liquidity of 
investments.  Two months ago Lifechoice Int. launched an 
advertisement offensive in the press.  In terms of profitability, 
with its predicted dividends the company is way ahead of any other 
proposals for investment.  The setting up of the company with 
Canadian holding last June raised a stir.  It was said to be the 
first Bulgarian company to enter the international markets both with 
its output and with its shares.  Lifechoice Int. attracted attention 
following reports on the development of Factor-R, a new medicine for 
immuno-prophylaxis against HIV.  For the time being, most experts 
decline to comment either on the projected dividends or on the 
effectiveness of the widely advertised medicine.  Some would even 
say all this fuss was nothing but a publicity stunt related to the 
sign-in that has been launched to increase the company's capital to 
100 million leva.  (Sofia BTA in English 1541 GMT 4 Jan 94 AU) 
   FIRM TO BUILD TOWN IN RUSSIA:  In the face of strong 
international competition, the Silistra branch of the Bulgarian 
Construction Trust has won a contract to build a modern town for 
60,000 inhabitants in the vicinity of Rostov on Don, in Russia. 
Construction work has already started.  The work is being financed 
by Germany, and the housing is intended to accommodate the families 
of former Soviet troops returning from the former GDR.  The work 
includes constructing 500 apartment blocks, a school, two 
kindergartens, and a medical clinic, together with all the necessary 
services and infrastructure.  An advance group of workers has 
already completed a temporary settlement and services for the main 
contingent of construction workers.  Excavation work is now 
underway.  It is expected that 4,000-5,000 Bulgarian workers will be 
employed at the site during the summer months.  (Sofia Khorizont 
Radio Network in Bulgarian 0900 GMT 5 Feb 94 AU) 
   FOREIGN EXCHANGE RESERVES FALL:  Referring to information 
released by the Bulgarian National Bank, STANDART NEWS reported on 5 
February that at the end of January the central bank's foreign 
exchange reserves were valued at U.S.$664.44 million.  During 
January the bank's dollar reserves fell by about 36 million, as a 
result of debt service payments to the IMF and the European Union, 
the paper reported.  (Sofia BTA in English 1911 GMT 5 Feb 94 AU) 
   BUSINESS MEETING WITH RUSSIAN COMPANIES:  The first Bulgarian- 
Russian meeting in Veliko Turnovo, central Bulgaria, ended with an 
exhibition sale.  The meeting, initiated by the local Chamber of 
Commerce and Industry, was attended by officials of 16 Russian 
companies and industrial associations operating in the food 
processing industry, electronics, power engineering, mechanical 
engineering, timbering and the cellulose and paper industry.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1644 GMT 6 Feb 94 AU) 
   NEW TRUCK SUCCESSFULLY TESTED:  The automotive plant in Veliki 
Preslav, northeastern Bulgaria, has successfully completed the 
testing of the latest Bulgarian truck Preslav-206   The first 20 
trucks have been assembled and will soon be put on the market.  The 
truck's 90 HP turbo-engine has improved technical and performance 
characteristics.  The next model, the Preslav-206K, which is 
designed to service small municipal economies, is being tested at 
the moment.  Other types of trucks are being also developed and will 
be available in the market soon.  (Sofia BTA in English 1644 GMT 6 
Feb 94 AU) 
   LOVECH FIRM TO ASSEMBLE U.S. BUSES:  The Balkan Mechanical 
Engineering Company in Lovech, northern Bulgaria, which until 
recently has assembled the Russian Moskvich car, is planning to 
change over to assembling American buses.  The company is expected 
to assemble 120 buses this year and intends to increase its annual 
production to 340 buses.  The deal was concluded on a production 
sharing basis, in partnership with the automotive plant in Gotha, 
Germany, and the project is financed by a German privatization 
agency and a Swiss stockholding company.  (Sofia BTA in English 1644 
GMT 6 Feb 94 AU) 
   PRIVATE VRATSA COMPANY MAKING TELEVISION SETS:  The Videomax 
Private TV Company in Vratsa, northwestern Bulgaria, began 
manufacturing three models of Philips TV sets this year.  Philips 
provided the technological concept and the basic components.  The 
new TV sets have 37, 51, and SO cm flat rectangular screens, 90 
channels, cable television tuners, teletext decoders for the Roman 
and Cyrillic alphabets, and remote controls.  This year the company 
plans to start producing new Daewoo TV sets.  According to Videomax 
President Kiril Modrev, most of the company's production is exported 
to Russia.  (Sofia BTA in English 1644 GMT 6 Feb 94 AU) 
   ELECTRICAL FIRM DIVERSIFIES PRODUCTION:  The Ekita Private 
Company in Petrich, southwestern Bulgaria, has a small plant making 
electric motor commutators.  Three years ago it began manufacturing 
electronic clocks.  Now it makes about 40 types of starters for U.S. 
and European-made cars, using electrical equipment produced by 
Bosch, Chrysler, Delco, Lada, and Mitsubishi.  According to Ekita 
President Kiril Georgiev, the plant uses highly efficient U.S. 
technologies and exporting its products to Europe, the United 
States, and Canada.  The annual production capacity of the Petrich- 
based company is about two million units pieces (as received) of 
various sizes.  (Sofia BTA in English 1644 GMT 6 Feb 94 AU) 
   MARC RICH WINS STATE TENDER FOR POWER STATION COAL:  On 8 
February the daily KONTINENT led with an article saying that Marc 
Rich of Switzerland has won the tender for the delivery of 120,000 
tons of coal from South Africa.  Five Western and several Bulgarian 
companies took part in the tender competition.  It is still unclear 
why the National Electricity Company accepted this particular offer 
and rejected all the rest, KONTINENT noted, adding that Marc Rich is 
the main supplier of crude oil to the largest refinery in Bulgaria, 
Nef tokhim-Burgas.  The paper voiced doubts that the Swiss company's 
offer really was the best one.  The SDS daily DEMOKRATSIYA also 
questions the advantages of the Marc Rich offer.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1155 GMT 8 Feb 94 AU) 
   SOFIA-BASED BANKS PAY LESS PROFITS TAX FOR 1993:  The profits 
taxes paid by Sofia-based banks for 1993 total 742 million leva, 24 
CHASA reported on 8 February, referring to data released by the 
Sofia tax administration.  This amount represents only 14 percent of 
the budget projection of 4,760 million leva and 17 percent of the 
profits tax collected in 1992, the paper notes.  The reported reason 
is the low profits that the banks posted in 1993.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1259 GMT 8 Feb 94 AU) 
   AGENCY CHIEF DENIES BEST COMPANIES ALREADY PRIVATIZED:  In an 
interview published in the latest issue of the CASH weekly, Khristo 
Pamukchiev, chairman of the Supervisory Board of the Privatization 
Agency, said that "nothing has been sold in Bulgaria yet to justify 
the claim that 'the tidbits' have already been eaten."  "The 
Bulgarian enterprises are in such a grave state that we cannot 
expect large financial proceeds.  That is why in the next few years 
we will pursue a policy of encouraging national investors.  The 
Privatization Agency intends to set into operation several 
additional techniques and levers such as leasing, management 
contracts with purchase and sale clauses, and the setting up of 
restorable privatization funds from which people will draw money at 
favorable terms and will gradually repay it from their profit," 
Pamukchiev says.  (Sofia BTA in English 1143 GMT 9 Feb 94 AU) 
   RECONSTRUCTION, DEVELOPMENT FUND HAS 9.9 BILLION LEVA:  STANDART 
NEWS reported on 9 February that the state Reconstruction and 
Development Fund has 9.9 billion leva available for investment. 
According to a report on the state of the fund, last year it granted 
credits totalling some 2.8 billion leva.  The National Electricity 
Company received 728 million leva and the Sofia Municipality was 
granted a 15O million leva loan for the construction of the new 
metro system, which it has already paid back.  Balkancar got 300 
million leva to finance exports to Poland and Glavbolgarstroy was 
granted DM40 million for bank guarantees in connection with 
construction projects in Russia, at 10 percent interest and to be 
repaid by the end of the year.  The comparatively long list of 
enterprises and organizations financed by the fund does not include 
a single private company, STANDART NEWS observes.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1143 GMT 9 Feb 94 AU) 
   DANUBE RIVER PORT IDLE:  Never in its 155-year-long history has 
the Danube river port of Lom faced such a crisis.  The quays are 
empty, and the 600 employees, who are completely idle, fear heavy 
layoffs.  According to port manager Kuzman Khristov, the management 
has no other choice, because the port lost almost 5 million leva 
last year.  All attempts to conclude new goods handling contracts 
have failed.  Even longstanding business partners like Ukraine, 
which delivers power station coal and metals for the Kremikovtsi 
Plant, have failed to sign any new contracts.  (Sofia DEMOKRATSIYA 
in Bulgarian 22 Jan 94 p 5 AU) 
   PRIVATE BUSINESS LEADER MOLLOV INTERVIEWED:  In an exclusive BTA 
interview, Valentin Mollov, president of the Confederation of 
Industrialists (G-13, an organization of big private business), 
denies that G-13 has political ambitions.  The group is in favor of 
the majority electoral system for the next parliamentary elections. 
Mollov believes that, given Bulgaria's fledgling market relations 
and democratic practices, it is dangerous to have lobbies in the 
political circles formed by private firms or groups.  The G-13 
leader sees no worthy politicians among Bulgaria's present statesmen 
who might lead the country forward.  G-13 is waiting for government 
clearance on investment in various projects:  a free transport 
corridor to the Aegean, construction of a port at Alexandropolis and 
of tunnel beneath Mount Shipka in the Balkan range, and a proposal 
to take over an unused military material base, guaranteeing its 
exploitation.  G-13 has no formal contacts with G-21, the 
Association of Bulgarian State Industries.  Mollov thinks the 
association is faced with serious problems regarding bad bank 
receivables and their huge debts to the state.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 13O9 GMT 26 Jan 94 AU) 
   FRENCH PLAN FOR FERROUS METALLURGY RESTRUCTURING CRITICIZED: 
Bulgarian experts have serious objections to the project to 
restructure the nation's ferrous metallurgy sector assigned to 
French consultants Sof fres Conseil under the PHARE (Economic 
Reconstruction Aid for Poland and Hungary) Program, DUMA reports on 
27 January.  On January 12 corporate managers in the sector said 
that the French firm had failed to move an alternative development 
program for the sector's major four companies, the report says, and 
they also pointed to other inadequacies.  Most experts of the 
Ministry of Industry and the Institute of Metallurgy believe that 
the project's impact will be adverse, the daily adds.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1230 GMT 27 Jan 94 AU) 
   PRIVATE PRODUCTION INCREASES IN 1993:  The TRUD daily reported on 
27 January that there was a further expansion of private initiative 
in all sectors of material production in 1993.  Output totalled 
nearly 44 billion leva (more than U.S.$1 billion, with trade 
accounting for 44 percent, construction -- 22 percent, industry -- 
21 percent, and transport -- 7 percent.  Production rose 22 percent 
from a year earlier (at 1992 prices), with industry and trade 
growing even more, the paper reported.  However, only in trade is 
the share of the private sector larger than that of the state-run 
enterprises and the cooperatives.  Private firms accounted for 57 
percent of retail sales in 1993, up from 46 percent a year earlier. 
(Sofia BTA in English 123O GMT 27 Jan 94 AU) 
   PARLIAMENT APPROVES NEW EXCISE DUTIES:  At its session on 27 
January, the National Assembly took the second reading of the Excise 
Act and approved the excise duty tariff.  Under the new tariff, cars 
with less than 1,800 cubic centimeters (cc) cylinder displacement 
carry no excise duty; cars from 1,8OO to 2500 cc displacement will 
carry a duty of 10 percent and cars above 2,500 cc 40 percent.  The 
duty on lead-free gasoline with an octane rating below 93 is 60 
percent; lead-free gasolines above 93 octane will carry a l00- 
percent duty.  Ordinary leaded gasoline of grades A-93 and below 
will attract a duty of 70 percent, while gasoline above this octane 
number will carry a duty of 110 percent.  Diesel fuel carries a duty 
of 30 percent.  Erotic and pornographic products will carry an 
excise duty of 70 percent; perfumes will carry a duty of 40 percent; 
and articles made of precious metals, including jewelry, will carry 
a duty of 20 percent.  Audiovisual equipment carries an excise duty 
of 10 percent; wine carries a duty of 2 leva per liter; and plum 
brandy, 30 stotinki per alcoholic percent.  (Sofia Khorizont Radio 
Network in Bulgarian 1600 GMT 27 Jan 94 AU) 
   TRADE TALKS WITH INDIA:  The Bulgarian-Indian Intergovernmental 
Committee for Economic, Scientific and Technological cooperation 
will hold its 1Oth session from 1 to 3 February.  The committee is 
co-chaired by Deputy Prime Minister and Minister of Trade Valentin 
Karabashev for Bulgaria and Minister of Agriculture Balram Jakhar 
for India.  The Indian delegation will include about 10 senior 
Indian Government officials and a group of Indian businessmen. 
Representatives of a number of Bulgarian companies will also take 
part in the session.  The sides are expected to sign an agreement on 
the avoidance of double taxation and map out measures to curb the 
decline in Bulgarian-Indian trade.  As compared with U.S.$90 million 
in 1985, the volume of trade between Bulgaria and India fell to $9.6 
million in 1992.  In the first nine months of 1993 it was $13.5 
million.  Bulgaria's exports to India mainly comprise petroleum 
products, ferrous and nonferrous metals, industrial goods, 
chemicals, fertilizers, electrical equipment, pharmaceuticals, and 
rare metals.  Imports from India include cars, knitwear, garments, 
leather wear, mica, jewelry, pharmaceuticals, and spices.  The 
Indian side wants to invest in Bulgarian industry, a Trade Ministry 
official said.  There is great interest in tractors, bulldozers, 
hoisting and hauling equipment, lighting fixtures, and seamless 
pipes.  (Sofia BTA in English 1826 GMT 27 Jan 94 AU) 
   INDUSTRIAL MANAGERS POLLED ON INVESTMENT POLICY:  According to a 
survey of corporate finance taken by the National Statistical 
Institute in late 1993, 78 percent of corporate managers in the 
nonfarming sector say high interest rates were a serious setback in 
1993, while 62 percent point to indebtedness.  Only 20 percent of 
respondents say the loss of markets was a major cause of fiscal 
instability. 
   According to inconclusive estimates by corporate managers, 
tangible and nontangible investment in 1993 amounted to some 10,500 
million leva, 500 million up from early-year forecasts.  Yet 
investment has been shrinking.  Money was spent to maintain old 
assets and less on new technology.  Experts put that down to the 
fact that capacities were utilized only 57 percent.  Some 70 percent 
of investors think money should be invested in upgrading existing 
assets.  Investment plans for 1994 are within the investment 
framework set in 1993, the survey shows.  The high prices of 
investment goods are seen as a key reason for constraints on 
investment in 1994.  (Sofia BTA in English 1235 GMT 28 Jan 94 AU) 
   HEINEKEN, ZAGORKA BREWERY FORM JOINT VENTURE:  The Dutch Heineken 
concern and the Zagorka Brewery in Stara Zagora will set up a joint 
venture.  The Dutch side proposes to invest $35 million over a 4- to 
5-year period with a view to increase the output up by 50 percent. 
The products will keep the Zagorka trademark, and 10 percent of the 
brewery's production capacity will be used for producing Heineken. 
(Sofia BTA in English 1446 GMT 30 Jan 94 AU) 
   BULGARIAN-FRENCH FIRM TO BUILD MOTELS:  The Bulgarian-French 
joint-stock company Bulphoenix will build motels in this country, 
Chamber of Tourism Chief Tsvetan Tonchev said.  The 1994-95 
construction plan includes 12 sites.  A French bank will provide a 
loan of 0.25 million French francs at 6 percent for the 
construction.  The Bulgarian-French company will be registered by 
March this year.  The French side, including Phoenix and another 
three companies, hold 48 percent of the shares, and the Bulgarian 
side (Touristsportholding and three other companies) 52 percent. 
(Sofia BTA in English 1446 GMT 30 Jan 94 AU) 
   FUNDS SOUGHT FOR NEW DISCOUNT BANK:  East-West European Holding 
Group and the Financing House Temex Ltd. are launching a sign-in for 
raising funds to set up a Bulgarian Discount Bank.  The bank will 
start with 200 million leva authorized capital and will apply to the 
central bank for a domestic license.  Discount and clearing 
operations and check accounts will be serviced with priority. 
(Sofia BTA in English 1446 GMT 30 Jan 94 AU) 
   FIRST PRIVATE BANK TO OPEN BRANCH IN GREECE:  The First Private 
Bank has developed a project for opening its first overseas 
subsidiary in Greece, First Private Bank Executive Director and 
Deputy Chairman Emiliyan Dimitrov said.  So far the bank has opened 
offices in Izmir, Frankfurt, Vienna, and Moscow.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1446 GMT 30 Jan 94 AU) 
   PRIVATE FIRM PRODUCES TELEVISION SETS:  The market saw the first 
TV sets of the Bedson trademark.  The new product was developed and 
tested by the private company of the same name in Shumen and 
specialists of the Dutch firm of Phillips.  (Sofia BTA in English 
1446 GMT 30 Jan 94 AU) 
   NATIONAL BANK AUCTIONS SECURITIES:  The press reports that the 
Bulgarian National Bank sold securities worth 1.5 billion leva at 
auction on 31 January.  "This is a record, as we auctioned off all 
securities on offer," Plamen Oresharski, chief of the bank's 
Treasury and Internal Debt Department, was reported as saying.   The 
proceeds of the sale will go towards financing the budget deficit. 
The securities sold at an average of 77.82 leva for a par of 100 
leva.  The 22.18 leva margin gives a redemption yield of 28.5 
percent.  (Sofia BTA in English 1101 GMT 1 Feb 94 AU) 
   NEW RO-RO FERRY TO NOVOROSSIYSK:  At a meeting in Novorossiysk, 
the chiefs of Burgas and Novorossiysk Ports agreed to open a new 
ferry service between the two ports.  The new service is intended to 
save Bulgarian trucks from following the long and unsafe route 
through Romania, Moldova, and Ukraine.  The Bulgarian party 
confirmed its readiness to open the service immediately, all the 
more that the construction of a Ro-Ro (roll on-roll off) terminal in 
Burgas is already under way.  Under the project it is envisioned to 
include passenger ships in the service too.  The Burgas Port 
delegation insisted on two vessels a week:  one sailing from Varna 
and the other from Burgas.  However, the capacity of Novorossiysk 
Port allows handling of only one voyage a week, and the parties 
agreed on this.  (Sofia BTA in English 1425 GMT 1 Feb 94 AU) 
   FIGURES ON 1993 PRODUCTION:  In the view of the National 
Statistics Institute (NSI), production enterprises have little 
opportunity to recover in the present economic situation.  According 
to the NSI, in 1993 over half the industrial sectors were unable to 
find markets for their products,  One enterprise in eight had to 
shut down its operations during the year, as a result of which the 
state sector shrank by 1O percent and the private sector by 8 
percent.  All in all, the volume of production fell by 12 percent 
compared with 1992.  Enterprises in the material production sphere 
produced goods valued at 357 billion leva during 1993, while retail 
goods turnover was 118 billion leva, 86 percent of which was in 
retail trading and the rest in public catering.  Compred to 1992, 
this represents a decline of 3.6 percent 1992.  Receipts from the 
sale of goods and services showed a decrease of 12 percent. 
   The continued decline in activity on the part of state and 
cooperative enterprises was to some extent compensated for by 
increased activity in the private sector, whose share of total 
output rose from 8.6 to 12.3 percent during the year, being valued 
at 44 billion leva.  In 1993 the official inflation figure was 15.6 
percent lower than in 1992.  Inflation was fueled by the higher 
prices of energy and postal and telephone services.  The cost of 
services rose by 93.66 percent during the year, and food products 
increased in price by an average of 40 percent.  The NSI estimates 
that the GDP will decline by 2.5 percent during 1994.  (Sofia PARI 
in Bulgarian 28 Jan 94 p 3 AU) 
   PRELIMINARY 1993 ECONOMIC DATA:  According to preliminary data of 
the National Statistical Institute (NSI), annual inflation in 1993 
amounted to 63.9 percent, which falls within projections, according 
to a 26 January KONTINENT report, quoting the boss of the NSI 
Economic Statistics Department Milcho Mladenov.  Foods rose 60.4 
percent, non-foods 55.9 percent, and services 93.7 percent in 1993. 
Wages rose by an average of 52.3 percent and social security 
payments by 50 percent.  By last October, the jobless totalled 
750,000.  In 1993 the GDP fell by 9 percent, industry shrank by 8.2 
percent, and construction by 22.6 percent.  Transport was the only 
sector to report a rise of 4.5 percent.  According to preliminary 
NSI estimates, the private sector accounted for some 25 percent of 
the GDP in 1993, up from 15 percent in 1992.  (Sofia BTA in English 
1209 GMT 26 Jan 94 AU) 
   PRIVATE OIL COMPANIES ATTACK NEFTOKHIM:  Following the first 
meeting yesterday between private and state-owned oil companies, it 
emerged that private oil importers insist that the state-owned 
Neftokhim Refinery be transferred to the direct jurisdiction of the 
government, STANDART NEWS reported on 2 February.  The private firms 
allege that Nef tokhim owes the exchequer billions of leva and that 
these debts are rescheduled over and over again.  At the same time, 
Nef tokhim keeps exporting petrol and diesel fuel at a loss because 
it cannot sell it in Bulgaria, states a letter from the private 
firms Eltex, Europetrol, Petromax, Litex, and Elpida to the 
president, parliament, and government.  According to the private 
companies, Nef tokhim preferred cargo deliveries from Western 
partners under the pretext that they were more accurate.  This, 
however, is not fair and harms the interests of the Bulgarian 
suppliers, the private oil companies' bosses argue.  Nef tokhim 
charged U.S.$18 for processing a ton of crude from Bulgarian 
companies, but only $9 for crude supplied by Marc Rich.  (Sofia BTA 
in English 1339 GMT 2 Feb 94 AU) 
   CABINET CLOSES KOMI JOINT TIMBER ENTERPRISE:  On 10 January the 
cabinet decided to close down the Bulgarian wood-processing 
enterprise in the Komi Autonomous Oblast in the Russian Federation. 
The decision was prompted by Moscow's refusal to amend the agreement 
on joint wood processing to make it more profitable for Bulgaria. 
The cabinet ministers insisted on increasing the Bulgarian wood- 
processing quota from 38 to 42 percent and reducing the tariffs 
imposed on transporting the wood on Russian territory.  A further 
demand was for permission to export timber directly from Komi to 
third markets. 
   Khristo Todorov, head of the Forestry Committee, said that at the 
negotiations in September 1993 an agreement was reached with the 
Russian experts.  However, in November Moscow said that the 
Bulgarian demands were unjustified.  He added that beginning in 
April the enterprises in Usogorsk and Gorniy Mezen will gradually be 
shut down.  Two other joint Bulgarian-Russian enterprises in 
Blagoevo and Mezhdurechensk will also shut down in mid-June, as it 
has become impossible to continue their self-financing and self- 
maintenance under the current Bulgarian-Russian agreement.  The 
4,600 people currently employed at the four enterprises will have to 
seek other jobs as of September 1994. 
   "Before 1991 we used to process 3.6 million cubic meters of 
timber in Komi.  Last year production dropped to 1.2 million cubic 
meters," Todorov pointed out.  He added that the cessation of timber 
supplies from Komi will not cause a crisis in the Bulgarian timber- 
processing industry, as domestic timber production will satisfy 
local needs.  However, talks on joint timber production could 
continue and an agreement could still be reached, he said.     Prime 
Minister Berov has invited Komi's leaders to Sofia for talks. 
(Sofia 24 CHASA in Bulgarian 11 Jan 94 p 13 AU) 
   CABINET BARS OFFICIALS FROM BOARDS OF STATE COMPANIES:  On 13 
January the Council of Ministers decided to prohibit National 
Assembly deputies, ministers, heads of committees, and oblast 
administrators from serving on the boards of directors and 
supervisory councils of state companies.  The ministers also 
approved a code of regulations for managing state companies.  The 
ban on serving as directors of state firms extends to mayors of 
municipalities and their deputies, secretaries of municipalities, 
senior officials of the Privatization Agency, and relatives of 
members of the managements of state companies.  Until now, the 
majority of top state officials have derived additional income -- up 
to one and a half times their regular salaries -- from serving on 
different boards of state companies.  Under the new regulations, 
executive directors who also serve on the boards of state firms may 
draw salaries of up to 35O percent of the national average wage. 
(Sofia 24 CHASA in Bulgarian 14 Jan 93 p 13 AU) 
   PLOVDIV PEOPLE'S BANK REESTABLISHED:  A group of 21 heirs of 
former members of the Plovdiv People's Bank have reestablished the 
bank, which was founded in 1913 for the purpose of providing credit 
for the middle class.  The bank was closed in 1951 by government 
decree and its assets transferred to the State Savings Bank.  The 
founders of the restored bank are the sons, daughters, and 
grandchildren of prominent Plovdiv families.  Plamen Dichev, the 
chief initiator of the move to restore the bank, was chosen as its 
chairman.  (Sofia PARI in Bulgarian 17 Jan 93 p 4 AU) 
   NATIONAL MEETING OF STOCK EXCHANGES:  "Bulgaria's stock market is 
chaotic, but so is the country's economy," the executive director of 
the Sofia Stock Exchange, Bozhidar Danev, said after the end of the 
second national meeting of stock exchanges and divisions on January 
14 and 15.  "The economy is stagnant and the stock markets are also 
flat.  To talk of a stock market in Bulgaria is an overstatement for 
the time being," Danev said.  "Wildcat exchange trade is going on 
now, but the taming of the economy will lead to a taming of the 
stock markets as well," he added.  According to Danev, capital has 
been immobilized over the past few years, above all due to the 
moratorium on transfer of state property.  Capital movement is now 
more restricted than in the first years prior to the passage of the 
Privatization Act, he added. 
   The participants in the meeting coordinated positions on security 
trading and adopted mutually acceptable principles and rules.  A 
Standing Coordinating Group was formed to draft uniform codes for 
stock trading.  They also adopted a declaration expressing readiness 
to provide stock market mechanisms to the state authorities for 
their fullest possible utilization in the privatization process. 
The existing bills on securities and stock exchanges were 
considered.  Differences will be thrashed out at a forthcoming 
roundtable discussion, organized jointly with World Bank resident 
representative John Wilton and experts of the Frankfurt Stock 
Exchange and the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, Viktor 
Papazov, executive director of Sofia's First Bulgarian Stock 
Exchange, said.  (Sofia BTA in English 1106 GMT 17 Jan 94 AU) 
   UNEMPLOYMENT RISE SLOWS IN DECEMBER:  According to the National 
Employment Service, the number of registered unemployed rose at a 
lower rate in December 1993.  The total number of jobless rose by 
0.24 percent in December, reaching 626,141, or 16.38 percent of the 
working population.  In December 42,017 persons registered for 
unemployment benefit, 8,666 fewer than in the previous month. 
During the month 23,824 workers were made redundant in industry and 
3,560 employees in the nonproduction sector.  Registered job 
vacancies fell to 6,059, compared to 7,294 in November.  (Sofia PARI 
in Bulgarian 18 Jan 94 p 3 AU) 
   PENSION INCREASE EXPECTED IN MARCH:  As of 7 March pensioners are 
expected to receive a 78-percent increase to compensate for 
inflation, plus a monthly allowance of 280 leva.  Nikolay Nikolov, 
head of the Pensions Department of the Ministry of Labor and Social 
Welfare, said on 18 January that this would happen if the new 
compensation mechanism is approved.  According to the new mechanism 
proposed by the government, pensions will be updated every six 
months, not every quarter as has been the case so far.  The minimum 
social pension will rise from 450 to 800 leva per month, plus the 
280 leva allowance.  (Sofia KONTINENT in Bulgarian 19 Jan 94 p 1 AU) 
   BULGARIAN-JAPANESE ECONOMIC COUNCIL MEETS IN TOKYO:  The 
Bulgarian-Japanese Economic Council held its 13th session in Tokyo 
on 19 January with the participation of representatives of Japanese 
business circles and a Bulgarian delegation headed by Bulgarian 
Chamber of Commerce and Industry Chairman Bozhidar Bozhinov.  The 
forum agreed the terms for restarting the credit line for insuring 
Japanese exports to Bulgaria and for extending a two-tranche loan to 
stimulate small and medium-sized private enterprises.  The hosts 
expressed their readiness to increase technical assistance to 
Bulgaria within the International Cooperation Fund.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1116 GMT 20 Jan 94 AU) 
   WEST EUROPEAN CONSORTIUM TO BUILD MARITSA IZTOK UNITS:  A 
consortium comprising German, French, and British companies is 
planning to construct a further two generating units at the Maritsa 
Iztok-1 Thermal Power Plant, 24 CHASA reported on 20 January, citing 
Power Engineering Committee Chairman Nikita Shervashidze.  The 
construction will cost 2 billion French francs, to be provided by 
the consortium as a loan.  The new units, each of 175 megawatts, 
will replace older ones and will operate on low-heating-value types 
of coal.  (Sofia BTA in English 1116 GMT 20 Jan 94 AU) 
   GREEK BANK OPENS SOFIA OFFICE:  The Greek Macedonia Thrace bank 
has opened an office in Sofia.  It is the first northern Greek 
lending institution to open offices in this country.  The bank will 
service payments between Bulgaria and Greece and will join in the 
planned founding of the Orthodox Bank, in which the Moscow 
Patriarchate will also hold a stake.  The Bulgarian National Bank is 
expected to issue a permit for the opening of an Orthodox Bank 
subsidiary in Sofia.  (Sofia BTA in English 1116 GMT 20 Jan 94 AU) 
   PROBLEMS WITH JOINT VENTURES:  Joint ventures attract little 
investment but create lots of problems, says an article in PARI on 
21 January.  The daily puts the amount of foreign capital invested 
in Bulgarian-based joint ventures at $53.1 million.  The problems 
are in-built in the joint ventures' memorandums of association, the 
article says.  According to the author, these memorandums fail to 
clear up some essential aspects of the companies' operation. 
Conditions are created for undervaluation of the Bulgarian 
contribution because the Bulgarian partner contributes its entire 
share right from the beginning, while the foreign partner 
contributes its share later and piecemeal, the feature says.  One 
possible way to solve the numerous problems of the joint ventures is 
to treat their formation as privatization.  This approach has been 
adopted in Hungary, Romania, and other countries, PARI recalls. 
(Sofia BTA in English 1127 GMT 21 Jan 94 AU) 
   1993 BUDGET CASH DEFICIT REPORTED:  The 1993 cash deficit totals 
32.223 billion leva, about 11 percent of Bulgaria's GDP, on which 
official statistics are not yet available.  Only 74.5 percent of 
taxes have been collected.  Financial institutions have paid a mere 
14.5 percent of due contributions, the BULGARSKI BIZNES weekly 
reports.  (Sofia BTA in English 1631 GMT 23 Jan 94 AU) 
   BALKAN SMALL, MEDIUM BUSINESS CENTER FORUM:  The General Assembly 
of the Balkan Center for Small and Medium-Sized Enterprises held its 
first session at the St. Konstantin resort near Varna.  It was 
attended by representatives of government organizations in charge of 
small and medium-sized businesses from Greece, Turkey, Albania, and 
Romania.  A statute and rules of procedure for the Bucharest-based 
Secretariat were signed.  The Balkan Center was set up in October 
1992.  Last June it was officially registered in Bucharest.  By the 
end of March, business training centers will be set up in 
Thessaloniki and Istanbul.  The General Assembly will hold its 
second session in Thessaloniki from March 14 to 20.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1631 GMT 23 Jan 94 AU) 
   LOANS FOR TOURISM-SECTOR BUSINESSES:  The Black Sea Investment 
Fund, Expressbank, and the Dobrudzha Bank-Dobrich will guarantee 
loans issued by the Bulgarian-American Fund to private hoteliers and 
tour operators.  Three-year loans of up to $75,000 at 15 percent 
interest will be available for feasible projects.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1631 GMT 23 Jan 94 AU) 
   PRIVATE KNITWEAR FACTORY OPENS:  The first private knitwear 
factory in this country set up with foreign capital has opened in 
Sofia.  The owner, Arman Tex of Cyprus, set up in 1993 with its head 
office in Sofia, has invested 5 million German marks so far.  The 
factory will use raw materials from China and Pakistan and will 
export its products to the United States and Western Europe.  (Sofia 
BTA in English 1631 GMT 23 Jan 94 AU) 
   ROVER CARS TO BE PRODUCED IN BULGARIA:  Philip Burney, Rover 
Group's director for Bulgaria, confirmed the company's decision to 
launch production in this country.  According to an investment 
project, several factories in northeastern Bulgaria will be making 
car parts, while the assembly will be carried out in Varna.  A Rover 
limousine, estate car, and van will be made in Bulgaria.  (Sofia BTA 
in English 1631 GMT 23 Jan 94 AU) 
   BURGAS PORT EXPANSION:  The Council of Ministers has considered a 
new general scheme for reconstructing Burgas Port.  Four new 
terminals will be built that will double the capacity of the harbor. 
The management gave the go-ahead to start building the important 
container terminal, which will cost 10 million leva.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1631 GMT 23 Jan 94 AU) 
   PIZZA HUT IN SOFIA:  The Pizza Hut chain will open its first 
outlet in Sofia this summer.  Pizza Hut International, a Pepsico 
affiliate, and Exel Associates, a Bulgarian investment group, have 
agreed to open 15 restaurants in Bulgaria.  (Sofia BTA in English 
1631 GMT 23 Jan 94 AU) 
   EXPERT PREDICTS 45 PERCENT INFLATION:  According to a report in 
DUMA on 25 January, Zakhari Karamfilov, director of the National 
Statistical Institute, predicts that inflation will be about 45 
percent in 1994.  Karamfilov expects that macroeconomic performance 
will be better this year than in 1993.  He predicts a zero decline 
in production this year, against 28 percent in 1992 and 8 percent in 
1993.  (Sofia BTA in English 1225 GMT 25 Jan 94 AU) 
   BANKERS DEMAND AMENDMENTS TO BAD DEBTS ACT:  Bulgarian banks have 
demanded amendments to the act transforming into public debt the 
nonperforming loans contracted by state-owned companies prior to 
December 31, 1990, 24 CHASA reported on 25 January.  The bankers say 
that because of this time limit they will lose billions of leva. 
Many of the bad debts incurred before the end of 1990 were later 
transformed into new loans and under the law will not be exchanged 
for bonds.  Banks that have lent funds to trading companies will get 
least money back.  (Sofia BTA in English 1225 GMT 25 Jan 94 AU) 
   LEV RISES ON FOREIGN EXCHANGE MARKET:  The Bulgarian lev has been 
rising on the interbank market, to 36.889-39.960 leva to the dollar 
on 24 January, up from between 37-39 leva during the previous week. 
The weakening of the national currency against the dollar last week 
caused tensions in the domestic foreign exchange market.  On 20 
January the central lev exchange rate hit a record low of 36.937 
leva to the dollar. 
   Meeting on 18 and 20 January, Prime Minister Lyuben Berov, Trade 
Minister Valentin Karabashev, Finance Minister Stoyan Aleksandrov, 
and central and large commercial bank leaders agreed to defend the 
lev.  The gentleman's agreement to cut the central rate by 0.20 leva 
a day succeeded in propping up the national currency, which began 
recovering on 21 January without much intervention by the Bulgarian 
National Bank.  As an additional measure to influence home market 
rates, the cabinet amended the exchange regulations on 24 January, 
obliging state-run companies to trade in foreign currency with 
commercial banks alone and not finance houses, brokerages, or forex 
offices.  According to a bank expert, the state-run companies 
reportedly stocked up on dollars to profit from the rising rate. 
flow through brokerages, he said. 
   The lev rate is expected to keep rising over the next few days, 
by as much as one lev, according to some traders.  Bank dealers said 
the dollar-buying spree is subsiding, but it is too early to predict 
a new margin of fluctuation in the short term.  If the central bank 
does not intervene, the rate could shoot up again.  (Sofia BTA in 
English 1853 GMT 25 Jan 94 AU) 
   NEW PRIVATE AIRLINE:  The new Air Zori private airline will 
airlift cargoes and organize business and tourist flights throughout 
the world.  Air Zori has rented three Il-18 planes from Russian and 
German private companies that will use the airport in Gorna 
Oryakhovitsa, central Bulgaria.  Last week this airport was 
authorized to handle international cargo and passenger flights by 
Bulgarian airlines.  (Sofia BTA in English 1209 GMT 26 Jan 94 AU) 
   CZECH REPUBLIC 
   PRICES RISE 18.7 PERCENT:  On 2 February, Prime Minister Vaclav 
Klaus officially announced that prices in the fourth quarter of 1993 
were 18.7 percent higher compared with the same period in 1992. 
This indicator is essential for wage regulation calculations. 
(Prague CTK in English 2 Feb 94 AU) 
   TAIWAN GRANTS MOST FAVORITE NATION STATUS:  The Taiwan Government 
has put the Czech Republic on the list of countries that were 
granted most favored nation status.  This status will help further 
open the Taiwan market to Czech exporters.  Czech exports to this 
country have tripled over the past three years and reached almost 
$44 million.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 2 Feb 94 p 1 AU) 
   FOREIGN CURRENCY RESERVES REACH $6.6 BILLION:  The development of 
foreign currency reserves in the banking system shows a tempo 
similar to that of the most dynamic periods last year.  This follows 
from information provided to HOSPODARSKE NOVINY by Ondrej Kvacek 
from the Ceska Narodni Banka (Czech National Bank) Press Department. 
In January, the level of foreign currency reserves in the banking 
system rose from $6.2 billion to $6.5 billion.  The Ceska Narodni 
Banka foreign currency reserves reached $4.1 billion, compared to 
$3.8 billion at the end of 1993.  In commercial banks, this level 
has remained at $2.4 billion.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 2 
Feb 94 p 2 AU) 
   AVERAGE WAGE RISES 24.5 PERCENT IN 1993:  The average wage in 
industry rose 24.5 percent in 1993.  This information was provided 
by Prime Minister Vaclav Klaus after a government meeting yesterday, 
1 February.  Foreign trade turnover increased significantly, the 
prime minister said.  Exports (excluding Slovakia) increased 20 
percent at current prices.  Adjusted for price increases, export 
growth amounts to 17.6 percent.  Imports increased 2.7 percent 
compared with 1992.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 2 Feb 94 p 
2 AU) 
   UNIVERSAL BANK OPENS PRAGUE BRANCH:  Universal Banka (Universal 
Bank), which is based in Usti nad Labem, has opened a branch on 
Lazarska street in Prague.  The total number of branches of this 
bank rose to five.  The banks is oriented toward entrepreneurial 
activity, but it also provides services to ordinary people.  (Prague 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 2 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 
   WATER PRICES UP IN PRAGUE:  As of 1 February, new prices for 
water apply in Prague.  The price has been fixed at 8.40 Czech 
Korunas (Kc) per cubic meter.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 2 
Feb 94 p 2 AU) 
   GERMAN FIRM TO BUILD PLANT IN ZDAR NM) SAZAVOU:  The German firm 
Hetich will build a modern plant for manufacturing furniture and 
office equipment in Zdar nad Sazavou.  The plant will start 
operating in the second half of 1995 and employ more than 200 
people.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 2 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 
   COSMETICS MAKER TO EXPAND PRODUCTION:  "By 1996, our present 
production capacities should increase by almost 80 percent.  The 
existing production capacity is fully utilized, and demand is 
increasing constantly," Pavel Kubec, executive director of Dermacol 
Praha says.  This company manufactures cosmetics products.  Most of 
the production, about 72 percent, is designated for the domestic 
market, the rest is exported to Poland, followed by Slovenia, 
Germany, Russia, and Mongolia.  The management expects export volume 
to increase by 35 to 40 percent within three years.  (Prague 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 2 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 
   MINISTER CONFIDENT BAVARIA WILL ACCEPT PIPELINE GUARANTEE:  The 
Bavarian Land Government has responded favorably to the Czech 
proposal for a guarantee of the Ingolstadt Oil Pipeline project, 
Czech Minister of Industry and Trade Vladimir Dlouhy told 
correspondents today in reference to a telephone conversation he had 
on 1 February with Bavarian Economics Minister Otto Wiesheu.  The 
Czech proposal constitutes an 80 million German mark (DM) guarantee 
covering uninsurable and extraordinary damage to the pipeline (as a 
result of terrorist action, natural catastrophe, or war).  The Czech 
National Property Fund (FNM) would provide the guarantee. 
   The ministers agreed two days ago that experts would continue to 
discuss the guarantee next week, by then, the Bavarian side is 
expected to make known its position on the new Czech proposal.  The 
fact that they have already requested the FNM's detailed financial 
profile is a sign that the Bavarian Government is viewing the 
proposal favorably, Dlouhy said.  If the Bavarian side accepts the 
latest Czech proposal, the guarantee could be approved by Bavarian 
Parliament as early as in the spring, which will allow the pipeline 
construction to commence shortly thereafter.  Construction of the 
pipeline from the Bavarian town of Ingolstadt to Nelahozeves near 
Kralupy in central Bohemia began in the Czech Republic in September. 
Construction of the pipeline in Germany was expected to begin this 
spring.  The entire project should be completed in 1995, unless it 
is rejected by the Bavarian Parliament.  (Prague CTK in English 3 
Feb 94 AU) 
   BANK FACES BANKRUPTCY PROCEEDINGS:  The Kreditni a Prumyslova 
Banka (Credit and Industrial Bank), based in Prague, will have to 
file for bankruptcy.  The bank was established in April 1992; its 
founding capital was 550 million Czech crowns (Kc).  In the first 
year of its existence, the bank expanded its loan activities.  The 
bank did not have skillful management, Ceska Narodni Banka Vice 
Governor Jan Vit said yesterday.  Having consulted creditors, Ceska 
Narodni Banka proposed launching bankruptcy proceedings.  (Prague 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 3 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 
   GERMANY'S SCHOELLER TO ACQUIRE MAJORITY IN STROJPLAST:  The 
German firm Schoeller Plast Holding will acquire 51 percent of 
Strojplast in Tachov, one of the largest manufacturers of plastics. 
Schoeller will become the owner of property worth Kc1OO million. 
Strojplast processes 8,000 tons of plastics and employs 640 people. 
Last year, the company's turnover was Kc496 million and it made a 
net profit of Kc28 million.  Some 17 percent of the production was 
sold on Western markets.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 3 Feb 
94 p 6 AU) 
   ELITEX TEXTILE MACHINES TO ASIA, SOUTH AMERICA:  The state-owned 
company Elitex has solved the problem that arose after its exports 
to the Soviet Union were discontinued.  The company, which exported 
some 90 percent of its production to the Soviet Union, began 
exporting to Southeast Asia and South America.  Elitex offers 
textile machines of the Arachne type, which are in demand in 
Southeast Asia and South America.  Because of the low production 
costs in the Czech Republic, the textile machines are more 
competitive on these markets than German, Italian, or Japanese-made 
machines.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 3 Feb 94 p 6 AU) 
   900 MHZ-BAND MOBILE TELEPHONE SYSTEM TO BE INTRODUCED:  The Czech 
Republic is to introduce a progressive digital system of mobile 
telephones operating in the 9OO MHz band.  Besides providing 
additional services, this system is compatible with the systems used 
in other European countries.  People from other countries will be 
able to use their phones in the Czech Republic.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY in Czech 3 Feb 94 p 7 AU) 
   SELLIER, BELLOT TO REMAIN IN CZECH HANDS:  The two components of 
the name of the company are the only things foreign about the 
Sellier and Bellot Company.  Jiri Hanak, chairman of the board of 
directors, stresses that the company does not need foreign capital. 
"We have received so many orders that our production capacities are 
not able to cope with them all.  We can profit from the situation in 
which many European ammunition manufacturers are undergoing a 
crisis," he explains.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 3 Feb 94 p 
10 AU) 
   PALABA SLANY TO REINVEST 1993 PROFITS:  The Palaba Slany company, 
a manufacturer of household batteries, does not anticipate paying 
out dividends to shareholders from its 1993 profits.  Palaba Slany 
is the legal successor of the Bateria Slany company (the change of 
name was approved last year).  In 1993, the company made a profit of 
over Kc10 million, but all profits will be reinvested.  (Prague 
MLADA FRONTA DNES 3 Feb 94 p 10 AU) 
   PRECISION ENGINEERING FIRM'S SHARES UNDERVALUED:  Zavody Presneho 
Strojirenstvi (Precision Engineering Plants) stock is undervalued on 
the Czech market.  The company is based in Zlin.  This is what CS 
First Boston says in a report to investors.  The report says that 
Zavody Presneho Strojirenstvi in Zlin offer quality products for a 
good price on foreign markets.  According to the report, the company 
is not one of the Czech blue chips, but it certainly deserves 
attention.  At the price of Kc1,215 attained on the Prague stock 
exchange on 27 January, the price-to-earning ratio of this company 
is 12.7.  This makes this stock cheap, since the average price-to- 
earning ratio on the Czech market is about 20.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA 
DNES 3 Feb 94 p 13 AU) 
   SIEMENS TO BUY MEZ MOHELNICE PLANTS:  The German company Siemens 
is to buy three Moravske Elektotechnicke Zavody (Moravian Electrical 
Appliances Plants) factories in Mohelnice, Frenstat pod Radhostem, 
and Drasova.  This is what Katerina Petrova, spokeswoman for the 
Ministry for the Administration of National Property and 
Privatization said on 2 February.  The Ministry has already reached 
agreement with the German partner on the terms of the sale.  (Prague 
MLADA FRONTA DNES 3 Feb 94 p 13 AU) 
   INDUSTRIAL WAGES RISE 24 PERCENT IN 1993:  The average monthly 
salary in industry was Kc5,992 in 1993, while in December this 
figure reached Kc6,923, according to data provided by the Czech 
Statistical Office.  The average salary rose by 24 percent.  (Prague 
MLADA FRONTA DNES 3 Feb 94 p 13 AU) 
   NUMBER OF LEGALLY WORKING FOREIGNERS:  As of 31 December 1993, 
there were 28,281 foreigners working legally in the Czech Republic, 
48 fewer than on 30 September 1993.  (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY 3 Feb 94 
p 2 AU) 
   CLOSING CEFTA DECLARATION SIGNED:   The signing of a closing 
declaration of the Central European Free Trade Agreement (CEFTA), 
which stipulates the efforts and convictions of the participants to 
ensure liberalization of trade within five years, marked the end of 
a joint session of delegations from four Central European Countries 
in Prague today.  The economics ministers of the CEFTA countries, 
Bela Kadar of Hungary, Leslaw Podkanski of Poland, Jan Ducky of 
Slovakia, and the Czech Republic's Vladimir Dlouhy told journalists 
they attached great significance to the agreement.  They especially 
stressed the fact that the changeover to liberalizing Central 
European trade was occurring at a time when important trade 
agreements worldwide were being concluded, examples including NAFTA 
and the Uruguay Round of GATT.  Liberalization will not apply to 
certain problem groups, particularly agriculture, they said.  It 
will also proceed more slowly with a number of "sensitive goods," 
such as automobiles, textile, and metals.  (Prague CTK in English 4 
Feb 94 AU) 
   SWISS PROGRAMS FOR ENTREPRENEURS:  Since 1991, more than 60 small 
entrepreneurs from the Czech and Slovak Republics have acquired 
experience in Swiss Government programs organized by the Zurich 
Chamber of Trade and the Czech and Slovak Association of 
Entrepreneurs.  There are another 40 future entrepreneurs in 
Switzerland at the moment, and it is expected that by the end of 
1995 a further 100 people will take part in the program.  The 
project will continue after 1996, but with certain changes that are 
currently being discussed.  (Prague CTK in English 5 Feb 94 AU) 
   CONSUMER PRICES GREW 18.2 PERCENT IN 1993:  Consumer prices grew 
18.2 percent in the Czech Republic from December 1992 to December 
1993, according to the latest information CTK received on 7 February 
from the Czech Statistical Office.  The 1993 average was 20.8 
percent higher than the 1992 average.  Taking into account basic 
groups of goods, the prices for food products rose by 16.6 percent, 
and prices for non-food consumer goods by 19.4 percent.  These two 
are the most important groups, having the greatest impact on the 
overall price level.  Prices for public catering increased by 27.5 
percent and those for services by 28.7 percent. 
   Since the beginning of 1993, the cost of living has increased by 
18.2 percent in the households of employees, while in farmers' 
households it grew by 18 percent, and in those of pensioners 16.4 
percent.  When comparing the 1993 average with the 1992 average, the 
cost of living in the households of white-collar workers increased 
by 20.8 percent, in farmer's households by 20 percent, and in those 
of pensioners by 19.5 percent.  When comparing December with 
November 1993, the costs of living in the households of white-collar 
workers and pensioners grew 0.9 percent, while in farmers' 
households by 0.8 percent.  (Prague CTK in English 7 Feb 94 AU) 
   LOW PRODUCTION COSTS MAKE PRODUCTS COMPETITIVE IN WEST:  Czech 
Trade and Industry Minister Vladimir Dlouhy said today that the 
Czech Republic's low production costs make Czech products 
competitive on Western markets.  Addressing German businessmen and 
politicians in Sankt Augustin, the seat of the Konrad Adenauer 
Foundation, Dlouhy said the cheap labor force was one of the major 
factors positively influencing economic reform in the Czech Republic 
and the main reason for Czech exports being successful.  He 
dismissed claims by Western firms that the Czechs exported their 
goods at dumping prices.  Dlouhy said he appreciated cooperation 
with Germany, the Czech Republic's most important trade partner. 
Germany is the most flexible country in both investing and setting 
up joint ventures, he said, adding that of the total number of joint 
ventures in the Czech Republic about 30 percent had been established 
with German companies.  (Prague CTK in English 8 Feb 94 AU) 
   CZECH CURRENCY TRADED ON BLACK MARKET IN SLOVAKIA:  A year after 
the split of Czechoslovakia, the growing demand for Czech currency 
has turned it into a valued article on the black market, the Czech 
daily MLADA FRONTA DNES writes on 8 February, describing the 
situation in the regional town of Cadca.  Cadca lies near the Czech 
border and Ostrava, north Moravia, the center of a mining and 
industrial region from where many Slovaks commute to work, returning 
for weekends.  Illegal money changers, who buy and sell foreign 
currency on the street, say that the trade in Czech money brings 
more profit than trade in dollars or German marks, the paper writes. 
Czech currency is finding its way into common use, especially in the 
border regions.  Waiters in restaurants accept Czech money from 
customers but return Slovak change.  (Prague CTK in English 8 Feb 94 
AU) 
   INVESTMENT FUNDS RUN LARGEST ADVERTISING CAMPAIGN:  The 
advertising campaign launched by investment funds before the second 
wave of coupon privatization has been the largest advertising 
campaign ever launched in the Czech Republic.  Over half a billion 
Czech korunas (Kc) ($17.2 million) were spent on advertisements in 
all branches of the media between October 1993, when the campaign 
was launched, and the end of the year.  Total expenses are likely to 
be even higher, as the campaign is to run until February.  (Prague 
CTK in English 17 Jan 94 AU) 
   PRIVATIZATION MINISTRY TO EXIST UNTIL 1996:  According to 
ministry of privatization spokesman, the ministry will wind up 
before parliamentary election in 1996.  The usefulness of the 
ministry has diminished, since 90 percent of the property designated 
for privatization has been transferred to the National Property 
Fund.  "The ministry is dealing will all the claims linked to the 
first, as well as the second wave of privatization, which is coming 
to an end," the spokesman said.  By the end of 1993, property worth 
Kc850 billion had changed hands.  The ministry estimates the income 
from small and large privatization to amount to between Kc52 billion 
and Kc54 billion.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 18 Jan p 14 AU) 
   GOVERNMENT INJECTS MONEY INTO KONSOLIDACNI BANRA:  The Czech 
Government today approved the allocation of more than Kc15 billion 
($5OO million) from the National Property Fund (FNM) to Konsolidacni 
Banka (Consolidation Bank) in Prague to boost its reserve fund. 
This is what Prime Minister Vaclav Klaus told reporters.  According 
to Klaus, the first task of Konsolidacni Banka after its founding in 
the spring of 1991 was to reduce the load on other commercial banks 
and on firms with outstanding debts.  Since then, Konsolidacni Banka 
has demonstrated its viability and long-term ability to compete and 
gained a stable position in the republic's banking sector, Klaus 
said.  Konsolidacni Banka is a state financial institution, to which 
many outstanding debts have been transferred.  Because of the non- 
recoverable nature of these debts, the bank's reserves needed to be 
increased.  (Prague CTK in English 19 Jan 94 AU) 
   CUTBACK IN POTATO CULTIVATION:  To combat the potato glut, the 
Presidium of the Central Union of Potato Growers recommended that 
potato growers reduce the area planted with potatoes to 90,000 
hectares in 1994, compared with almost 105,000 hectares last year. 
As a result, 40,000 tons of seed potatoes have remained unsold in 
the Czech Republic.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 20 Jan 
94 p 1 AU) 
   ENVIRONMENT MINISTER WORRIED ABOUT RAW MATERIAL EXPORTS:  Curbing 
the alarming increase in the extraction and exports of raw materials 
is one of the top priority tasks of the Environment Ministry, 
Minister Frantisek Benda told CTK on 20 January.  According to 
Benda, the ministry will seek ways of stopping the current 
situation.  This situation has arisen due to lax border checks and 
due to the fact that some raw materials are exported as construction 
supplies.  Benda said that raw materials should not be extracted 
above certain limits.  The extraction should be scaled down to 
satisfy the most urgent economic needs only.  The environment 
ministry' objective was to reach a compromise during the talks with 
Vladimir Dlouhy, minister of industry and trade, on reducing export 
quotas, Benda said.  According to the data on foreign trade in raw 
materials compiled by the Ministry of Industry and Trade and 
furnished by the Green Party to CTK, only 89,000 tons of limestone 
were exported in 1989, while the figure rose to 2,362,000 tons in 
1992.  A similar increase was recorded in stone dust, sand, and 
lumber, the ministry's report reveals.  (Prague CTK in English 20 
Jan 94 AU) 
   RESUMPTION OF TALKS WITH AIR FRANCE ON CSA:  Negotiations between 
Czech Transport Minister Jan Strasky and Air France representatives 
on the possible sale of Air France's shares in the CSA are to take 
place next week at the latest, Strasky said on 27 January.  He added 
that the sale of the shares would be "neither a sensation nor a 
tragedy for the Czech side.  However, neither would it be a solution 
to CSA's problems, though the negotiations will be the first step 
toward reaching an agreement with Air France," he said.   In his 
letter of January 7 to Air France, Strasky proposed that the shares 
be sold to a Czech entity.  The Czech side has proposed that 
Konsolidacni Banka purchase the shares, but any proposal submitted 
by the French side will be considered.  (Prague CTK 27 in English 
Jan 94 AU) 
   AIR FRANCE REPRESENTATIVE ON CSA PROBLEMS:  The probable sale of 
the CSA's shares is likely to harm Air France, a representative of 
the Public Relations Department of the French Airlines said in Paris 
on 28 January.  "If our Czech partners refuse to cooperate, Air 
France cannot force them to," the representative said in reply to 
Transportation Minister Jan Strasky's request on 27 January that Air 
France sell its shares by the end of February.  It is CSA, not Air 
France, that wants to break the 1992 agreement and have the French 
company sell its 19.1-percent share in the company, the 
representative emphasized.  He added that the final decision must 
take this fact into account, particularly when the issue of money is 
addressed. 
   The French company expected both airlines to benefit from 
cooperation.  "The probable divorce of CSA and Air France will 
certainly not help the French company, which is now experiencing 
financial difficulties.  At the very least, its reputation will be 
harmed," the Air France representative said.  He went on to say that 
the CSA management was responsible for CSA's problems, and now the 
Czech side was seeking the culprit elsewhere.  He also said that the 
French had pointed out early on that CSA's main difficulties were 
the result of bad management and the financially disadvantageous 
purchase of airplanes before signing the contract with Air France. 
The representative confirmed that Air France would participate in 
next week's negotiations.  (Prague CTK in English 28 Jan 94 AU) 
   NUMBER OF BUSINESS LICENSES RISES 33 PERCENT IN 1993:   The 
Number of individuals and organizations holding business licenses 
increased sharply by 33 percent in 1993, compared with 1992, 
Minister of Economy Karel Dyba announced today.  A total of 877,000 
companies and private businessmen held at least one business license 
at the end of 1993, Dyba said.  A total of 1.26 million licenses 
have been registered.  Dyba said the increase appeared all over the 
country, and made a remark saying that the number of business 
licenses issued in a district was indirectly proportional to that 
district's unemployment rate.  The minister also pointed out that 
small and medium-size industrial and construction firms were 
increasingly adding to the country's overall production and 
employment.  (Prague CTK in English 24 Jan 94 AU) 
   KC12 BILLION FOR SMALL, MEDIUM-SIZED BUSINESSES IN 1993:  More 
than Kc12 billion ($400 million) from the state budget was allocated 
for the support of small and medium-sized businesses in 1993, 
Minister of Economy Karel Dyba announced on 24 January.  The amount 
is equal to about 1.7 percent of the Czech Republic's 1993 gross 
domestic product.  More than half of the amount, Kc7.5 billion, came 
in the form of tax breaks granted by the Finance Ministry, Dyba 
said.  The Ministry of Agriculture provided Kc2.8 billion, the 
Ministry of Economy Kc1.2 billion, and the Ministry of Labor and 
Social Affairs Kc178 million.  The Ministry of Economy's support was 
granted primarily in the form of government-approved programs 
through the Ceskomoravska Zarucni a Rozvojova Banka (Czech-Moravian 
Guarantee and Development Bank) and other financial institutions. 
Ten programs have been approved for 1994, Dyba said.  (Prague CTK in 
English 24 Jan 94 AU) 
   OIL SUPPLY RESUMPTION HALTS DRAWDOWN OF RESERVES:  The resumption 
of the Russian oil supply to the Chemopetrol refinery in Litvinov, 
north Bohemia, on 22 January has halted the decline of its very low 
levels of reserves, the director of Chemopetrol's trade policy, 
Lubos Kyselo, stated 23 January.  He said that in the next few days 
reserves would begin to be replenished.  According to Kyselo, a 
similar fluctuation in the supply of Russian oil was usual at the 
beginning of the year.  This year's interruption in supply was 
unusually long, however, and caused production in the Litvinov plant 
to fall by a third.  This did not affect the supply of fuel and 
heating oil, he said, and Chemopetrol also managed to secure the 
necessary supplies of products to other enterprises.  (Prague CTK in 
English 24 Jan 94 AU) 
   GASOLINE PRICE CEILING ELIMINATED:  The Finance Ministry has 
decided to abolish the cap on gasoline prices as of 1 February. 
However, this does not mean a complete liberalization of gas prices. 
As a matter of fact, prices will still be regulated by the state. 
Merchants will fix the prices, and the state will only check whether 
they are economically justified.  (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY in Czech 25 
Jan p 1 AU) 
   MINISTRY RECONSIDERS, RETAINS GASOLINE PRICE CEILING:  After 
preliminary research, the Finance Ministry abandoned it plan to 
abolish fixing maximum prices for gasoline.  This information was 
provided by Czech Television on 31 January.  The ministry justified 
this step by saying that "it is necessary to find a proper deadline, 
so as to avoid a massive increase in gas prices."  It is realistic 
to expect that maximum gas prices will be abolished before the 
summer season.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 1 Feb 94 AU) 
   FREE TRADE ZONE DISCUSSED WITH ROMANIA:  An initial meeting of 
experts on the planned establishment of a free trade zone between 
the Czech Republic and Romania took place in Prague on 24 and 25 
January, according to Milos Rezek of the Ministry of Trade and 
Industry.  Rezek said that experts from the Czech and Romanian 
Ministries of Trade discussed political and economic conditions in 
both countries -- the starting point for negotiating a free trade 
zone agreement.  They also discussed last years' trade results and 
possible ways of settling the former Czechoslovakia's trade surplus 
in Russian rubles.  In November 1993, it was decided that a free 
trade zone agreement between the Czech Republic and Romania should 
be signed by September 30, 1994.  Negotiations will continue in 
February.  (Prague CTK in English 25 Jan 94 AU) 
   CONVERSION OF TEMELIN TO GAS-FIRED PLANT UNLIKELY:  Turning the 
Temelin nuclear power plant being constructed in south Bohemia into 
a natural-gas-fired plant, as suggested by  a member of Austria's 
opposition party, would be costly and difficult, a Czech university 
professor says.  Jiri Fleischhans, deputy director of the Nuclear 
and Physical Engineering Faculty at the Czech Technical University, 
said experts have already pondered over the problem.  However, 80 
percent of the completed structure would have to remain unused.  Gas 
to run the plant would require the entire capacity of a standard 
pipeline.  A strategic decision of whether to rely on one supplier 
for such a source of power would also have to be taken.  Fleischhans 
said that a large gas-fired plant would likely be more efficient and 
would thus release about one-third less steam, which is believed to 
cause global warming.  On the other hand, emissions of carbon 
dioxide would be greater.  He noted that cost estimates are not 
available for a project of this size.  Temelin is expected to be put 
into operation between 1996 and 1997.  The Austrian Press Agency 
(APA) reported that a spokesperson for Austria's opposition Free 
Party, Peter Rosenstingel, called on the country's president to make 
it clear to the Czech Republic that it would resort to sanctions if 
necessary.  (Prague CTK in English 25 Jan 94 AU) 
   CZECH INVESTMENTS ABROAD GROWING:  Direct Czech investments 
abroad reached $45.2 million in 1993.  This information has been 
provided by the director of the Ceska Narodni Banka (Czech National 
Bank) Director Jiri Zimola.  According to him, the activity of Czech 
enterprises has sharply increased compared with previous years.  In 
1992, $28 million were invested abroad and in 1991 only $3 million. 
The largest investors were Skoda Mlada Boleslav (Great Britain), 
Cementarny a Vapenky Prachovice (Netherlands), Invest Plzen 
(Russia), Strojimport (Austria), CSKD Intrans (Slovakia), Namorni 
Plavba (Malta), and Prumysl Kamene Brno (Croatia).  The largest 
investments were placed in Malta (28.4 percent), Russia (16.0 
percent), Great Britain (10.3 percent), Slovakia (12.7 percent) and 
other countries (26.5 percent).  The absolute majority of 
investments have been placed in trade and services.  (Prague 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 26 Jan 94 p 1 AU) 
   FRENCH FIRM BUYS 90 PERCENT OF ELEKTROPRISTROJ:  French 
Telemecanique, one of the three important companies of the Groupe 
Schneider, has bought 90 percent of the Elektropristroj (Electrical 
Devices) Pisek company for Kc12O million (without land and buildings 
belonging to the city of Pisek).  Telemecanique has become the 
majority shareholder in Elektropristroj.  The company will keep its 
logo but will add the Groupe Schneider sign to it.  (Prague LIDOVE 
NOVINY, FINANCNI NOVINY SUPPLEMENT, in Czech 26 Jan 94 p 8 AU) 
   KRALOVOPOLSKA BRNO FACES FINANCIAL PROBLEMS:  The discontinuation 
of the construction of the Mochovce nuclear power station has caused 
problems to one of the largest suppliers of technology -- 
Kralovopolska Brno.  The company has supplied work worth Kc1.2 
billion, and there is still work outstanding for Kc1.05 billion. 
According to the director general of the company, the material 
supplies to the Mochovce power plant alone represent Kc400 million. 
Moreover, the company has to put up with the consequences of not 
having met its obligation toward its own suppliers.  For instance, 
the German partner who was to deliver pumps worth Kc90 million, is 
claiming penalties amounting to 80,000 German marks per month. 
(Prague LIDOVE NOVINY, FINANCNI NOVINY SUPPLEMENT, in Czech 26 Jan 
94 p 8 AU) 
   ZBROJOVKA VSETIN TO RESUME MACHINE-GUN PRODUCTION:  Zbrojovka 
Vsetin (Vsetin Arms Factory) will produce 250 Type 59 machine guns 
worth Kc25 million.  The decision to restart the production of 
machine guns, which have not been produced in Vsetin for at least 20 
years, was made at the end of 1991, when the factory had to produce 
a certain number of these guns for our army in a short period of 
time.  After machine-gun production is resumed, the factory will 
replace the Type 59, which is 35 years old with a new, more modern 
type.  Apart from deliveries to our army, machine guns will also be 
exported.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 27 Jan 94 p 27 AU) 
   FOREST PROPERTY RESTITUTIONS TO INDIVIDUALS:  Approximately 70 
percent of the 145,000 applications by individuals for restitution 
of forest property in the Czech Republic have been settled, though 
compensation remains a problem, the director of the Lesy forest 
management enterprise, Jiri Oliva, said at a news conference today. 
The Czech Republic has 2.6 million hectares of forests, of which 20 
percent are to be owned by individuals and less than 20 percent by 
municipalities.  They are entitled to take over 410,000 hectares of 
forests, though 160,000 hectares have not yet been claimed, Oliva 
pointed out.  Six percent of the forest lands is to go to churches 
-- something that has not yet been carried out, Oliva said.  Around 
54 percent of forests are to remain in the hands of the state, he 
added.  (Prague CTK in English 27 Jan 94 AU) 
   ARMS DEALS UP IN 1993:  The Ministry of Industry and Trade 
granted 366 licenses for trade in military equipment and material 
last year, according to a 28 January statement by Bretislav Gregr, 
the ministry's senior official.  The number consists of 198 licenses 
granted for import from 19 countries and 258 for exports to 52 
countries, involving 23 European states, 12 Asian, 7 African, 5 
Central and North American and 5 South American, Gregr announced. 
In line with legal standards, the ministry removed three licenses 
already granted and turned down 15 license applications.  A total of 
35 companies were involved in trade in military equipment, Gregr 
said.  The total value of exports was $167 million, 17 million more 
than the figure for Czechoslovakia in 1992, Gregr reported.  The 
structure of the exported material has markedly changed:  while in 
1992 the exports included ground mobile equipment, particularly the 
T-72 tanks sold to Syria, last year the bulk of the exports was 
aviation technology, particularly L-59 aircraft along with spare 
parts exported to Egypt, Gregr announced.  In comparison with 1992, 
the proportion of infantry weapons increased, largely due to the 
export of the CZ-75 pistols to Turkey.  The export of mobile ground 
equipment (vehicles) was largely made up of supplies of spare parts 
for the armored equipment sold earlier and partly of the special 
vehicles on Tatra chassis.  (Prague CTK in English 28 Jan 94 AU) 
   KLAUS ON KORUNA CONVERTIBILITY:  Full Convertibility for the 
Czech korunas is not necessary as yet, Czech Prime Minister Vaclav 
Klaus announced at the World Economic Forum in Davos, Switzerland, 
on 28 January.  He pointed out that the Czech koruna became 
convertible three years ago for the purposes of foreign trade and 
the currency has retained a stable exchange rate for 37 months now. 
"We do not believe that by transferring to full convertibility five 
years after the velvet revolution (the toppling of the communist 
regime) we will gain anything particularly positive, Klaus was 
quoted as saying.  The government has rejected a plan proposed by 
the Czech National Bank whereby the Czech koruna could become fully 
convertible in January 1995.  Instead it favors a gradual 
liberalization of the currency regime with other countries.  (Prague 
CTK in English 28 Jan 94 AU) 
   CZECH KORUNA TO BE FULLY CONVERTIBLE BY 1997:  The Czech koruna 
will be fully convertible in 1997, at the latest.  It will be 
necessary to take gradual steps toward this goal, Finance Minister 
Ivan Kocarnik told a rally of the ruling Civic Democratic Party 
today.  He said that the interest rates of the Czech banks would go 
down fast since this trend has been stimulated by the inflow of 
foreign investments and the offer of credits by foreign banks.  This 
is a result of the fact that the world has found that the Czech 
Republic is a consolidated state with a stable economic and 
political situation, he added.  (Prague CTK in English 31 Jan 94 AU) 
   KATERINA MINE IN RADVANICE TO BE CLOSED:  The extraction of coal 
in the Katerina mine in Radvanice in the east Bohemian coal-mining 
region will be terminated at the end of the first quarter.  Ceske 
Energeticke Zavody has not extended their contract with Vychodoceske 
Uhelne Doly (East Bohemian Coal Mines) to purchase coal for the 
power station in Porici u Trutnova.  Some 8OO people in the 
Radvanice mine will be laid off.  (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY in Czech p 8 
28 Jan 94 AU) 
   EBRD TO BUY ONE-QUARTER OF BARUM-CONTINENTAL:  The German partner 
of the Barum company, Continental, will transfer a part of its stake 
in Barum-Continental to the European Bank for Reconstruction and 
Development (EBRD).  Peter Zitek, chairman of the Barum-Continental 
Executive Committee said on 28 January that the bank had promised to 
supply a loan amounting to 70 million German marks to the company. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 29 Jan 94 p 6 AU) 
   WASTE-PROCESSING ENTERPRISES FACE BANKRUPTCY:  Enterprises 
processing waste materials are on the brink of bankruptcy following 
the imposition of  radical restrictions on the import of waste 
materials from abroad.  The Ministry of Environment Spokesman, Jiri 
Hampejz, says that about 10 or 20 enterprises are prepared to launch 
a lawsuit against the ministry.  The ministry believes, however, 
that about 50 of the companies facing bankruptcy are themselves to 
blame for the situation since they started processing waste material 
without having proper technology available for sorting the waste. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 31 Jan p 2 AU) 
   CITY OF SMRZOVKA ISSUES BONDS:  The city of Smrzovka has issued 
bonds amounting to Kc200 million.  The bonds will mature in 2001. 
They have been issued in the denomination of Kc1O,0OO and will bring 
in interest of 14.24 percent per annum.  The bonds are sold by Ceska 
Sporitelna (Czech Savings Bank).  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES in Czech 
31 Jan p 3 AU) 
   CABLE TELEVISION FOR PRAGUE, BRNO:  The Council for Radio and 
Television Broadcast has granted a license to Kabel Net Holding for 
installing MMDS-system cable television in Prague District 4 and 
Brno.  This system allows the signal to be transmitted though the 
air.  (Prague CESKY DENIK in Czech 31 Jan p 2 AU) 
   AUSTRIAN CREDITANSTALT TRADES IN CZECH CALL WARRANTS:  Austrian 
Creditanstalt, the largest bank in Austria, has been successfully 
trading in call warrants based on a basket of shares of nine Czech 
companies.  There is quite substantial interest in the warrants. 
The greatest weight in the basket is contributed by Ceske 
Energeticke Zavody (25 percent), Cokoladovny (15 percent), Komercni 
Banka (14 percent) and Tabak (13 percent).  (Prague HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY, BURZOVNI NOVINY SUPPLEMENT, in Czech 31 Jan p 1 AU) 
   FOREIGN TRADE TURNOVER FIGURES GIVEN:  The Czech Republic's 
foreign trade turnover was 10.6 percent higher in 1993 than in 1992, 
according to the preliminary results of a Czech Statistical Office 
study.  Czech imports increased by 2.7 percent and exports by 20.0 
percent last year.  The only countries with whom Czech trade 
decreased were those of the former Soviet Union.  Czech Republic 
exports to and imports from other countries increased.  A total of 
58.0 percent of Czech trade in 1993 was concluded with countries 
with advanced economies, while 8.7 percent was exchanged with former 
members of the Soviet Union, and 6.1 percent with other Eastern 
European countries undergoing economic transformation.  The Czech 
Republic's trade surplus was Kc5.9 billion ($200 million) last year. 
The largest surplus was recorded in trade with developing countries 
(Kc13.6 billion, $453 million), while the surplus with European 
Union countries was Kc7.5 billion ($250 million).  The Czech 
Republic's largest trade deficit was with countries of the former 
Soviet Union (Kc19.8 billion, $66O million).  Czech trade with 
Slovakia reached a surplus of Kc9.6 billion (Kc320 million).  Prague 
CTK in English 31 Jan 94 AU) 
   SKODA HAS STOCKPILE OF NEARLY 12,000 CARS:  The are some 11,800 
Skoda cars in stock in the Czech Republic.  This is what Milan 
Smutny from the Mlada Boleslav Automobile Plant Public Relations 
Department told a CTK reporter.  "This inventory allows us to react 
promptly to customer demand" he said.  The Skoda plant produced some 
200,000 cars last year, since demand for Skoda cars rose sharply in 
1993.  (Prague RUDE PRAVO in Czech 31 Jan 94 AU) 
   SKODA DIESEL PLANT FACES ECONOMIC PROBLEMS:  Three years ago, 
Skoda Diesel, manufacturer of Diesel motors, was one of the 
enterprises achieving the best economic results.  At that time, the 
plant was delivering diesel locomotive parts to the CIS.  Later on, 
however, payments for deliveries were stopped.  Currently, the debt 
amounts to Kc140 million.  Despite the fact that the management took 
steps to restructure production, the loss in 1993 was about Kc200 
million.  Since 1989, when the company employed 1,622 people, the 
number of employees has been gradually reduced to the current 600. 
Most of the company's output was exported to Peru.  (Prague 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 1 Feb 94 AU) 
   SKODA PLZEN ELECTRIC CAR PROTOTYPE:  A prototype of a two- 
passenger electric vehicle was on display at the  Skoda Plzen 
factory in Ejpovice.  The car can travel a distance of 80 kilometers 
per recharge, which takes 8 hours and uses 8 Czech korunas-worth of 
electricity.  (Prague RUDE PRAVO in Czech 27 Dec 93 p 6 AU) 
   UNRECOVERABLE AGRICULTURE LOANS:  Banks have provided loans 
totaling 24.6 billion Czech korunas (Kc) to Czech agriculture.  This 
sum represents 3.7 percent of all loans by the banks.  Of the 
agriculture loans, Kc11.2 billion are categorized as bad and 
temporarily unrecoverable.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Czech 27 
Dec 93 p 1 AU) 
   NOVEMBER FOREIGN TRADE SURPLUS:  According to the Czech 
Statistical Office's preliminary data, there was a surplus of Kc8.1 
billion in the foreign trade balance in November.  Exports reached 
Kc332.6 billion and imports Kc324.5 billion.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY in Czech 27 Dec 93 p 1 AU) 
   KOLORA SEMILY TEXTILE FIRM SPLIT:  On the basis of its 
privatization plan, the Kolora Semily company has been divided into 
three parts.  Two shareholders' companies, Kolora and Hybler, have 
been established.  Factories belonging to the third group have been 
returned to their original owners or sold.  The production process 
used in the factories requires close cooperation between Kolora and 
Hybler.  Kolora Semily mainly exports textile products to 
Scandinavia, Germany, and France.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in 
Czech 28 Dec 93 p 6 AU) 
   FOREIGN INVESTMENT IN EASTERN EUROPE:  The influx of foreign 
capital into Eastern Europe reached $16.6 billion.  This information 
was provided by the Austrian Ministry of Economy in Vienna.  Thirty- 
eight percent of that sum went to Hungary and 15 percent to the 
former CSFR.  In the first half of 1993, $580 million were invested 
in Hungary and $380 million in the CSFR.  Of the latter, $290 
million was invested Czech Republic.  There were 80,000 companies 
with foreign participation in the Czech Republic in the first half 
of 1993.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 30 Dec 93 p 1 AU) 
   CONTINUED SUGAR SURPLUS:  There is a surplus of 200,000 tons of 
sugar on the domestic market.  This is one of the reasons the 
domestic sugar market has collapsed, and producers are selling sugar 
for less than the cost of production.  To help the situation, sugar 
is being exported, mostly to the former Soviet Union.  So far, 
60,000 tons of sugar have been exported at a price of $310 per ton. 
It is realistic to expect that the whole of the surplus will be 
exported.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 30 Dec 93 p 1 AU) 
   INDUSTRIAL SECTOR EMPLOYMENT DECLINING:  Production in the 
industrial sector has reached 92.3 percent of the 1992 level.  The 
number of employees declined to 1,416,000, that is, 93.8 percent of 
the 1992 level.  This information was provided by Czech Statistical 
Office.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 30 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 
   KRALUV DVUR CEMENT PLANT TAKEN OVER BY GERMAN PARTNER:  The 
German company Heidelberger Zement AG, has acquired all the shares 
of the Cement Factory in Kraluv Dvur (KDC).  The German partner 
increased its stake in KDC from the existing 40 percent to 100 
percent. Heildelberg Zement produces some 8 million tons of cement 
a year.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 30 Dec 93 p 2 AU) 
   SOUTH BOHEMIAN DAIRY PLANT EXPORTS TO FAR EAST:  The South 
Bohemian Dairy Plant will achieve a turnover of Kc3.8 billion.  Of 
this, Kc1.3 billion represents exports, chiefly to the Far East. 
The company employs some 2,100 people in six plants and produces 
over 200 dairy products.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 30 Dec 93 p 2 
AU) 
   CONSUMER PRICES OUTPACE FACTORY PRICES:  Consumer prices have 
risen more sharply than factory prices, according to the latest 
statistics of the Czech Statistical Office.  While consumer prices 
rose 17.2 percent compared with December 1992, industrial producers 
increased their prices by only 11.5 percent.  Average wages rose 23 
percent in this period, and industrial output declined by 5 to 6 
percent.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES 30 Dec 93 p 14 AU) 
   INCREASE IN CONSTRUCTION WAGES:  In the January to November 
period, wages in the construction sector reached some Kc6,485, an 
increase of 29 percent in comprison with the same period last year. 
The average wage in construction in November was Kc7,478, which is 
22 percent more than a year ago.  (Prague RUDE PRAVO 30 Dec 93 p 8 
AU) 
   CONSOLIDATION BANK TO GET CAPITAL INJECTION:  The Konsolidacni 
Banka (Consolidation Bank) will receive a capital injection of Kc16 
billion from the National Property Fund.  The fund has acquired this 
sum from the sale of short-term bonds.  This information has been 
confirmed by National Property Fund Chairman Tomas Jezek.  The 
Konsolidacni Banka will apparently use this sum to increase its 
capital stock.  The director general of the bank declined to provide 
information on this subject, however.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES 31 
Dec 93 p 14 AU) 
   PRIVATIZATION FUNDS SHARES TO TRADE ON STOCK EXCHANGE:  As of 6 
January, it will be possible to buy and sell shares of 20 
privatization funds on the Prague Stock Exchange.  The total number 
of traded items will reach 989.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES 3 Jan 94 
p 14 AU) 
   CEDOK TRAVEL AGENCY INCURS LOSS:  The Cedok travel agency 
incurred a large loss last year, Petr Urban, director of the 
company, stated yesterday.  According to Urban, the Tourinvest and 
Hotelinvest joint ventures suffered the largest losses.  The travel 
agency itself incurred losses, as well.  Urban declined to give 
precise figures.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES 4 Jan 94 p 14 AU) 
   AERO UNDER BANKRUPTCY PROCEEDINGS THREAT:  Since the Investicni 
Banka (Investment Bank) is unable to recover claims amounting to 
Kc1.7 billion it has against the Aero Holding company, which 
associates Czech aviation factories, bankruptcy proceedings may be 
launched against these companies.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF 4 Jan 94 p 
6 AU) 
   AERO HOLDING SELLING COMPONENTS:  The sale of the Mesit Uherske 
Hradiste has eased the situation in the Aero Holding company and its 
components, Jan Rezek, spokesman of the Investicni a Postovni Banka 
(Investment and Postal Bank) said yesterday.  He added that the sale 
of the Moravan company in Otrokovice, Let in Kunovice, and Motorlet 
Prague is also being readied.  These steps cannot solve Aero 
Holding's debt problem, however, the spokesman said.  (Prague 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 5 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   MEZ POWER PLANTS TO BE SOLD TO SIEMENS:  The sale of MEZ's 
(Moravian Electrical Plants) three plants in Mohelnice, Drasov, and 
Frenstat for Kc1.3 billion to Siemens will be completed within a few 
weeks.  The Ministry for Administration and Privatization of 
National Property has already decided the terms of the sale with the 
German partner.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 5 Jan 94 p 1 AU) 
   TESLA HRADEC KRALOVE JOINT VENTURE WITH JAPANESE FIRM:  Tesla 
Hradec Kralove will produce ceramic substrates using the newest 
technological process -- casting the aluminum oxide material 
together with the binding agent.  The joint venture with the 
Japanese firm Y.S. Inc. will make this possible.  A total of 80 
people will be employed on the production line.  The company will 
gain access to all the markets that have been dominated by Y.S. 
(Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 5 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   COKOLADOVNY SHARES TO BE TRADED ON STOCK EXCHANGE:  As of today, 
Cokoladovny (Chocolate factory) Prague will be traded on the Prague 
Stock Exchange.  Cokoladovny Prague is one of the Czech enterprises 
with the largest foreign participation.  The factory was privatized 
in the first wave of coupon privatization, and some shares were set 
aside for direct sale to a foreign partner, Cokoladovny Partners, 
B.V., of Amsterdam.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES 6 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   U. S. INVESTMENT IN CZECH ECONOMY:  According to information 
provided by the Czech National Bank, direct foreign investment 
reached approximately Kc13.7 billion in the January to November 
period.  The largest investor in the Czech Republic was the United 
States, with 54.5 percent of the total.  American money was 
primarily directed toward the food industry and the consumer product 
industry.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES 6 Jan 94 p 14 AU) 
   TRADE WITH COLOMBIA:  Trade with Colombia reached approximately 
$30 million.  Columbia exports to the Czech Republic coffee, 
bananas, and flowers.  The Czech Republic exports to Colombia 
engineering products, transportation equipment, and irrigation 
equipment.  (Prague CESKY DENIK 6 Jan 94 p 5 AU) 
   ASSOCIATION OF INSURANCE COMPANIES ESTABLISHED:  According to 
Jaromir Blazke, spokesman of the Ministry for Economic Competition, 
the establishment of the Association of Insurance Companies does not 
constitute a violation of market ethics.  The Finance Ministry, a 
controlling body in this sector, endorses the establishment of this 
organization.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF 7 Jan 94 p 6 AU) 
   MINING COMPANY MERGER:  A new mining company, Severoceske Doly 
Chomutov, (North Bohemian Mines Chomutov) was established on 1 
January 1994 after two state-owned companies, Doly Nastup Tusimice 
(Tusimice Mines) and Doly Bilina (Bilina Mines) merged.  Vratislav 
Vajnar, previously director of Doly Nastup Tusimice has been elected 
the new company's president.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 10 Jan 94 p 
6 AU) 
   DROP IN SKODA CAR SALES IN UK:  The Skoda automobile plant sold 
9,153 automobiles in Great Britain last year, about 1,000 cars fewer 
than in 1992.  Skoda cars sell in Great Britain for 5,500 British 
pounds.  According to the number of units sold, Skoda cars are 
roughly in the same category as the Spanish Seat or Russian Lada. 
(Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 10 Jan 94 p 1O AU) 
   AGRICULTURE SECTOR SHOWS LOSS:  According to Minister of 
Agriculture Josef Lux, farmers incurred a loss of Kc6 billion to Kc8 
billion in 1993.  Precise numbers will be available within several 
months.  In view of the fact that the loss was even greater the 
previous year, Minister Lux does not see the situation as 
catastrophic, not even if the loss were Kc8 billion.  (Prague MLADA 
FRONTA DNES 10 Jan 94 p 1 AU) 
   CZECHOSLOVAK AIRLINES TO ANNUL AIR FRANCE AGREEMENT:  After the 
Czechoslovak Airlines shareholders' meeting on Thursday, 6 January, 
and the negotiations with Air France that followed, it has been 
decided to annul the treaty with the French company, which is one of 
Czechoslovak Airlines' shareholders.  It has not been decided yet 
who will buy the shares, Transportation Minister Jan Strasky said. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES 10 Jan 94 p 14 AU) 
   AIR FRANCE WANTS TO KEEP STAKE IN CZECHOSLOVAK AIRLINES:  Air 
France confirmed yesterday that it wants to keep its stake in 
Czechoslovak Airlines.  (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY 11 Jan 94 p 13 AU) 
   STATE GUARANTEES PAYMENT FOR BOEING PLANES:  The state budget is 
guaranteeing the repayment of $8.5 million for five Boeing 
airplanes.  If problems with Czechoslovak Airlines's ownership are 
not solved, the state will pay for the Boeings.  This information 
was confirmed by Transportation Minister Jan Strasky.  (Prague 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 12 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   CZECHOSLOVAK AIRLINES MANAGEMENT CHANGES:  Antonin Jakubse, 
president of Czechoslovak Airlines, announced yesterday that he 
would make radical changes in Czechoslovak Airlines' management. 
Four of the six vice-presidents have already been dismissed and new 
ones appointed.  Jakubse also provided information about an 
agreement with the Konsolidacni Banka (Consolidation Bank) to 
receive a loan to pay off a lease for Boeing aircraft amounting to 
$8.5 million.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF 15 Jan 94 p 1 AU) 
   PLZEN FACTORY TO PRODUCE NEW TRUCK:  The state-owned enterprise 
Stavebni Stroje (Building Machines) Plzen will manufacture a new 
3.5-ton vehicle.  The Testing Institute in Prague is testing the 
vehicle at present and is expected to issue manufacturing approval 
by the end of January.  France's Peugeot will deliver diesel motors 
for these trucks.  The company intends to produce 300 trucks this 
year and 1,000 next year.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES 10 Jan 94 p 14 
AU) 
   SKODA MLADA BOLESLAV SALES RISE 20 PERCENT:  The Skoda automobile 
plant sold 219,600 cars in the 1993 fiscal year.  This information 
was provided by Detlev Schmidt, chief of the marketing department. 
Compared to the 1992 results, this is a 20-percent increase. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES 10 Jan 94 AU) 
   DECEMBER 1992-DECEMBER 1993 INFLATION 18.2 PERCENT:  Consumer 
prices rose 18.2 percent in the December 1992-December 1993 period. 
This information was provided by the Czech Statistical Office. 
(Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 11 Jan 94 p 1 AU) 
   FOREIGN TRADE BANK ACQUIRES 70-PERCENT STAKE IN CEDOK:  The 
Ceskoslovenska Obchodni Banka (Czechoslovak Foreign Trade Bank -- 
CSOB) has become the owner of 70 percent of the Cedok travel agency. 
This information was confirmed by Milan Tomanek, press spokesman for 
the bank.  (Prague LIDOVE NOVINY 11 Jan 94 p 13 AU) 
   SWISS FORBO TO BUY INTO PLASTIC MAKER:  Forbo International, the 
leading manufacturer of floor materials in Europe, will become a 
shareholder in Fatra Napajedla, the largest manufacturer of plastics 
in the Czech Republic.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 12 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   EU TO END SUBSIDIZED APPLE SALES:  As of 21 January, the European 
Union (EU) will stop subsidizing deliveries of apples to the Czech 
Republic.  This information was provided by European Union 
Ambassador to Prague Leopoldo Giuniti after business talks were held 
in Brussels.  By the same date, the Czech Republic will abolish the 
15,000-ton quota imposed on the importation of EU-produced apples 
this year.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 13 Jan 94 p 1 AU) 
   LIBRA ELECTRONICS' AGREEMENTS WITH IBM, DIGITAL:  The Czech 
manufacturer of computer equipment, Libra Electronics, has concluded 
agreements on cooperation with the IBM and Digital companies.  GENOM 
hard disks, keyboards, and monitors manufactured by IBM in Scotland 
will be added to the computers made at the Libra plant in Ceske 
Budejovice.  According to the agreement with Digital, Libra has 
become one of that company's three main distributors, and its task 
is to establish a network of authorized dealers of Digital 
computers.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 14 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   GOVERNMENT SUPPORT FOR SMALL, MEDIUM-SIZE BUSINESS:  The 
government approved a draft proposal of a plan to support small and 
medium-size businesses in 1994.  A sum of Kc1.2 billion will be 
released for this program.  According to the program, regions with 
the highest unemployment will receive the support.  (Prague 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 14 Jan 94 p 3 AU) 
   INCREASE IN FOREIGN TRADE TURNOVER:  The Czech Republic's foreign 
trade turnover increased by 16.5 percent (excluding trade with 
Slovakia) during th first 11 months of 1993, compared with the same 
period the previous year.  Imports rose 15.8 percent and exports 
17.3 percent.  The trade balance, including trade with Slovakia, 
ended in a deficit of Kc400 million.  (Prague DENNI TELEGRAF 15 Jan 
94 p 6 AU) 
   GROWTH IN TOURISM EARNINGS:  According to a Czech National Bank 
estimate, income from tourism amounted to approximately $1.4 billion 
last year.  This is roughly 24 percent more than in 1992.  In 1993, 
71.2 million foreign visitors arrived in the Czech Republic, 
approximately 5 percent more than in 1992.  (Prague CESKY DENIK 17 
Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   OSTRAVA-KARVINA MINES' ECONOMIC PROBLEMS:  The Ostravsko- 
Karvinske Doly (Ostrava-Karvina Mines) showed a profit of only Kc15 
million last year.  According to Director General Ivan Dzina, the 
Ministry of Industry will try to sort out the situation together 
with the situation the metallurgy industry.  Metallurgical plants 
should be given credit to finance continuous casting plants which 
could help them pay at least part of their debt to Ostravsko- 
Karvinske Doly.  (Prague RUDE PRAVO 18 Jan 94 p 3 AU) 
   PALIVOVY KOMBINAT PRIVATIZED, NEW COMPANY ESTABLISHED:  The 
largest producer of coal gas, the Palivovy Kombinat (Fuel Combine) 
in Vresova, has been privatized.  With capital of Kc6.6 billion, the 
National Property Fund has established a new company called 
Sokolovska Uhelna (Sokolovo Coal Company).   The new company will 
extract coal in the Sokolovo region.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 19 
Jan 94 p 6 AU) 
   CITY OF PRAGUE TO ISSUE BONDS:  The Prague City government 
intends to issue bonds this year.  This information was provided by 
the Prague mayor at a new conference yesterday.  The Standard and 
Poor's rating for the City of Prague is BBB.  The mayor did not 
provide information on the exact amount of bonds, but he indicated 
that the minimum would be $150 million.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 
20 Jan 94 p 1 AU) 
   PEPSI-COLA TO INVEST $85 MILLION IN CZECH REPUBLIC:  The Pepsi- 
Cola international company intends to invest $85 million in the next 
five years.  This is what David Jones, Pepsi-Cola president for 
Europe, told our paper yesterday.  The total investment, including 
Slovakia, should reach $115 million.  (Prague HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 21 
Jan 94 p 1 AU) 
   WAGES HIGHEST IN BANKING, FINANCE, INSURANCE:  According to the 
findings of the Czech Statistical Office, the highest average wages 
during the first three quarters of last year were to be found in the 
banking, financial, and insurance sectors.  The overall average 
monthly salary was Kc5,771, while in the banking sector the average 
was Kc15,562, followed by the financial sector with Kc1O,684, and 
the insurance sector with Kc7,834.  (Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES 21 Jan 
94 p 14 AU) 
   AUSTRIA WILL NOT INTRODUCE ANTI-DUMPING STEPS:  We have managed 
to do away with the "petty wars" regarding exports of cement, 
tractors, and agricultural machines from the Czech Republic to 
Austria.  This is what Economy Minister Vladimir Dlouhy said in 
Vienna yesterday after his meeting with representatives of the 
Austrian Government.  He also said that only the exports of mineral 
fertilizers remain to be sorted out.  In all other cases, the anti- 
dumping measures planned by the Austrians have been called off. 
(Prague MLADA FRONTA DNES 21 Jan 94 p 14 AU) 
   NATIONAL PROPERTY FUND MAY PROVIDE LOAN GUARANTEES:  The Ministry 
of Industry and Trade will recommend that guarantees should be 
provided on loans to north Moravian metallurgical plants for 
building continuous casting lines.  The guarantee should be provided 
by the National Property Fund to Trinecke Zelezarny (Trinec 
Ironworks), Vitkovicke Zelezarny (Vitkovice Ironworks) and Nova Hut 
Ostrava (Ostrava New Metallurgical Plant).  (Prague HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY 25 Jan 94 p 3 AU) 
   HUNGARY 
   MNB TO REDUCE MANDATORY RESERVE RATE:  The Board of the Hungarian 
National Bank (MNB) decided to decrease the mandatory reserve rate 
by 1 percent from March 1 and by a further 1 percent from May 1. 
The mandatory reserve rate has been 14 percent since January 1, 
1993.  At the same time, the Board has decided to increase interest 
rates on mandatory reserve deposits on FOREX (foreign exchange) 
liabilities from 11 percent to 18 percent.  The 2 percent interest 
rate on reserves on forint deposits remains unchanged.  Mandatory 
reserves are to be allocated on all FOREX liabilities except those 
from the central bank or other domestic banks and not including 
FOREX deposits placed with the MNB.  The board has also decided to 
cancel securities repo deals for longer than three months and to 
cancel the two-weekly deals as of February 14.  From this date, the 
MNB will introduce passive repo deals.  The MNB estimates that a 1 
percent decrease in the mandatory reserve rate will result in 15 
billion Hungarian forints (HUF) worth of excess liquidity in the 
banking system.  In order to drain the excess liquidity, the MNB 
intends to boost passive repo deals.  With this in mind, the MNB 
plans to announce passive repo tenders when the liquidity position 
of the commercial banks makes it necessary.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 1555 GMT 7 Feb 94 AU) 
   FOREIGNERS CAN PURCHASE STATE BONDS:  Foreigners will shortly be 
able to purchase state bonds with one-year or longer maturity, 
Hungarian National Bank (MNB) Chairman Peter Akos Bod said.  The 
permit will be extended to state securities with a shorter maturity 
from next year on.  The MNB strives to encourage domestic savings 
and thereby intends to cover the government's credit needs and to 
create the ever increasing amounts needed for local industry 
operations.  The Budget Law makes it possible for the Finance 
Ministry to issue state bonds with longer than one-year maturities 
to a value of HUF300 billion to cover the planned deficit of 
HUF329.56 billion (compared to the budget deficit of HUF199.7 
billion last year), and to raise the treasury bill stock by HUF29.56 
billion to refinance the deficit. 
   Hungary is issuing bonds on the international money market at 
more or less regular intervals as the so-called risk surcharge on 
Hungarian bonds has recently declined significantly.  When the 
country reappeared on the international market in 1991, it was 
ranked in the 300-point category in the European points system, 
which serves as the basis for the risk surcharge.  Today, Hungary 
has to reckon with a risk surcharge that accords to only 160 to 170 
points.  The pace of raising further loans depends on direct foreign 
investments.  "If the value of these remains at around $1.5-2 
billion, then we shall continue to be forced to raise loans," Bod 
said.  (Budapest MTI in English 1143 GMT 2 Feb 94 AU) 
   BANK, CREDIT CONSOLIDATION PROGRAMS COST OVER HUF300 BILLION: 
The bank and credit consolidation programs will require a total of 
HUF3IO billion to HUF320 billion from the state.  This includes a 
total of HUF99 billion for 1992 credit consolidation programs and, 
in 1993, HUF114 billion for the bank consolidation program and HUF57 
billion for debtor consolidation.  A capital injection of an 
estimated HUF20 billion to HUF30 billion is necessary in order for 
the banks involved in the second phase of the bank consolidation 
program to achieve a capital adequacy ratio of 4 percent.  The 
government has spent HUF13 billion on the consolidation of the 
Hungarian Railways (MAV), HUF6 billion on a capital injection for 
savings cooperatives, HUF4 billion on debt relief for drought- 
affected companies, and HUF1 billion on the repayment of soil 
improvement loans to banks.  The government's advisor on bank 
privatization, Credit-Suisse First Boston, is soon to prepare a 
study on the future structure of the banking system.  (Budapest MTI 
in English 0758 GMT 2 Feb 94 AU) 
   AV RT'S BANK PRIVATIZATION STRATEGY:  According to State Property 
Management Corporation (AV RT) officials, the property policy 
guidelines regarding the ownership of banks should be drawn up 
before privatization.  These should include the amount of the stake 
to remain in state ownership, the most favorable ownership 
structure, and the importance of foreign and small investors.  The 
AV RT has already drawn up a plan for the privatization of large 
banks under which the privatization of the Hungarian Commercial Bank 
(MKB) and Budapest Bank has been launched.  In accordance with this 
concept, the first stage is to find professional strategic 
investors.  The second stage is the involvement of owners with long- 
term interests such as local and foreign insurance companies, 
pension funds, and investment companies.  Finally, the third stage 
involves the banks' introduction onto the Budapest Stock Exchange 
(BSE). 
   AV RT's plan sets the stake of strategic investors in the banks 
at 30 to 50 percent, that of financial investors at 2 to 10 percent, 
that of employees and management at 5 to 10 percent, and that of 
small investors at 5 to 20 percent.  A 1992 government decree 
selected the eight banks where the state should retain long-term 
ownership.  Under the decree, the long-term state ownership will 
remain 50 percent plus one vote at the Hungarian Savings Bank RT 
(OTP RT) and the Hungarian Investment and Development Bank RT (MBFB 
RT), 25 percent plus one vote in the Hungarian Credit Bank (MHB), 
Commercial and Credit Bank (K and H), General Banking and Trust Co. 
RT (AEB), Budapest Bank (BB), and Hungarian Commercial Bank (MKB), 
and 20 percent in Postabank.  (Budapest MTI in English 0826 GMT 3 
Feb 94 AU) 
   MCDONALDS PLANS TO EXPAND:  The McDonalds fast-food chain has 
invested HUF2.5 billion ($25 million) in Hungary over the past five 
years.  Last year its investments here amounted to HUF650 million. 
McDonalds presently runs 12 restaurants in Hungary.  Last year its 
aggregate turnover came close to HUF2.5 billion, as compared to 
HUF1.6 billion in the previous year.  In 1993, the company increased 
its prices by 13 percent.  This year McDonalds plans to open seven 
restaurants and increase the turnover of its network by 30 to 40 
percent.  Despite the growing turnover, the company closed last year 
with a loss, though its deficit was smaller than a year before. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1150 GMT 8 Feb 94 AU) 
   MALEV AGREEMENT WITH DELTA ON NEW YORK SERVICE:  The Hungarian 
Airline MALEV and Delta Air Line are to operate MALEV's Boeing 767- 
200er aircraft on the Budapest-New York service under a joint flight 
number.  The first flight will be on May 2, 1994.  The daily non- 
stop flights will land at the Delta terminal at New York's JFK 
Airport. Delta has purchased some Sky Club and economy seats in 
advance. The new service will eliminate the stopover in Rome. 
MALEV began flying to New York via Rome last summer, but the service 
made a loss of $3.5 million in the first seven months of operation. 
(Budapest MTI in English 2104 GMT 3 Feb 94 ) 
   MINERALIMPEX AGREEMENT WITH GAZPROM:  The Hungarian oil and gas 
trading company Mineralimpex is to import an annual 2.8 billion 
cubic meters of natural gas from the Russian company Gazprom over 
the next five years under an agreement signed between the two 
companies.  The contract was based on a former inter-governmental 
agreement that provides for the gas to be supplied by the Orenburg 
field from the beginning of this year.  In addition, 2 billion cubic 
meters of natural gas will be imported from the Yamburg field in 
Russia in repayment of Hungary's investment in the field.  An 
additional 1 billion cubic meters could be imported depending on 
demand and on further agreements with Gazprom. 
   The Industry and Trade Ministry (IKM) intends to extend the 
contracts on Yamburg and Orenburg gas that expire in five years. 
The demand for natural gas is expected to rise by 20-30 percent to 
12-13 billion cubic meters by the year 2000, up from 10 billion 
cubic meters.  The building of a transit pipeline through Hungary to 
Italy is advocated by the IKM.  The users of the pipeline could pay 
the transit fee in gas, for the use of which a new gas-fuelled, 
combined cycle power station would be built.  Gazprom said that it 
was willing to participate in a consortium established for this 
purpose.  It also intends to become involved in the privatization of 
Hungary's gas and electricity supply companies.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 1750 GMT 8 feb 94 AU) 
   SUPPLIERS TO GET STAKE IN CENTRUM CHAIN:  Strategia KFT, the 
company formed by the management of Centrum Aruhazak RT, is to 
transfer 23 percent of its 25 percent stake in the department store 
chain to a consortium of food and clothing suppliers.  Strategia, 
which was set up by 270 managers, bought its 25 percent stake in 
Centrum at the same time as the company's 3,500-member ESOP 
(employees' share ownership program) organization purchased a 26 
percent stake from the State Property Agency (AVU).  The AVU made a 
decision on the sale of the 51 percent stake in mid-January, with 
the contract to be signed in two weeks' time.  Strategia KFT 
included in its bid its intention to transfer the 23 percent to 
suppliers.  Strategia and the ESOP organization will pay for the 
shares with HUF420 million cash, HUF754 million worth of 
compensation coupons and an E-loan (as received) to the value of 
HUF1.374 billion.  The E-loan bears interest of 7 percent and has a 
maturity of 15 years, with a grace period of three years. 
   Centrum Aruhazak has drawn up a three-year strategic plan which 
requires an additional HUF3.1 billion worth of capital.  A Canadian- 
Hungarian businessman, Andrew Sarlos, has offered to carry out an 
equity raise of HUF2 billion and the MHB-Daewoo Bank would grant a 
loan of HUF500 million.  The company's bank, the Commercial Bank 
(OKHB), and the World Bank are prepared to lend the remainder. 
   The Centrum department store chain, which has registered capital 
of HUF5 billion, consists of 25 department stores and has total 
assets of HUF9 billion.  The company had turnover of HUF16.3 billion 
last year (HUF15.4 billion in 1992) and achieved a pre-tax profit of 
HUF300 million (HUF450 million in 1992).  Centrum is expected to 
have total turnover of HUF19.5 billion this year and to achieve a 
pre-tax profit of HUF450 million.  Centrum owed HUF150 million in 
loans at the end of last year, compared to HUF200 million at the end 
of 1992.  The loans were mostly short-term working capital loans. 
The company invested HUF260 million in remodelling 12 shops last 
year and plans to invest HUF180 million in development this year. 
Centrum has also begun establishing a HUF800 million bar-code stock 
control system which will transfer data through satellite. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1733 GMT 8 Feb 94 AU) 
   DEVELOPMENTS IN COMPUTER INDUSTRY:  Although Hungary has certain 
traditions in computer sciences, its computer industry and trade can 
only look back on a few years' past.  The industry is about to face 
recession, some experts claim.  The number of solvent companies is 
decreasing and Hungarian companies cannot compete with multinational 
corporations.  The estimated number of companies specializing in 
computers is 300, while the number of Hungarian specialists is 
presumably several thousand.  In the past few years, computers have 
become widespread and commonly used in Hungary.  Computer industry 
in Hungary began to take shape at the beginning of the l98Os -- a 
period when computer scientists could start their own enterprises, 
mainly focusing on software development.  Their small firms have 
been expanding and are the leading companies today (for example 
Microsystem, Controll, Rolitron), while subsidized research centers 
have had to close down one after another because their specialists 
realized they could earn more in business enterprises. 
   In the 1990's, the liberalization of import conditions and the 
lifted western embargo resulted in a multitude of small firms, most 
of which became personal computer dealers without any adequate 
background for service.  Many a leading firm found its prices too 
low to compete with them and went bankrupt.  Meanwhile many powerful 
Western firms appeared in Hungary (IBM, Hewlett-Packard, Epson). 
Their share of the market has been gradually increasing due to the 
direct distribution of products and professional service network. 
At present computer industry and trade in Hungary can be divided 
into three main areas.  There are 2OO to 300 small firms selling 
cheap, mainly Taiwanese hardware.  There are about 10 Hungarian 
companies mostly involved in such services as building computer 
networks, maintaining computer service shops, and teaching computer 
sciences.  The third group consists of some multinational firms 
selling both hardware and software, and also having well-developed 
service networks. 
   By 1993, hardware development in Hungary almost came to an end. 
There are only a few experts dealing even with special software 
development because multinational firms offer almost complete 
program packages to customers in each professional field.  Hungary, 
following the Western market tendency, has entered a period of 
recession in computer business, some experts claim.  Hewlett-Packard 
is said to possess one-sixth of the Hungarian computer market and is 
prepared to face a continuous recession ending only in 1995. 
Established in Hungary three years ago with 72 employees, Hewlett- 
Packard made an income of HUF3 billion, or $30 million, in 1993. 
The European marketing manager of the firms expects a 10 percent 
fall of income by 1996.  The cause of decreasing prices both on the 
international and Hungarian market is standardization, a phenomenon 
expected also in software business.  The 1993 results, however, for 
example the 121 percent rise of turnover on the Hungarian market, do 
not indicate the penetration of world-market recession into Hungary. 
(Budapest MTI in English 0719 GMT 8 Feb 94 AU) 
   CENTRAL EUROPEAN FREE TRADE AREA:  Creating a Central European 
Free Trade Area (CEFTA) helps the countries concerned catch up with 
Western Europe because it stimulates their economic growth and 
transformation into market economies, Minister of International 
Economic Relations Bela Kadar Said.  In Kadar's view, sound economic 
cooperation is the best tool for stabilizing Central Europe.  Owing 
to the free trade agreement which came into force on March 1 last 
year, half of trade among the four countries has been liberalized by 
now.  According to Kadar, trade among the countries concerned will 
be almost entirely liberalized by 1998.  (Budapest MTI in English 
1954 GMT 3 Feb 94 AU) 
   REAL WAGES DECLINED IN 1993:  The per capita gross earnings 
during the month of December 1993 amounted to HUF37,358, with blue- 
collar workers earning HUF27,109 and white-collar workers earning 
HUF6O,399 on average, the latest report of the Central Statistical 
Office (KSH) says.  In 1993, gross earnings grew by 25 percent on 
average.  The increase was 21.1 percent for blue-collar workers and 
27.2 percent for white-collar employees.  Real earnings dropped by 
1.6 percent in 1993.  Last year the average gross monthly earnings 
for employees working in firms with a staff of over 20 amounted to 
HUF28,243 -- 25.6 percent more than in 1992.  The net monthly income 
of full-time employees was HUF18,901 -- 20.6 percent over the 1992 
figure.  Major wage increases in December were registered only in 
the financial and mining sectors.  (Miners received their loyalty 
money that month.)  (Budapest MTI in English 1243 GMT 8 Feb 94 AU) 
   UNEMPLOYMENT RISE FIRST IN 11 MONTHS:  The number of registered 
unemployed was 641,000 at the end of January, 9,000 more than a 
month earlier, the National Labor Center announced.  This is the 
first time the unemployment figure has risen since February last 
year, when it stood at 705,000.  From the start of this year, the 
calculation of the unemployment rate is based on Central Statistical 
Office (KSH) estimates of the total working-age population in 1993 
and not in 1992.  As a result, the unemployment rate is 0.5 percent 
higher (12.8 percent) in January.  The highest rate (21.1 percent) 
was registered in Borsod-Abauj-Zemplen county, the second highest 
(20.6 percent) in Szabolcs-Szatmar-Bereg, and the third highest 
(19.1 percent) in Nograd.  The unemployment rate was relatively low 
(6.3 percent) in Budapest.  Using the same basis for calculation as 
last year, the unemployment rate was 12.3 percent in January.  The 
number of first-time job seekers continued to fall in January. 
47,300 people lost their jobs in January and 36,900 people were 
taken off the list of registered unemployed.  22,800 new jobs were 
available in January, 40 percent more than in January, and the total 
number of job vacancies grew by 3,200 to around 51,000.  (Budapest 
MTI in English 1456 GMT 4 Feb 94 ) 
   FOREIGNERS CAN PURCHASE STATE BONDS:  Foreigners will shortly be 
able to purchase state bonds with one-year or longer maturity in 
Hungary, Hungarian National Bank (MNB) Chairman Peter Akos Bod said. 
Bod also said the permit will be extended to state securities with 
shorter maturity from next year on.  Bod said the bank strives to 
encourage domestic savings and thereby intends to cover the 
government's credit needs and to create the ever increasing amounts 
needed for local industry operation. 
   The Hungarian budget law makes it possible for the Finance 
Ministry to issue state bonds with longer than one-year maturities 
in a value of 300 billion forints to cover the planned deficit of 
329.56 billion forints (compared to the budget deficit of 199.7 
billion forints last year), and to raise the Treasury Bill Stock by 
29.56 billion forints to refinance the deficit.  Hungary is issuing 
bonds on the international money market at more or less regular 
intervals as the so-called risk surcharge on Hungarian bonds has 
recently declined significantly.  When the country reappeared on the 
international market in 1991, it was ranked in the 300-point 
category in the European points system, which serves as the basis 
for the risk surcharge.  Today, Hungary has to reckon with a risk 
surcharge that accords to only 160 to 170 points, Bod said.  He 
added that the pace of raising further loans depends on direct 
foreign investments.  "If the value of these remains at around $1.5 
to 2 billion, then we shall continue to be forced to raise loans," 
Bod said.  (Budapest MTI in English 1143 GMT 2 Feb 94 AU) 
   HALF OF LOSSES IN NATIONAL ECONOMY FROM INDUSTRY:  Fifty percent 
of the losses in the national economy are posted by industrial 
companies, a recent survey by the Ministry of Industry and Trade 
shows.  Ninety percent of the losses were posted by the 
manufacturing sector.  Half of the industrial-companies which do 
make profits account for 60 percent of industrial output.  They 
employ less than 50 percent of the industrial workforce.  Industrial 
companies' assets account for more than 50 percent of the economy's 
total assets, and the sector employs 60 percent of the country's 
workforce.  (Budapest MTI in English 0720 GMT 28 Jan 94 AU) 
   COST OF BANK, CREDIT CONSOLIDATION PROGRAM:  The bank and credit 
consolidation programs will require a total of 310 billion to 320 
billion forints from the state.  This includes a total of 99 billion 
forints for 1992 credit consolidation programs and, in 1993, 114 
billion forints for the bank consolidation program, and 57 billion 
forints for debtor consolidation.  A capital injection of an 
estimated 20 billion to 30 billion forints is necessary in order for 
the banks involved in the second stage of the bank consolidation 
program to achieve a capital adequacy ratio of 4 percent.  The 
government has spent 13 billion forints on the consolidation of the 
Hungarian Railways (MAV), 6 billion forints on a capital injection 
for savings cooperatives, 4 billion forints on debt relief for 
drought affected companies, and 1 billion forints on the repayment 
of soil improvement loans to banks.  It is seen to be unfortunate 
that the stakes owned by the state in banks were in the hands of 
different state institutions.  It was time to draw up contracts 
between the Finance Ministry and the Hungarian State Holding Company 
(AV RT) on the handling of these stakes.  The government's adviser 
on bank privatization, Credit-Suisse First Boston, was soon to 
prepare a study on the future structure of Hungary's banking system. 
(Budapest MTI in English 0758 GMT 2 Feb 94 AU) 
   BAUXITE MINING FIRM'S PROBLEMS:  Hungary's sole bauxite mining 
company, which operates four mines (Bakony Bauxite Mine Kft.) has 
decided to close down for the last week of January.  The company has 
orders for only 250,000 tons of bauxite in the first three months of 
this year.  The company now employs 1,800, compared with 3,000 in 
1988, when it mined 3 million tons of bauxite.  Some 1.7 million 
tons of bauxite was mined in Hungary in 1992, and 550,000 tons of 
alumina and 27,000 tons of aluminum were produced.  Although the 
same amount of aluminum was produced last year, production of 
alumina and extraction of bauxite fell 10-15 percent.  At present, 
HUNGALU's three alumina plants (in Ajka, Mosonmagyarovar, and 
Almasfuzito) are still in operation but it now has only one 
aluminium smelter (in Inota) following the closure of smelters in 
Tatabanya and Ajka three years ago.  (Budapest MTI in English 0731 
GMT 26 Jan 94 AU) 
   U.S. INVESTORS BUY INTO DANUBIUS HOTELS:  Three U.S. financial 
investors have bought into the hotel chain Danubius Hotels Rt. 
following the largest-ever deal on the Budapest Stock Exchange on 28 
January.  One of the three is Kingdon Capital Market Corporation 
based in New york, which manages a $1 billion investment portfolio, 
another is Indian Harbor Holdings, registered in Connecticut, an 
asset managing firm with a portfolio worth $100 million, while the 
third is the Investment and Pension Fund of an undisclosed U.S.- 
based multinational company.  The three together now hold 29.8 
percent of Danubius Rt's 8 billion forints registered capital. 
   CA Securities stood on both sides of the 2.38 billion forints 
deal in Danubius shares on 28 January, as it was commissioned to 
sell by the State Property Agency (AVU) and Danubius Hotels Rt. 
while also acting for the three U.S. purchasers.  In the 28 January 
transaction, AVU sold a 26 percent stake in Danubius, while the 
remaining 3.8 percent stake sold was held by Danubius itself.  The 
AVU still holds a 10 percent stake in Danubius Rt. which will be 
eventually offered in exchange for compensation coupons.  34.7 
percent of Danubius's equity is in the hands of small investors, 
10.6 percent is owned by local councils and 7.5 percent by 
employees.  The remaining shareholders include institutional 
investors, brokerage firms and the vehicle third party liability 
fund.  According to preliminary figures, the hotel company had 1993 
gross profits of 882 million forints on net turnover of 5.098 
billion forints which included 4.88 billion forints worth of FOREX 
turnover.  (Budapest MTI in English 1818 GMT 31 Jan 94 AU) 
   FAR EASTERN CLUB TO BREAK FROM CHAMBER OF COMMERCE:  The Far 
Eastern Business Club (FEBC) of the Hungarian Chamber of Commerce 
(HCC) plans to have itself registered as an independent interest 
organization.  Since its foundation in 1982, the FEBC has operated 
as an associate body of the HCC promoting links between companies. 
In the future, the club will work independently, in close 
cooperation with the chamber, with the principal aim of furthering 
Hungarian ventures' business ties in Hong Kong, Macao, China, South 
Korea, Taiwan, and Indochina.  (Budapest MTI in English 1534 GMT 1 
Feb 94 AU) 
   STATE OF INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS:  Central Statistical Office 
figures show that infrastructure was a crucial area of the national 
economy in 1993.  Over the first nine months of last year, 90.9 
billion forints ($900 million), or 37 percent of the total 
investment spending, was channelled into transport, storage, post, 
and telecommunications, as well as electricity, gas, heat, and water 
supply.  The volume of overall investments, in real terms, was the 
same as in 1992, while that of infrastructure projects increased. 
The fastest development is in the telephone system.  Last year, 1.3 
million main stations operated in the country, 4O percent more than 
in 1989.  The over 500,000 applicants waitlisted at the end of 1993 
have all been promised a telephone by 1997.  To accelerate the 
process, the government allowed each local municipality, meeting 
dozens of concession requests, to set up a telephone distribution 
system.  Privatization of the Hungarian Telecommunications Co. last 
December mobilized foreign capital worth $875 million for the 
purpose.  Over 90 percent of the main stations were connected to the 
direct distance dialing system, which is planned to be completed 
nationwide by 1997.  (The 1989 ratio was 85.5 percent.) 
   The national road system last year measured 30,800 kilometers. 
This compared to 30,000 in 1992.  Construction of the M1 highway 
from Gyor in western Hungary to the Austrian border began last year 
and will be completed in 1995.  (It presently covers the 150-km 
distance between Budapest and Gyor.)  The M15, leading to Bratislava 
and Prague via Mosonmagyarovar, will be opened to traffic in 1997, 
with the new section of the MO, around the capital, opening this 
autumn.  Beginning this year, the M3 speedway, currently 80 
kilometers long, is being built further towards northeastern 
Hungary, but will not reach the border by the time of the 1996 
Budapest World Expo.  The large cities of the region -- Debrecen, 
Miskolc, Nyiregyhaza -- will be linked to it from the National Road 
Fund.  The southern motorway towards Serbia will be completed up to 
Kecskemet, central Hungary, with two lanes by 1996.  The M7 motoway 
running across Transdanubia by Lake Balaton at a length of 90 
kilometers, will be extended in the direction of Croatia and 
Slovenia. 
   These projects will be carried out on a concession basis.  M1 
will be built by a French-Austrian-Hungarian consortium in 
cooperation with the European Bank for Reconstruction and 
Development (EBRD), and M7 with Italian participation as part of the 
Trieste-Kiev axis.  The European Union also supports development of 
Hungary's southern and eastern transit routes and the extension of 
the northern Hungarian section of the Polish-Slovak-Hungarian road 
system.  Six towns will receive bypasses from state and local 
authority finances.  Utilizing the state road fund, 443 towns and 
villages built 103 kilometers of road and 177 kilometers of cycle 
track last year.  Regional projects are also given foreign 
assistance.  For example, several border posts have been set up with 
aid from the European Union's PHARE (Economic Reconstruction Aid for 
Poland and Hungary) scheme.  The World Bank and the EBRD have 
granted 17 billion forints ($170 million) for the reconstruction of 
tramways and an underground line in Budapest.  Both transport and 
communal infrastructure projects are expected to narrow the gap 
between regions with varying degrees of development. 
   So far, the various counties have spent state support, granted 
under a regional development program, on different sectors of their 
infrastructure:  The drinking water supply and roads in Nograd, the 
telephone network in Borsod, both in northern Hungary, and the gas 
program in the eastern county of Szabolcs-Szatmar.  Public utilities 
are expanding at an accelerated rate.  The length of water mains 
last year exceeded 55,300 kilometers, of which 4,000 were built over 
the past four years.  At present, 89 percent of towns and villages 
have conduit water supply, reaching 3.6 million households, or more 
than four-fifths of the total.  Full-scale supply is planned for 
1997.  Drainage measured 16,300 kilometers in 1993, with 1,900 
kilometers built during the last three years.  Thus, 17 percent of 
towns and villages and nearly 38 percent of households -- 1.7 
million -- are connected to the drainage system.  Of the 600 towns 
and villages (18 percent) supplied with gas last year, 172 have been 
connected to the system since 1989.  The 30,000-kilometer-long pipe 
network carries gas to 40 percent of the households, numbering 1.8 
million.  (Budapest MTI in English 1004 GMT 26 Jan 94 AU) 
   UNEMPLOYMENT DECLINE CONTINUES:  Registered unemployment 
continued to fall last December, the National Labor Center said. 
With 632,000 jobless listed at the end of December, 3,000 fewer than 
in the previous month, the unemployment rate went down from 12.2 
percent to 12.1 percent.  However, a few counties in the north are 
still facing massive unemployment, including Borsod-Abauj-Zemplen 
(19.9 percent), Nograd (19.7 percent), and Szabolcs-Szatmar-Bereg 
(18.7 percent).  This compares to 6.3 percent in the capital city of 
Budapest.  (Budapest MTI in English O946 GMT 31 Jan 94 AU) 
   ELEVEN-MONTH INDUSTRIAL OUTPUT UP 4.3 PERCENT:  Industrial output 
was 4.3 percent up in real terms in the first eleven months of 1993 
as compared with the same period of the previous year, the latest 
Central Statistical Office report shows.  Overall output in the 
construction industry in the first nine months was the same as in 
the comparable period of 1992 but house construction in January- 
November was 16 percent down on the first eleven months of 1992. 
Sales of farm produce were down 24 percent in the first 11 months of 
last year as compared with January-November 1992.  Preliminary 
figures show a grain harvest of 8.4 million tons last year, 13 
percent less than in 1992, the sugar beet harvest down 24 percent, 
and the sunflower seed harvest down 11 percent.  Livestock numbers 
for all kinds of farm animals were lower in September 1993 than a 
year earlier. 
   Consumer prices rose 22.5 percent in the whole of 1993. 
Industrial producer prices rose 10.8 percent in the first 11 months 
and agricultural producer prices rose 25.3 percent in the 12 months 
up to the end of November.  The total personal cash income in the 
first 11 months was 18 percent higher than in the same period of 
1992, which represents a fall of 3 to 4 percent in real terms.  The 
total gross wage income in the first 11 months was 25.5 percent up 
and the net wage income 20.5 percent up on the corresponding period 
of the previous year.  The workforce of companies with more than 20 
employees was on average 9 percent lower in the first 11 months than 
in January-November 1992.  The number of unemployed at the end of 
December was 632,OOO, 73,OOO fewer than its peak in February 1993. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1230 GMT 2O Jan 94 AU) 
   AGRICULTURAL CROPS SHRINK IN 1993:  Owing to a serious drought 
hitting agriculture for two years, last year's grain crop was 13 
percent down on that of 1992 and 40 percent down on the average of 
the years 1986-1990, the Central Statistical Office reported.  In 
1993, grain crops totalled 8.4 million tons, 1.3 million tons less 
than in 1992 and 5.5 million tons less than the average of 1986- 
1990.  Cereals yielded 4.4 million tons in 1993, 19 percent less 
than in 1992, despite the area sown being 7 percent larger.  The 
sown area of wheat grew by 17 percent but the average crop fell by 
25 percent per hectare.  The sown area of maize shrank by 2 percent 
compared with 1992 and its yield by 5 percent.  Sugar beet grews on 
an area 9,000 hectares smaller than in 1992, and the crop fell by 18 
percent per hectare.  Sunflower crops dropped by over 10 percent, 
potato crops by 22 percent.  According to the report, besides 
drought, the low average of crops was due to a drop in the use of 
artificial fertilizers.  Fertilizers used on one hectare were under 
40 kgs, compared to 180-200 kgs in previous years.  Also, owing to 
restructuring and the low level of income, agricultural companies 
failed to complete part of the work properly.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 0811 GMT 20 Jan 94 AU) 
   MINISTER EXPECTS 'STABILIZATION' IN AGRICULTURE:  The year 1994 
may be one of stabilization in agriculture, according to Agriculture 
Minister Janos Szabo.  Szabo says, in 1994, the output of 
agriculture is to increase by 5 to 8 percent, within that, plant 
cultivation by 14 to 20 percent, while animal husbandry is expected 
to stagnate.  Production of the food processing industry is expected 
to rise by 3 to 5 percent.  The domestic market of agriculture will 
probably stop shrinking.  A boost in demand is expected in external 
markets as well, which could mean agricultural exports of at least 
$2-2.2 billion.  According to preliminary figures, agricultural 
exports in 1993 exceeded $2 billion.  Compared with a record $2.7 
billion in 1992, this is a drop but is still more than the best 
results in the socialist years.  Last year, agricultural exports 
were down on the previous year by 8 to 9 percent.  Szabo denied that 
there is a disastrous situation in agriculture.  Domestic food 
supply is not in danger, he added, and a price of 100 forints for a 
kilogram of bread is out of the question.  (Budapest MTI in English 
1434 GMT 19 Jan 94 AU) 
   CENTRAL BANK CREDIT LINE FOR LONG-TERM EXPORT FINANCING:  The 
Hungarian National Bank (MNB) plans to earmark 10 billion forints -- 
half of its planned 1994 net loans to the banking system -- for 
export financing.  The MNB will refinance the Hungarian Eximbank, 
which is currently being established, up to the 10 billion forints 
limit, so that Eximbank may grant long-term export loans.  The MNB 
will grant the credit to Eximbank in foreign exchange, with the 
latter to grant foreign exchange loans to exporting companies at 
conditions which are in line with OECD standards.  The details of 
the loan structure will be prepared soon.  The loan is designed to 
help engineering exports.  Hungarian companies have until now 
suffered from not being able to offer long-term loans to clients 
because the Hungarian banking system has in general only short-term 
resources.  The document stresses that this solution is only 
temporary.  Eximbank will have to finance itself from the capital 
market in the long run.  The MNB stresses that halting the fall in 
exports requires well-coordinated government efforts.  (Budapest MTI 
in English 1623 GMT 24 Jan 94 AU) 
   CENTRAL BANK ISSUES 1994 MONETARY POLICY GUIDELINES:  The 
Hungarian National Bank (MNB) published its 1994 monetary policy 
guidelines focusing on improving the country's external balance and 
slowing inflation.  The main aim is to reverse last year's 
unfavorable trends in the external balance.  This year's current 
account deficit should stay below $1.5-2 billion.  The MNB predicts 
the,arrival of $1.3-1.5 billion working capital in the country.  The 
guidelines stress that imports must not be allowed to exceed exports 
consistently or considerably.  Exports should increase by a minimum 
of 7 to 9 percent, while imports may only rise by 0.2 percent. 
Consumer prices in 1994 may increase at a somewhat slower pace than 
in 1993.  Inflation is expected to be 16 to 22 percent, producer 
price rises by 11 to 13 percent, and the budget deficit 340 billion 
forints.  Personal savings are likely to rise by 24O billion 
forints.  Budapest MTI in English 0734 GMT 21 Jan 94 AU) 
   PRIVATE SAVINGS UP 212 BILLION FORINTS IN 1993:  According to the 
latest Hungarian National Bank figures, total personal savings 
increased by 212.1 billion forints in 1993, a smaller increase than 
in 1992, when private savings grew by 307.8 billion forints.  At the 
same time, private borrowings were up 41.8 billion forints to 294.1 
billion forints, compared with an increase of 11.3 billion forints 
the year before.  Personal savings deposited at financial 
institutions showed a 185.8 billion forint growth last year, 
compared with a rise of 281.2 billion forints the preceding year. 
At the end of last year, savings totalled 1395.8 billion forints, of 
which 1228.7 billion forints were deposited with financial 
institutions.  Savings deposits totalled 704.4 billion forints, of 
which deposits in foreign exchange were worth 204.4 billion forints, 
an increase of 51.8 billion forints over 1992.  Foreign exchange 
worth 3.9 billion forints was deposited by private persons at 
domestic banks in December.  The value of securities issued by non- 
financial institutions, including state securities, held by private 
individuals totalled 116.1 billion forints on December 31, 1993, 
16.6 billion forints up on the year.  This included a 8.8 billion 
forint rise in December.  Personal net savings totalled 1101.7 
billion forints on December 31, 170.3 billion forints more than a 
year earlier.  (Budapest MTI in English 1431 GMT 19 Jan 94 AU) 
   1993 PRIVATIZATION REVENUE:  The State Property Agency (AVU) had 
a revenue of 77.9 billion forints from privatization in 1993, 25.5 
billion forints, or 32.7 percent, in convertible currency.  Total 
expenditure exceeded revenue in 1993, amounting to 79.1 billion 
forints, over two-thirds of which were obligations to the national 
economy.  The AVU used 53.56 billion forints for that purpose.  A 
total of 22.2 billion forints was used to pay state debts.  The 
withdrawal of compensation vouchers cost 13.04 billion forints, 
while a further considerable sum was used to raise the state holding 
company's registered capital by 6.5 billion forints.  The costs of 
reorganizing and restructuring companies to be privatized amounted 
to 13.67 billion forints, while costs related to the privatization 
process itself, for example amounts spent on handling assets, on 
founding corporations, and on sales, totalled 11.89 billion forints. 
The largest foreign investors in 1993 continued to be Austria and 
Germany.  Austria is involved in 96 companies, while Germany in 65. 
The share of foreign capital in privatized property has totalled 176 
billion forints over the past three years, a third of which was 
invested in Hungary by Austria and Germany.  (Budapest MTI in 
English 0732 GMT 20 Jan 94 AU) 
   20 BILLION FORINTS FOR SMALL INVESTORS PROGRAM:  The board of AV 
Rt.  (State Property Management Corporation) has allocated total 
stakes worth 20 billion forints face value to be offered this year 
for the Small Investors Share Ownership Program (SISOP).  The 
following stakes have been offered:  3 percent of MVM Inc. worth 7.5 
billion forints, 5 percent of MATAV Inc. worth 4.5 billion forints, 
5 percent of EGIS Inc. worth 320 million forints, and 2 percent of 
MOL Inc. worth 2 billion forints.  Zsolnai Porcelangyar Inc. 
(Zsolnai Porcelain Factory Inc.) and Kalocsa Kornyeki Agraripari 
Inc. (Kalocsa Area Agricultural Inc.) are also in the portfolio with 
10-percent stakes.  Following the government's reduction of the 
stake of AV Rt.-owned companies remaining under permanent state 
ownership at the end of last year, part of the share packets 
released has been included in the portfolio.  As a result, a further 
5 percent of MATAV shares, 5 percent of Pick Szeged Inc., 5 percent 
of Szegedi Paprika Inc., and 10 percent of Richter Gedeon Gyogyszer 
Inc. (Richter Gedeon Pharmaceutical Inc.) have been added.  A 3 
billion forints face value share packet was assigned by the State 
Property Agency (AVU) earlier to be offered this year for small 
investors within the SISOP.  (Budapest MTI in English 1723 GMT 19 
Jan 94 AU) 
   TRADE AT BUDAPEST COMMODITY EXCHANGE PICKS UP:  In 1989, the 
Budapest Commodity Exchange (Budapesti Arutozsde, BAT) reopened 
after a 41-year hiatus.  In 1993, trading on the exchange exceeded 
13 billion forints ($130 million), two-and-one-half times the amount 
of the previous year.  Grain transactions amounted to a ninth of 
commodity-exchange turnover last year, while trading on the two- 
year-old meat division remained sluggish, with a turnover of less 
than 200 million forints.  The newly founded foreign-currency 
exchange produced a turnover of 1.2 billion forints in its first 
nine months.  Although the first day of trading on the reopened 
commodity exchange was October 25, 1989, trading began to gather 
momentum only after price liberalization in 1990.  Grain turnover 
that year reached 600 million forints.  Meat was introduced onto the 
BAT in 1991, but the 3 billion forint turnover that year was almost 
exclusively in grain.  Total trade in 1992 was close to 6 billion 
forints, with 1.5 million tons of grain changing hands there -- 
nearly a quarter of Hungary's overall grain trade. 
   1993 was successful for the BAT in several respects.  Although 
its turnover of 13.1 billion forints ($130 million) lagged far 
behind that of the Budapest Stock Exchange (Budapesti Ertektozsde, 
BET), this was still Eastern Europe's highest commodities exchange 
turnover, matched only by the Prague commodity exchange.  The 
foreign-currency exchange, which opened last March, had a turnover 
of 1.2 billion forints in 1993.  Both this and the BET's currency 
exchange base their speculative market in U.S. dollars and German 
marks on the safe background of Hungary's $20 billion export-import 
traffic -- $3 billion of which is transacted by joint ventures. 
   In mid-October 1993, the Central Accounting House and Assets 
Store Co.  (CAHAS) was founded by the BET and the Hungarian National 
Bank with equity capital of lOO million forints.  It operates as a 
central clearing house and joint backing to Hungary's commodity and 
capital markets, conducting deals in futures, options, inter-bank 
securities, and foreign-currency exchange.  The house guarantees 
that contracts are fulfilled on time, thus diminishing interest risk 
for domestic investors and exchange-rate risk for foreign investors. 
To tackle its increasing role, last year the BAT opened a new 
exchange room and started preparations for a new Central European 
energy-trade division.  Its planned opening in the second half of 
1994 was supported by an international conference of the Central 
European Energy Exchange Foundation, held in Budapest last November. 
Annual oil trade in Eastern Europe is around 6O million tons, worth 
$12O billion.  Hungary's location at the intersection of two large 
pipelines makes Budapest a good place to host an exchange for crude 
oil from various countries, especially considering that the price of 
oil from the former Soviet Union is not yet quoted on international 
exchanges.  However, Hungary must first adopt an exchange law before 
setting up the Central European energy exchange.  The draft of the 
law was drawn up in 1992 and will probably go before the new 
parliament (to be elected this spring) sometime in the third quarter 
of 1994.  (Budapest MTI in English 0905 GMT 19 Jan 94 AU) 

   ESZTERGOM TO BUILD OVER 30,000 SUZUKIS IN 1994:  Esztergom's 
Suzuki plant will turn out 30,000-35,000 cars in 1994, three times 
the number produced in 1993, the January report of the company says. 
In 1993, 12,556 Hungarian-made Suzukis, 35O imported Swifts, and 
1,766 Marutis were sold in Hungary.  The export of over 10,000 cars 
starts in April through Suzuki's Western European distributors. 
Currently, 34 Hungarian companies deliver spare parts for the 
Esztergom factory.  The proportion of domestic suppliers is expected 
to reach 50 percent by late March, which, together with 1O percent 
European suppliers, will give the 60-percent ratio that exempts 
Hungarian Suzukis from European Union customs duty.  Suzuki 
officials think there will be a further need for investment 
supported by the finance and industry ministries.  Last year, eight 
firms supplying Suzuki received financial support or interest 
preferences worth a total of 200 million forints.  This was used to 
help upgrade production to replace imports from Japan.  (Budapest 
MTI in English 1006 GMT 20 Jan 94 AU) 
   GE INVESTS $30-50 MILLION PER YEAR IN HUNGARY:  The U.S. General 
Electric (GE) company invests $30-50 million a year in its Hungarian 
projects.  According to GE's plans, Hungary will continue to be its 
European manufacturing center.  After lay-offs in the initial 
period, the company has created 1,500 jobs.  Also announced was that 
Tungsram, an affiliate of General Electric Lighting Europe, is to 
end 1993 with a profit.  (Budapest MTI in English 1522 GMT 25 Jan 94 
AU) 
   MALEV TO LEASE BACK BOEING 767'S FOR U.S. FLIGHTS:  Hungarian 
airlines MALEV is expected to deal with a cash crisis by signing a 
deal with a U.S. airline in the next two weeks to have its two 
Boeing-767 aircraft jointly operating on the Budapest-New York route 
this summer.  The aircraft were sold to a Cayman Islands firm fully 
owned by MALEV, which will then lease the aircraft back.  Malev 
bought the two 767's last year and flew them jointly with Italian 
airline Alitalia on a Budapest-Rome-New York route.  (Alitalia has a 
third of MALEV's shares.)  By the end of 1993, the aircraft had 
caused losses of $2 million.  The flights were well booked, but only 
because of low ticket prices forced on MALEV by strong competition. 
Revenue also suffered because the aircraft made stops in Rome. 
MALEV lost 1 billion forints in 1993, with big exchange rate costs 
on loans coming from devaluations of the Hungarian forint. 
(Budapest MTI in English 1722 GMT 24 Jan 94 AU) 
   NEW POWER STATION FOR BUDAPEST WORLD EXPO:  A new 180-megawatt 
block is to be completed at the Budapest Power Station of Kelenfold. 
To be constructed by the joint Hungarian-Italian company Ganz 
Ansaldo -- from World Bank and European Investment Bank credit -- 
the new block will not only produce electricity but will heat 50,000 
flats with what is called "tired steam."  The 260 million forint 
investment will be completed in the second half of 1995.  The new 
unit will completely meet European noise and pollution standards and 
is intended to be a reference establishment for the Hungarian 
electricity industry.  The Kelenfold Power Station supplies energy, 
including distance heating, to one of the country's largest regions, 
which includes the suburbs of Kelenfold, Gazdagret, and Budapest 
Castle.  Experts believe this new project will promote Hungary's 
increasing independence in energy supplies.  The new power station 
is expected to play a major part in energy supply for the 1996 World 
Expo.  (Budapest MTI in English 1123 GMT 21 Jan 94 AU) 
   ENERGY USE ROSE IN 1993:  The greater use of energy last year was 
mainly due to more intensive heating in the winter period, the State 
Authority for Energy Management and Energy Safety reported.  Total 
energy consumption was 1,067 petajoules in 1993, nearly 10 percent 
up on 1992.  The share of domestic production was 48.4 percent, 2.8 
percent down on the previous year.  Within the total energy 
consumption, the proportion of coal fell from 18.2 percent in 1992 
to 15.9 percent last year.  Domestic coal production totalled 14.5 
million tons, and imports amounted to 1.17 million tons.  Oil 
production was 1.7 million tons and natural gas production 5 billion 
cubic meters, 0.25 billion more than in 1992.  Including imports of 
6 million tons of oil and 5.87 billion cubic meters of gas, 
hydrocarbons accounted for 67.8 percent of energy use.  Electricity 
consumption rose by 0.5 percent and consumption was close to 35,000 
gigawatt-hours, including imports of 2,474 gigawatt-hours, which 
covered 7.1 percent of consumption, compared with 10 percent in 
1992.  (Budapest MTI in English 1143 GMT 25 Jan 94 AU) 
   NUMBER OF BUSINESS ORGANIZATIONS INCREASES:  The number of 
business organizations continued to increase last year, with units 
financed from the central budget being the only exception to the 
rule.  Business organizations without legal personality showed the 
sharpest increase.  According to a recent report of the Central 
Statistical Office, in late 1993 there were 85,638 business 
organizations with legal personality, 23.4 percent more than a year 
before, in the country.  Business organizations without legal 
personality numbered 98,036, 13.6 percent more than in late 
December.  The number of private entrepreneurs increased by 13.6 
percent, to 688,843.  The structure of business organizations 
changed to a slight extent:  35 percent of them were specialized in 
trade, 20 percent in industry, 18 percent in real estate and 
services, and 10 percent in construction.  In the category of 
private entrepreneurs, 35 percent were artisans, 35 percent traders, 
and 20 percent intellectuals.  (Budapest MTI in English 1300 GMT 25 
Jan 94 AU) 
   SEPARATE STATE FUNDS MAY BE MERGED:  The Finance Ministry plans 
to present draft legislation to the government which will merge 
certain separate state funds and eliminate overlaps between 
individual funds.  As the funds are regulated by law, only 
Parliament has the authority to change them.  Under the law on 
public finances, as of last year, only separate state funds that 
have been set up by legislation are eligible for central budget 
support.  Seven funds were established under one law:  funds for 
tourism, trade development, investment promotion, water management, 
environmental protection, market intervention, and regional 
development.  A further six agricultural funds were set up under one 
law and other funds are regulated by individual laws.  The draft 
bill proposes that all funds connected with economic development be 
merged.  This would involve the creation of a single fund, managed 
by the Finance Ministry, to replace the existing separate funds for 
employment, regional development, investment promotion, trade 
development, and technical development. 
   I 1993, just over a third of the funds' total income came from 
central budget support, and this year the proportion will fall to 
slightly over a sixth, even though the total income of the funds 
will be 20 billion forints higher this year than last.  Other 
sources of income for the funds this year include 26 billion forints 
from tax revenue allocated directly to the funds, of which 15 
billion forints will go to the Road Fund.  The total revenue from 
contributions from the corporate sector will be 60 billion forints, 
of which 50 billion forints will come from employers' contributions 
to the Solidarity Fund.  Employees' contributions will generate a 
further 15 billion forints, and 28 billion forints will come from 
the income from privatization, of which 13.5 billion forints will go 
to the Employment Fund.  The other resources of the funds are sums 
carried over from last year, various capital income, and credit. 
This year the Road Fund plans to take out the largest single amount 
of credit, almost 20 billion forints. 
   Managers of the separated state funds and the amount of their 
subsidies: 
BOT 
Name of the Fund         Manager           Budget       Total Income 
                                          Subsidy 

                                      1993      1994         1994 
                                    Expected  Targeted     Targeted 
National Forestry Fund      FM         ---       200        2,600 
Land Protection Fund        FM         ---       ---          440 
Fish Farming Fund           FM         ---       ---           88 
Animal Breeding Fund        FM         ---       ---          390 
Agricultural Development 
   Fund                     FM         ---     2,000        6,000 

Tourism Fund                IKM      1,500       200        2,000 
Trade Development Fund      NGKM     2,900     2,020        2,820 
Investment Promotion Fund   NGKM       700       600        1,003 
Water Management Fund       KHVM       ---       ---        4,050 
"Catching up With Europe" 
   Higher Education Fund     MKM     1,000     1,600        1,850 
Professional Training Fund   MUM       ---       ---        2,057 

Central Youth Fund          MEH        100        36           80 
National Cultural Fund      MKM        ---       133          925 

OTKA                        MEH      2,440     1,920        1,928 
Environment Protection 
   Fund                     KPM        ---       ---        5,030 
Technical Development Fund  MEH        ---     4,680        5,280 
Market Intervention Fund    IKM        150       ---          651 
Employment Fund             MUM     21,500       ---       21,400 
Regional Development Fund   KTM     31,000       ---        8,400 
Solidarity Fund             MUM     52,000    16,380       81,600 
Rehabilitation Fund          NM        ---       100          540 
Refugee Support Fund       BM 4      1,000       900          922 
Road Fund                  KHVM        ---     6,100       46,370 
Expo Fund                    VP     13,700       ---       24,300 
Orszsgows Jatek Alap         PM        ---       ---        1,002 

Small Investor Guarantee 
   Fund Third Party         KGA        ---       ---       11,000 
Vehicle and Compensation 
   Fund                      PM      1,000     1,900        2,669 
Wage Guarantee Fund         MUM        ---       600        1,800 
National Sports Fund       0TSH        ---       ---          400 

Total:                              76,990    40,369      237,716 
eot 
Abbreviations: 
FM    -- Agricultural Ministry 
IKM   -- Industry and Trade Ministry 
NGKM  -- Ministry of International Economic Relations 
KHVM  -- Ministry of Transportation, Telecommunications, and Water 
         Management 
MKM   -- Ministry of Education 
MUM   -- Ministry of Labor 
MEH   -- Prime Minister's Office 
KTM   -- Ministry of Environment Protection and Regional Development 
NM    -- Welfare Ministry 
(Budapest MTI in English 1757 GMT 21 Jan 94 AU) 
   POLAND 
   OIL COMPANY TO HIRE NORWEGIAN RIG:  The Polish "Petrobaltic" 
company will rent the "West Beta" oil rig from the Norwegian firm 
"Smedvig AS," the Norwegian agency NTB announced on 27 January. 
Under a $6.1 million contract, signed for two years with a 
possibility of an extension for another two years, "Smedvig AS" will 
also launch the rig.  The Norwegian firm expects that this deal will 
be followed by more orders for oil equipment.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 1736 GMT 27 Jan 94 AU) 
   POLSAT RECEIVES LICENSE FOR NATIONWIDE TV CHANNEL:  The National 
Radio and Television Council on 27 January awarded the Polsat TV 
network a license to broadcast a nationwide television channel. 
Polsat, the only legal private TV broadcaster in Poland, was the 
first station to receive a satellite broadcasting license last year. 
The capital of Polsat amounts to 250 billion zlotys (Z) (about $11.6 
million, 97 percent of which is owned by Polish businessman Zygmunt 
Solorz.  Polsat plans two share issues in the future.  The first 
issue is planned to amount to 250 billion zlotys and the second to 
500 billion zlotys.  After the last issue the share of the company 
founders is to be limited to 25 per cent.  (Warsaw PAP in English 
1916 GMT 27 Jan 94 AU) 
   NESTLE DONATES $500,000 TO POZNAN HEALTH SERVICE:  The Swiss 
company Nestle on 27 January transferred $500,000 dollars to the 
Poznan provincial health service.  Nestle bought 47 percent of the 
shares in the Goplana joint-venture company in Poznan on 6 January. 
A spokesman for the governor of Poznan province said the money will 
be spent on opening a thoracic surgery department for children at 
the provincial lung and tuberculosis clinic.  (Warsaw PAP in English 
1933 GMT 27 Jan 94 AU) 
   REVENUE HIGHER, SPENDING LOWER IN 1993 BUDGET:  State budget 
revenues in 1993 were Z458.9 trillion (some $21.5 billion) or 5.9 
percent higher than forecast in the budget law, while expenditures 
amounted to Z502.7 trillion, 2.3 percent lower than the planned 
figure, the Finance Ministry's press office said in a document 
released on 28 January.  The budget deficit was Z43.8 trillion, 
compared with the planned Z81 trillion figure.  According to the 
Finance Ministry, income was higher due to the better implementation 
of VAT and excise tax, an effective collection of advance income 
taxes, as well as higher payments of profits of the National Bank of 
Poland.  Poland's budget expenditures were lower by Z11.8 trillion 
because subsidies for the social insurance fund and expenditures for 
foreign debt servicing were cut by Z5.9 and Z4 trillion, 
respectively.  According to the ministry, there were Z4.2 trillion 
left in the Treasury.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1454 GMT 28 Jan 94 AU) 
   1993 ECONOMIC STATISTICS:  According to the Central Statistical 
Office, the GNP in 1993 increased by 4 percent, industrial and 
agricultural production went up, unemployment figures did not 
decrease, and inflation remained high.  The purchasing power of the 
zloty also declined.  In 1993 prices went up by 35.3 percent.  Such 
a high inflation rate was caused mainly by increases in the cost of 
energy, transport, telecommunications, and fuel.  Unemployment was 
still high in 1993, amounting to 15.7 percent in December.  There 
were 2,889,600 unemployed people registered in job centers.  The 
budget deficit was lower than the amount envisaged in the budget law 
and amounted to Z44 trillion (over $2 billion).  Imports exceeded 
exports by $3.5 billion, which was connected with an increase of 
imports by 47 percent in comparison with 1992 before the 
introduction of VAT.  At the same time, exports went up by only 24.1 
percent.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1808 GMT 28 Jan 94 AU) 
   SCANIA BUS, TRUCK PLANT OPENS IN SLUPSK:  The Polish-Swedish 
joint venture which produces Scania trucks and buses has opened a 
factory in Slupsk.  The company was set up in the autumn of 1992 by 
the Swedish firm "Scania Trucks and Bus" and the Polish state 
enterprise "Kapena".  Since that time the firm has produced 80 
trucks of various kinds.  The success of the company led to the 
decision to manufacture buses.  These buses will be made with 
Swedish parts at first, which will gradually be replaced by Polish 
parts.  The first buses will be deployed in the Slupsk transport 
system.  Scania hopes its investment in Slupsk will be a springboard 
for future investments in East European markets, especially in the 
republics of the former Soviet Union.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2118 
GMT 29 Jan 94 AU) 
   PUBLIC DEBT EXPECTED TO GROW IN 1994:  The public debt stood at 
1,372 trillion zlotys (Z), approximately $64 billion, at the end of 
last year, Piotr Dziewulski of the Finance Ministry said on 2O 
January.  Of that total, some Z360 trillion represented domestic 
debts, while the rest was due to foreign creditors.  The ministry 
expects that in 1994 the overall debt will increase to some Z1,7OO 
trillion zlotys, of which some Z500 trillion will be sums due to 
internal creditors and some Z1,200 trillion will be in foreign debt. 
Last year the state budget paid Z48 trillion zlotys of interest on 
domestic debts and another 12 trillion in interest on foreign debts. 
This year the expected figures are 82 and 30 trillion respectively. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1503 GMT 20 Jan 94 AU) 
   NEW TREASURY BONDS TO BE ISSUED:  New kinds of treasury bonds are 
to be offered to Polish and foreign investors starting in February. 
The first issues of two- and five-year bonds, carrying fixed 
interest rates of 18 and 15 percent per annum respectively, will be 
sold at auctions from 17 February until 19 May 1994.  The auctions 
are open to Polish and foreign natural and legal persons willing to 
buy not less than Z1O billion (about $450,000) worth of the 
securities.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1509 GMT 20 Jan 94 AU) 
   AGREEMENT ON ECONOMIC COOPERATION WITH ISRAEL:  The Central 
Office of Planning (CUP) and the Israeli Ministry of Economics and 
Planning signed a joint communique announcing the establishment of 
closer cooperation in selected areas between the two ministries and 
cooperation that would create conditions for joint actions of 
economic units, CUP Chief Miroslaw Pietrewicz told correspondents 
after a four-day visit to Poland by Israeli Economics and Planning 
Minister Shimon Shetrit.  Shetrit headed a delegation of Israeli 
businessmen whose task was to find ways of stepping up trade and 
tourist exchange between the two countries.  Shetrit said that 
"politicians have marked out the roads, but it is businessmen who 
will drive along them."  (Warsaw PAP in English 1519 GMT 20 Jan 94 
AU) 
   SWEDISH PETROCHEMICAL CONCERN TO INVEST IN POLAND:  The Swedish 
petrochemical concern OK Petroleum has announced plans to invest 
some $17 million in Poland.  Sven-Erik Zachrisson, managing director 
of the concern, said that in the first stage of its presence in 
Poland, OK plans to sell its gasoline which, according to experts, 
is the cleanest and environmentally friendliest in the world at this 
moment.  The concern also has plans to open its own depots and later 
on build a network of gasoline stations together with the Norwegian 
Statoil concern.  Zachrisson said the concern has initially 
earmarked almost $17 million for investments in Poland, not 
including the costs of the building of gasoline stations.  (Warsaw 
PAP in English 1525 GMT 20 Jan 94 AU) 
   DOUBLE TAXATION AGREEMENT WITH LITHUANIA:  Marek Borowski and 
Eduardas Vilkelis, the finance ministers of Poland and Lithuania, 
signed an agreement on barring double taxation on 20 January.  "This 
is the third in a series of agreements Poland has signed with the 
Baltic states.  It ends the series and undoubtedly takes us closer 
to a Polish-Lithuanian treaty.  This is a good sign in our 
neighborly relations," Borowski told correspondents.  Stressing the 
importance of the agreement for the development of bilateral trade 
relations and the conclusion of the treaty, Vilkelis said the 
agreement will create favorable conditions and opportunities for 
political and economic cooperation of the two countries and the 
growth of their economies.  The agreement is also of considerable 
significance for over small 500 joint venture manufacturing and 
trading companies that have their operations in Lithuania.  Poland 
and Lithuania signed an agreement on mutual trade and economic 
cooperation in February 1992 and since then have developed their 
trade exchange in all branches of the economy, chiefly in the 
construction materials industry, the food-processing sector, 
finances, banking, tourism, and health care.  Poland's Ministry for 
Foreign Economic Relations claims that there are possibilities of 
increasing Polish-Lithuanian trade exchange in such sectors as 
agriculture, construction, maritime economy, and timber industry. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1542 GMT 20 Jan 94 AU) 
   IMPROVEMENT OF GERMAN BORDER CROSSINGS:  Poland and Germany have 
agreed on the need to adjust the pace of the modernization of the 
existing Polish-German border crossings and build new ones to cope 
with the constantly growing border traffic.  Polish Minister of 
Transport Boguslaw Liberadzki, returning to Warsaw on 2O January 
after talks with his German counterpart Mathias Wismann, said they 
focused on structural and legal reforms in rail transport and on 
Polish-German border crossings.  Liberadzki said that last year saw 
an "explosion" of Polish-German border traffic.  Poland's western 
border was crossed by some 80 million people in 1993.  He said that 
construction works at the Swinoujscie-Garz crossing and the building 
of bridges in the border towns of Jedrzychowice and Zgorzelec should 
end this year.  The ministry also plans to modernize border 
crossings in Swiecko and Podroze and, taking advantage of credits 
from the World Bank and PHARE (Economic Reconstruction Aid for 
Poland and Hungary) programme, develop the existing crossings in 
Kolbaskowo, Olszyna and Gubin, all on Poland's western frontier. 
   Liberadzki said he also discussed with Minister Wismann the 
possible construction of German-Czech freeway going through the 
Polish region of Turoszow.  Poland is currently studying documents 
received from the German Ministry of Transport.  Liberadzki also 
announced that the Transport Ministry will examine the proposal by 
the German air carrier Lufthansa to become a strategic partner of 
LOT Polish Airlines.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1609 GMT 20 Jan 94 AU) 
   ONE-THIRD OF STATE FARMS PRIVATIZED IN 1993:  The Agricultural 
Property Agency of the State Treasury last year managed to sell or 
lease into private hands almost one-third of land formerly under 
cultivation by the state farms.  Of the 3.3 million hectares 
formerly managed by these farms, 890,000 hectares were leased and 
another 58,000 hectares sold to private owners.  The agency put to 
the bloc last year 1.7 million hectares of state farm land, of which 
nearly 57 percent found customers.  The land still remaining to be 
sold (about 2.1 million hectares) has been under temporary 
administration by treasury plenipotentiaries.  The agency hopes to 
speed up the process of privatization this year, largely thanks to 
the new regulations that took effect on 19 January.  The amended law 
on agricultural property of the State Treasury now allows greater 
flexibility in fixing starting prices at auctions and offers more 
favorable terms to buyers of land.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1728 GMT 
20 Jan 94 AU) 
   SURVEY SHOWS RISING PRODUCTION, SLOWER EXPORTS:  A poll conducted 
by the Central Office of Planning (CUP) in 135 enterprises shows 
that most plants expect the growing production trend to continue but 
feel export sales will slow down.  In a similar poll carried out 
last November, 35 percent of the polled firms reported growing 
production.  In December, the figure was 31 percent, while the 
expectations for January stand at 22 percent.  In November, 45 
percent of the enterprises covered by the poll reported growing 
export sales.  In December, the figure was 40 percent, while 
expectations for January stand at 20 percent.  (Warsaw PAP in 
English 2016 GMT 20 Jan 94 AU) 
   POLISH, UKRAINIAN AIRLINES TO EXPAND COOPERATION:  The deputy 
ministers of transport from Poland and Ukraine signed an agreement 
in Warsaw enabling regular air services between Polish and Ukrainian 
cities.  The already existing regular connections between Warsaw, 
Lvov, and Kiev will be extended to two more cities in each of the 
countries.  This is the first agreement between Poland and 
independent Ukraine, said Polish Ministry of Transport spokeswoman 
Marzena Grabiszewska-Gryka.  Until now, the services have been based 
on an agreement with the former Soviet Union.  Ukrainian Deputy 
Minister of Transport Nikolai Marchenko asked the Polish Ministry of 
Transport for aid in training Ukrainian aviation administration 
staff.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2102 GMT 20 Jan 94 AU) 
   FREEWAY CONSTRUCTION PLANNED:  Some 2,500 kilometers of freeway 
are to be built in Poland, according to Transport Minister Boguslaw 
Liberadzki said.  The Government Economic Committee (KERN) examined 
a bill on the building of freeways on 21 January.  The government 
plans to build the following freeways:  A-1 Gdansk-Cieszyn, A-2 
Swiecko-Terespol, A-3 Szczecin-Czechy, and A-4 Wroclaw-Przemysl 
motorways.  The latter s to have a branch from Wroclaw to Lodz.  The 
expressways will be built by investors who will win licenses for 
this by way of a tender.  The land through which the freeways will 
pass will be purchased.  Construction costs will be recouped by 
means of tolls.  The building of one kilometer of expressway costs 
about $2.5-3 million.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1612 GMT 21 Jan 94 AU) 
   NEW BANKNOTES WITH ANTI-COUNTERFEIT FEATURES:  New high- 
denomination banknotes incorporating anti-counterfeit features are 
to be introduced as of 24 January 24, the National Bank of Poland 
has announced.  The new notes, with face values of Z500,000 zlotys 
and Z1,000,000 are improved versions of the existing notes.  They 
are printed on better-quality paper, incorporating a new watermark 
and new security threads, which change color under ultra-violet 
light.  There are also slight color changes, although the basic 
design is largely unchanged from the existing notes of the same 
denominations.  The changes have been made in response to widespread 
concern over the increase in circulation of counterfeits of the 
higher denomination Polish banknotes.  However, the existing 500,000 
and 1,000,000 zloty notes are to remain in circulation alongside the 
new ones, and will be replaced only as they become worn out. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1730 GMT 22 Jan 94 AU) 
   THIRD ANNIVERSARY OF STOCK EXCHANGE:  Wieslaw Rozlucki, president 
of the Warsaw Stock Exchange, presented Prime Minister Waldemar 
Pawlak with one share in the Warsaw exchange at the inauguration of 
the third year of its operations on 24 January.  The prime minister 
gave the president a green clover as a sign of good luck.  Under the 
stock market regulations, one share in the stock exchange makes its 
holder eligible to apply for direct participation in stock market 
tradings.  The prime minister may thus open its own brokerage house 
provided that he is granted a license from the Securities 
Commission.  "The stock market is very useful for the budget as a 
seller of shares in privatized companies.  The history of this 
institution proves that it performs the role of market pricing of 
enterprises well," Pawlak said. 
   Rozlucki recalled that 1993 was very successful for investors 
contrary to the previous years when prices of most shares had been 
noting markdowns.  In 1993, prices of securities rose over 10 fold 
and turnover 40-fold, Rozlucki said.  Prizes for the best brokerage 
houses were awarded during the inaugural ceremony, with the Central 
Brokerage Office winning as regards turnover and the Wielkopolski 
Credit Bank winning as regards a rise in the number of customers. 
(Warsaw PAP in English 1838 GMT 24 Jan 94 AU) 
   STRUDER PROGRAM TO SUPPORT INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS:  The Struder 
program of support for regional development, under which some 14 
million ECU are to be earmarked for concrete infrastructure projects 
in Silesia, was unveiled on 25 January in Gliwice, Katowice 
province, Tuesday to representatives of rural districts of the 
province.  Subsidies for public investments are to be granted to 
districts on condition that they prepare a project of a venture 
designed to stimulate economic development, create new jobs and 
encourage enterprise in the region.  The districts are also expected 
to finance a minimum of 30 percent of the total costs of a venture, 
Tadeusz Schoepe, director of the Friedrich Ebert Foundation, which 
organized a seminar on the issue, said.  Struder is one of the 
European Union programs that covers regions especially threatened 
with unemployment.  The Silesian office of the Struder programme has 
been operating since 1992.  (Warsaw PAP in English 1200 GMT 25 Jan 
94 AU) 
   SWISS PACKAGING FIRM TO INVEST IN LODZ:  "Rig Rentsch," the 
biggest European producer of paper packaging, has bought the 
"Polgraf" printers in Lodz and intends to build its own factory on 
the site.  The firm wants to invest $8 million over the space of 
three years and eventually employ 90 workers.  "Rentsch Poland" will 
produce cardboard packaging for cigarettes, cosmetics, and food 
products for those Western clients of "Rig Rentsch" who have their 
factories in Poland.  Raw materials will come from Scandinavia, 
mainly from Finland, although Rentsch does not exclude buying raw 
materials in Poland.  "Rig Rentsch Industrie Holding AG" has 10 
factories in 7 West European countries.  (Warsaw PAP in English 2137 
GMT 25 Jan 94 AU) 
   ROMANIA 
   OLTENITA BUILDING RIVER SHIP FOR SWISS CUSTOMER:  The Navol Stock 
ship-building company of Oltenita has signed a contract on the 
building of a second passenger river ship, apt to accommodate more 
than 150 in special comfort conditions, for a partner in 
Switzerland.  George Bozeanu, general manager of the company, says 
that the first ship being built for the same customer is in an 
advanced stage of assembly works.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 
0759 GMT 3 Feb 94 AU) 
   PRIVATIZATION PROSPECTS IN 1994:  The State Property Fund (FPS) 
privatized 40 companies in the first month of this year.  The total 
number of enterprises that turned private is currently 293 with a 
total number of more than 83,000 employees.  The State Property 
Fund's nominal capital is about 61 billion lei and the number of 
shares sold by it is 9,116,107, with a total value of 82.2 billion 
lei.  The FPS privatization offer through stock sale for 1994 is 
estimated at 2,368 companies including 1,930 small, 403 medium and 
35 big ones.  Out of the privatized companies the most numerous are 
handle building activities (74), home trade (44), services (26) and 
ready-mades and textile industry (10).  The most numerous companies 
within this year's privatization offer will be farming ones, that 
is, 1,036.  Eligible for privatization are also 280 industrial 
companies, 215 trade ones, 141 transport companies, 131 food 
industry companies, 100 building and 27 travel companies. 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0849 GMT 3 Feb 94 AU) 
   OIL, NATURAL GAS EXTRACTION PROSPECTS:  The extractive industry 
turnover in 1993 was 1.649 billion lei, of which the Romgaz and 
Petrom companies' contribution to it was 18.3 percent, announced the 
Ministry of Industries in its news conference on February 3.  As 
many as 6.63 million tons of crude and 20.117 billion cu.m. natural 
gas were extracted last year and gas imports totalled 4.6 billion 
cu.m.  The major targets of the respective branch for the year are 
to reach the crude and gas extraction level of 1993, secure 
financing through European Bank for Reconstruction and Development 
loans for the project of recovery of the extractive sector and 
augmentation of underground storage capacities.  (Bucharest ROMPRES 
in English 1024 GMT 4 Feb 94 AU) 
   AGRICULTURE MINISTER REVIEWS 1993 RESULTS:  The 1993 agricultural 
production exceeded the 1992 one with about 3 million tons of grain, 
1 million tons of potatoes, 500,000 tons of grapes and 1 million 
tons of other fruits, said Agriculture Minister loan Oancea.  In 
1993 milk and eggs production leveled the 1992 production, while 
meat production fell by about 300 tons.  The fall was explained by 
the agriculture minister through the lack of fodder and funds, 
especially in the state sector.  Food exports mounted in 1993 to 
over $55 million which means a 15 percent fall compared with 1992. 
1993 is the first year when the production decline flattened out for 
several items such as oil, margarine, vegetables, fruit, beer and 
wines.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1308 GMT 7 Feb 94 AU) 
   AGRICULTURE MINISTER DISCUSSES RESTRUCTURING:  A new phase in the 
restructuring of Romanian agriculture is about to start, which is 
intended to replace a number of links in the food-processing chain 
and to do away with monopolies in services for agriculture, Romanian 
Minister of Agriculture and Food loan Oancea says in an interview. 
516 agricultural machines units will be passed into private hands 
over 1994-1996 and consequently competition is likely to appear. 
Minister Oancea mentions that last year private owners bought most 
of the 16,138 tractors on the domestic market.  Private farmers own 
44,000 of the existing 149,000 tractors.  Services for agriculture 
are expected to turn into an efficient lever for agriculture 
activities.  A number of food-processing companies in which the 
state holds most of the capital at present are also expected to get 
privatised until 1996, Oancea said.  (Bucharest ROMPRES English 1409 
GMT 7 Feb 94 AU) 
   LEGAL FRAMEWORK FOR ISSUANCE OF STATE BONDS:  The convention on 
the issue of sales and redemption of state bonds, concluded between 
the Ministry of Finance, as issuing party, and the National Bank of 
Romania, as state's agent, was signed in Bucharest, on January 31. 
"It is an historic moment", stressed Finance Minister Florin 
Georgescu, referring to the significance of the convention, that 
stipulates the issuance by the state of its own bonds to finance the 
budget deficit and such important actions of large public interest 
as road and bridge building, environment protection programs, etc. 
The Finance Ministry and the National Bank, together with the U.S. 
State Treasury, have established the technical details for a first 
issue of state bonds, worth lOO billion lei.  "After more than 50 
years, the legal framework of state bonds issue is established, 
resuming thus a tradition in Romania", said National Bank Governor 
Mugur Isarescu.  "To begin with we will apply to institutions, 
insurance companies, the State Property Fund, commercial banks and 
even commercial companies with very good liquidities", he added. 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1721 GMT 7 Feb 94 AU) 
   CONSTANTA MARITIME, COMMODITY EXCHANGE:  With a capital of 
420,000,000 lei and 139 shareholders, the recently established 
Constanta Maritime and Commodity Exchange, mostly with private 
capital, plans a specialization in maritime, farming, tourist 
service and general commodities markets.  Placed near the Constanta 
Port and the Agigea Free Zone, the Constanta Exchange is open to new 
members and has already established relations with similar 
institutions in Romania and abroad such as Britain, Italy, the 
Netherlands, Bulgaria, Germany, Russia.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in 
English 1040 GMT 9 Feb 94 AU) 
   ECONOMIC RELATIONS WITH VIETNAM:  Raw material in shortage in the 
Romanian economy will be brought from Vietnam in 1994, Romanian 
Commerce Minister Cristian Ionescu told ROMPRES on his coming back 
from a recent session of a Joint Romanian-Vietnamese Commission. 
The trade balance has looked even in the recent years as Romania has 
exported none but imported goods from Vietnam on account of 
Vietnam's debts to Romania.  The Joint Commission has agreed that 
Vietnam pay out its debt through commodity deliveries worth about 
seven million rubles yearly.  The debt would be further denominated 
in rubles as a hard currency denomination would have come to be 
detrimental on Romania's interests, said Minister Ionescu who added 
that the Joint Commission works had marked the normalization of the 
economic relations between Romania and Vietnam. 
   In the context, the Romanian commerce minister said the 
Commission had found out opportunities for Romanian exports to 
Vietnam such as Dacia cars for the Vietnamese Police and other 
public authorities, drilling equipment, electric railway engines to 
replace the older ones imported also from Romania in the 8O's. 
"These goods will be paid for in hard currency or through goods 
swaps," said Minister Ionescu.  The Romanian cars are going to be 
paid for in hard currency, the tires would be swapped for Vietnamese 
natural rubber and the drilling equipment for crude oil.  (Bucharest 
ROMPRES in English 1102 GMT 9 Feb 94 AU) 
   PROJECTS TO IMPROVE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK:  Under a $403.4 
million project to increase efficiency and adjust the road traffic 
network in Romania to international standards, the World Bank is to 
bring financing of $120 million, the EBRD is to contribute $80 
million and the European Bank of Investment $80 million, to which 
$123.4 million are to be added from Romania's Government.  The 
project envisages an improvement of the 1,000 km of national routes, 
in view of a daily flow between 2,000 and 10,000 vehicles, most of 
them part of the master routes connecting the West with the East of 
the continent.  Moreover, modernization of border crossing points at 
Nadlac, Varsad, Borsa, Siret, Albita, and Calafat is also in view to 
ease international traffic, reads an article in the weekly 
ECONOMISTUL.  Works concerning the safety of routes are to include 
placement of international road signs and milestones on 5,000 km. 
(the total length of European routes in Romania), in view of 
bringing more information and security on road traffic. 
   Investment for railway transport will help purchase of railway 
network maintenance equipment, spares and an improvement of the data 
processing system under the program of restructuring of the Romanian 
railway network and help correlate it to international networks. 
The article reads that the World Bank has already started to grant 
assistance for operations related to reform in the transport system 
also by elaborating studies with international standards as starting 
point.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 1243 GMT 9 Feb 94 ) 
   FOREIGN CAPITAL INVESTMENT IN ROMANIA:  Germany ranks first among 
the countries represented in Romania by companies with foreign 
capital participation, with 3,821 such companies registered over 
December 1990-December 1993, according to a report issued by the 
National Trade Register.  In point of the amount of subscribed 
nominal capital, Italy first comes with 58,438.3 million lei, 17.6 
percent of it in hard currency.  Syria and Turkey are both 
registered with 2,380 mixed-capital companies each, followed by 
Jordan (more than 1,500), Hungary and the United States (more than 
1,300 each) and Lebanon (more than 1,100 companies).  Even though 
ranking 12th in point of the number of companies with capital 
investment in Romania, France distinguished itself with a 33,500 
million lei subscribed capital (11.3 percent in hard currency), 
similar to the German capital of some 33,500 million lei with a 10.5 
percent share in hard currency.  A lower share is held by a total of 
127 countries represented in Romania in point of subscribed capital 
investment, half of them with a foreign capital lower than 10 
million lei.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0453 GMT 27 Jan 94 AU) 
   PRIVATIZATION PROSPECTS IN INDUSTRY:  So far 27 state-owned 
companies have been turned to the private sector.  Some are in the 
textile industry, others in the wood processing, electrical, 
electronic, and chemical branches, in oil and gas drilling, machine- 
building, all cumulating a nominal capital of 1.8 billion lei.  The 
information comes from VOCEA ROMANIEI (Romania's Voice), the 
government's newspaper, which carries an interview with Industry 
Minister Dumitru Popescu.  A standard methodology was elaborated in 
June 1993 for the assessment of the companies' degree of 
profitability and solvency.  The selection for privatization is a 
continuous process that gives Premier Vacaroiu's statement that 
"1994 will be the year of wide-scale privatization" the chance to 
make this come true in industry, the minister said.  He is also 
quoted as having said that "industry still furnishes over 45 percent 
of the gross domestic product, over 50 percent of the national 
budget, about 90 percent of Romania's exports, and keeps 45 percent 
of the work force employed.  The main assets of the industrial 
sector are well trained hands, specialists with a solid technical 
education comparable to Western standards.  Most sectors, the 
minister opined, have the force to survive free market competition 
provided the necessary technological updating is done at moderate 
and short-term recoverable costs and that the social protection 
rules stipulated by the international regulations Romania has 
adhered to are observed.  Romanian industry is also capable, 
Minister Dumitru Popescu said, to cover its own imports from 
exports, many Romanian suppliers being well known on the 
international market for years.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0402 
GMT 28 Jan 94 AU) 
   1993 INDUSTRIAL OUTPUT, 1994 PROJECTIONS:  The industry of road 
transportation means ranks first in point of growth in 1993 with 
125.7 percent, followed by furniture, 129.7 percent, the industry of 
communications equipment, radio and television sets, 119.2 percent, 
the rubber and plastics processing industry, 105.9 percent, rail, 
sea and air means of transportation, 112.7 percent, the chemical 
industry and that of synthetic fibers, 103.9 percent.  "Energy- 
greedy" industrial sectors and those based on imports, such as the 
paper and pulp industry and textiles reported drops in 1993 as 
against 1992.  The production of the units subordinated to the 
Ministry of Industries will grow by 2-4 percent in 1994, the 
ministry estimates.  Most branches are expected to redress (as 
received), with important growth in electricity and heating -- 3-5 
percent; textiles, leatherware -- 5-7 percent; chemistry and 
petrochemicals -- 3-4 percent; machine-building -- 4-6 percent; and 
the wood-processing industry -- 4-5 percent.  A 2 percent drop is 
estimated in crude and natural gases extraction in 1994 against 
1993.  Estimates for 1994 have taken into account both data from 
economic units and departments and expected effects due to the 
improvement of the legislative and institutional framework. 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0417 GMT 28 Jan 94 AU) 
   JANUARY FOREIGN INVESTMENTS:  620 joint companies with a nominal 
capital of $14.8 million were registered with the Romanian Agency 
for Development in January.  Compared with the same month of 1993, 
the number of newly created joint ventures dropped by 147 and the 
invested capital is $2.6 million less.  First in the standings of 
the foreign investors in January was Britain, with investments of 
$6.2 million and 16 joint ventures, followed by Italy with $1.4 
million and 63 joint ventures, Germany with $1.4 million and 39 
joint ventures.  The most numerous joint ventures were set up in 
January by Romanian entrepreneurs in cooperation with partners from 
Syria (80), Italy (63), China (50), Iran (46), and Iraq (42).  The 
total number of companies with foreign participation is now 29,753 
and their total nominal capital is $768.8 million.  (Bucharest 
ROMPRES in English 1000 GMT 2 Feb 94 AU) 
   NEW TIMISOARA-BUCHAREST TELEPHONE LINE:  A new telephone line 
between Timisoara (western Romania) and Bucharest, connecting 
several other important localities en route, will be finished in 
1994.  The project, estimated at around $30 million, will be 
financed by the European Bank for Reconstruction and Development. 
(Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0902 GMT 20 Jan 94 AU) 
   AIRCRAFT ENGINE PLANT:  The "Turbomecanica" plant is the only 
manufacturer of aircraft jet engines in Romania.  The company was 
set up in 1975 to revive an old tradition in Romanian aircraf t- 
manufacturing.  At present the company manufactures a wide range of 
items for the aircraft industry, as well as for other industrial 
fields.  The company is entirely state-owned and employs some 2,400 
people, many of whom have undergone highly specialized training in 
Romania and abroad.  There are 400 engineers working at 
"Turbomecanica," which can develop programs for aviation and other 
related economic fields.  The aviation profile (profile 1) consists 
of four types of engines (military and civilian) and spare parts for 
helicopters; some of the items are also exported.  The licenses for 
aircraft parts were bought from prestigious firms:  Rolls Royce 
(Britain), Turbomeca and Aerospatiale (France).  The second profile 
of the company involves manufacturing free turbines (for high-power 
gas pumping stations) as well as other parts derived from aircraft 
systems.  Within the same profile "Turbomecanica" manufactures parts 
for nuclear and medical equipment (like the "Dermojet," which has 
been approved by medical authorities), compressors for freezing 
units, compressed-air turbines, and so forth.  In view of the wide 
range of its products and the delicate fields they belong to, 
"Turbomecanica" strives to achieve high overall quality, in keeping 
with all international standards.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 
0804 GMT 21 Jan 94 AU) 
   ISSUANCE OF TREASURY BILLS PLANNED:  Treasury bills will be 
issued again in Romania as of February 1994, after 50 years of 
interruption -- an act regarded as a first step toward a capital 
market and the fulfillment of a major task of the agreement 
concluded last month with the IMF, under which Bucharest is to issue 
state bonds starting 1994.  The terms under which the issuance will 
be made are to be set by the Ministry of Finance together with the 
National Bank, with the latter acting as the government's agent in 
the issuing of state bonds.  The Ministry of Finance will study 
possibilities of issuing treasury bills at market rates, in an 
attempt to obtain some 20 billion lei and to partly finance the 
budget deficit.  (Bucharest ROMPRES in English 0758 GMT 25 Jan 94 
AU) 
   SLOVAKIA 
   SLOVENE BUSES TO BE PRODUCED IN BRATISLAVA:  Representatives of 
the Slovakia BUS shareholding company gave a briefing on a joint 
Slovak-Slovene project for producing buses.  These will be the most 
up-to-date models, with a long service life, at least 12 years, low 
maintenance costs, and environmentally friendly MAN engines.  It is 
reckoned that 50 buses will be produced this year; the maximum 
production capacity is 100 buses.  Each bus costs around 5.5 million 
korunas (Sk).  A new assembly building is to be built in Bratislava 
before the end of 1995.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 28 Jan 94 p 
2 AU) 
   STATE OWES PHARMACEUTICAL DISTRIBUTORS SK1.1 BILLION:  The 
Association of Private Distributors of Pharmaceuticals, Medicines, 
and Health Care Materials and Technology held a meeting in 
Bratislava on 27 January at which it discussed resolving its 
outstanding claims for the fourth quarter of 1993, the maximum 
prices for medicines, privatization, and agreements between 
pharmacies and regional national insurance companies. 
Representatives of the Health and Finance Ministries were also 
present.  The state owes the distributors Sk1.1 billion for the 
fourth quarter of last year, and it is not yet clear when this sum 
will be paid.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 28 Jan 94 p 3 AU) 
   INSTITUTE FORECASTS GDP DECLINE IN 1994:  According to the Slovak 
Forecasting Institute, the real gross domestic product will decline 
by between 0.8 percent and 3.3 percent in 1994 compared with 1993. 
In the opinion of P. Karasz, an expert at the Institute, it would be 
realistic to reckon with a further decline in households' 
consumption.  "Compared with last year, it is possible to estimate a 
0.7 percent to 1.4 percent decline," he said.  Despite the envisaged 
increase of 14 to 17 percent in the population's nominal disposable 
income, its real value will fluctuate around the level recorded in 
1993.  An increase between 1.8 percent and 4.6 percent is forecast 
in the gross generation of fixed capital.  (Bratislava NARODNA 
OBRODA in Slovak 28 Jan 94 p 24 AU) 
   PUBLIC POLLED ON STANDARD OF LIVING:  According to a public 
opinion poll conducted by the Statistical Office, 43 percent of 
citizens assess their standard of living as more poor than good; 15 
percent as poor; 34 percent as more good than poor; and 8 percent as 
good.  Seventy-three percent of citizens over the age of 60 take a 
negative view of their standard of living while 23 percent have a 
positive view.  Respondents with a university education assess their 
standard of living more positively than other groups.  Some 59 
percent of this group assess it positively, while 41 percent assess 
it negatively.  Citizens who support the Movement for a Democratic 
Slovakia (HZDS) assess it more positively than other groups, 62 
percent considering it to be good.  Eighty-seven percent of 
entrepreneurs rate their standard of living positively, compared to 
48 percent of blue-collar workers and 51 percent of white-collar 
workers.  Some 43 percent of citizens expect their standard of 
living to decline this year, 27 percent expect it to remain the 
same, and 16 percent expect it to improve.  (Bratislava SLOVENSKY 
DENNIK in Slovak 28 Jan 94 p 3 AU) 
   REPUBLIC RECEIVED 110 MILLION ECU FROM EIB IN 1993:  Last year, 
the European Investment Bank released 882 million ECU in credits for 
the countries of Central and Eastern Europe.  The fourth largest sum 
was released for Slovakia.  Of the overall sum of 110 million ECU, 
55 million were earmarked for gas extraction in the border region 
with Austria and the Czech Republic, 45 million for modernizing the 
telecommunications system, and 10 million for developing the trans- 
European road network.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 29 Jan 
94 p 1 AU) 
   EUROPEAN UNION ASKED FOR INCREASE IN EXPORT QUOTAS:  Slovakia has 
asked the European Union to increase its export quotas.  According 
to Finance Minister Julius Toth, this request is in harmony with the 
agreement reached in the GATT Uruguay Round.  Toth held talks in 
Brussels on 28 January with Henning Christopherson, EU senior 
commissioner for economic affairs, and was given an assurance that 
the trade barriers between the European Union and Eastern European 
countries would be further reduced and that the possibilities for 
exporting steel, leather products, and clothing to the European 
Union would be increased.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 29 
Jan 94 p 4 AU) 
   SCHOOL MEAL SUBSIDIES ABOLISHED ON 1 FEBRUARY:  Subsidies for 
school meals will be abolished as of 1 February.  The cost of meals 
in kindergartens will rise from Sk12 to Sk16 per day, in the lower 
grades of elementary schools from Sk1O to Sk14, in the higher grades 
of elementary schools from Sk12 to Sk16, and in secondary schools 
from Sk13 to Sk19.  (Bratislava-SME in Slovak 29 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   IMPORTED DRUGS NO LONGER EXEMPT FROM CUSTOMS DUTIES:  As of 15 
February, pharmaceuticals will no longer be exempt from import 
duties.  As a consequence of devaluation and revaluation, the cost 
of Czech pharmaceuticals will increase by an average of 8 percent. 
The cost of other foreign imported pharmaceuticals will increase by 
an average of 9 percent.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 29 Jan 94 p 2 
AU) 
   MOST TOURISTS TO REPUBLIC COME FROM HUNGARY:  More than 11.9 
million tourists visited Slovakia during the first 11 months of last 
year.  Most of them -- 6.2 million -- came from Hungary.  Almost 2.5 
million came from Austria, 2.4 million came from Poland, and 750,000 
came from Ukraine.  During the same period, 7.2 million Slovaks 
traveled abroad.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 31 Jan 94 
p 1 AU) 
   CONSUMER PRICES RISE 0.6 PERCENT IN DECEMBER:  According to an 
analysis conducted by the Statistical Office, consumer prices rose 
0.6 percent in December.  During 1993, they rose by 16.7 percent 
compared with December 1992 and by 23.2 percent compared with 1992 
as a whole.  Inflation also increased in December by 0.6 percent. 
(Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 31 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   ECONOMIC COUNCIL PROPOSES RAISING REGULATED PRICES:  According to 
the Economic Council, regulated prices account for roughly 5.0 
percent of the gross domestic product (GDP) and prices determined by 
agreement account for 95 percent.  This ratio should be maintained 
in 1994.  The Council is considering increasing certain maximum 
prices due to the reductions in state subsidies and increased costs. 
It is proposing that the maximum prices of drinking water for 
households be increased from Sk3.0 per cubic meter to Sk4.0 in the 
Bratislava region, or up to Sk8.0 per cubic meter in East Slovakia. 
Waste water prices would increase from Sk0.60 to Sk5.0 per cubic 
meter.  In railroad transportation, as a result of the reduction in 
non-investment subsidies from Sk2.3 billion to Sk2.06 billion, the 
Ministry of Transportation is proposing to increase the cost of pre- 
paid travel passes by 40 percent as of 1 February. 
   The ministry is also proposing to abolish workers' travel passes 
and replace them with a commercial discount in pre-paid travel 
passes.  In telecommunications, it is proposed that the charges for 
installing a telephone be increased by around 50 percent, from 
Sk2,000 to Sk3,000.  The increased value-added tax, from 5 to 6 
percent, should also be projected in the cost of telecommunications. 
As far as energy costs are concerned, it is proposed that as of 1 
April the cost of natural gas be increased by 25.6 percent and that 
electricity be increased by 35 percent.  Heating costs should rise 
by 20 percent as of 1 July.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 31 Jan 94 pp 
1,2 AU) 
   ENTREPRENEURS GROUP TO PAY NATIONAL INSURANCE LEVY:  The Party of 
Entrepreneurs and Tradesmen (SPZ) has reversed its decision not to 
pay national insurance levies for its members as of 1 February. 
(Bratislava SLOVENSKY DENNIK in Slovak 31 Jan 94 p 1 AU) 
   TESLA LIPTOVSKY HRADOK JOINT VENTURE:  Representatives from Tesla 
Liptovsky Hradok and Schrak Telecom AG of Austria signed an 
agreement in Bratislava on 31 January on founding the STT-Schrak 
Tesla Telekomunikacie limited company.  The basic capital for the 
joint enterprise, which will be based in Liptovsky Hradok, is Sk1.O 
million.  The Austrian company will own 60 percent of the enterprise 
and the Slovak side the remainder.  The enterprise aims to produce 
telecommunications equipment, and production should begin at the end 
of 1994.  The investment required for the first stage of production 
is 15 million Austrian schillings.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY 
in Slovak 1 Feb 94 p 2 AU) 
   REPUBLIC AGAIN EXCEEDS CLEARING CREDIT MARGIN:  At the end of 
January, the Slovak Republic was in the red by 176 million ECU in 
the clearing account with the Czech Republic.  This means it has 
exceeded its credit margin by 46 million ECU.  The National Bank 
will repay this amount to the Czech side by 15 February. 
(Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 1 Feb 94 p 1 AU) 
   PROPERTY FUND'S STAKE IN ENTERPRISES:  The National Property Fund 
owns an average of 38 percent of the shares in all privatized 
enterprises.  It owns all of the shares in more than 40 enterprises 
and more than 50 percent of the shares in more than 50 enterprises. 
(Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 1 Feb 94 p 3 AU) 
   PLANT IN KYSUCE LAYS OFF 491 WORKERS:  As of 1 February, 491 
workers will be laid off at the roller bearing plant in Kysuce. 
This means that the number of people employed at the plant will 
decline to 2,100.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 1 Feb 93 p 3 AU) 
   ORAVA TV PLANT IN JOINT ENTERPRISE WITH TAIWANESE FIRM:  Within 
two months of a joint agreement being signed by the Orava Television 
Plant (OTF) in Nizna, the Taiwanese company PROSYST Corporation, and 
the Association of Slovak Industrial Enterprises (ZSPP) in Martin, 
the production of new products should begin.  The agreement was 
signed on 25 January by Anton Grobarcik of OTF, Rong Chang of 
PROSYST Corporation, and Jozef Petrik of the ZSPP.  It will 
guarantee the production, export, and marketing of 
telecommunications and electronic equipment.  The new company will 
be known as PROSYST-OFT-ELEKTRONICS.  In 60 days, the company will 
begin to manufacture fax machines intended for businessmen and 
households.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 1 Feb 94 p 14 AU) 
   DAILY QUESTIONS OFFICIAL UNEMPLOYMENT STATISTICS:  The Bratislava 
daily PRAVDA recently questioned the accuracy of official 
unemployment statistics, which reflect the number of job applicants 
registered with labor offices, and argued that they "distort" the 
actual rate of unemployment.  As Mikulas Sliacky, the author of the 
article, pointed out, job applicants who do not find a job within 
six months after their registration with the labor office are 
automatically deleted from the official statistics of job seekers 
and are no longer considered unemployed for statistical purposes. 
He suggested that, by means of this ploy, some 229,400 people who 
were jobless did not figure in the official unemployment statistics 
for October 1993.  Had these people been included, Sliacky said, 
October 1993 unemployment rate would have been 22.8 percent, rather 
than 13.8 percent.  (Bratislava PRAVDA in Slovak 8 Jan 94 p 1 AU) 
   ONLY ONE-THIRD OF UNEMPLOYED RECEIVE BENEFITS:  A total of 
122,853 persons were receiving unemployment benefits at the end of 
December 1993, which was 33.38 percent of the registered unemployed 
(368,095).  Since the end of November 1993, the number of recipients 
of unemployment benefits has declined by 1,599.  (Bratislava 
SLOVENSKY DENNIK in Slovak 19 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   EAST SLOVAK UNEMPLOYMENT:  The number of jobless in eastern 
Slovakia reached 123,000, or 17.35 percent, at the end of 1993 out 
of a total of 368,OOO (14.44 percent) in the whole of Slovakia, 
SLOVENSKY VYCHOD reported on 21 January.  The east Slovak daily said 
that in six local districts the unemployment rate went beyond 20 
percent, with the highest rate of 23.3 percent in Spisska Nova Ves, 
which, after the Rimavska Sobota district, central Slovakia, with 
26.41 percent, ranks second on the nationwide scale.  The lowest 
unemployment rate of 10.01 percent was registered in the city of 
Kosice, and on a nationwide scale it was Bratislava with 4.5 
percent.  There are some 37,000 eastern Slovaks seeking jobs 
(123,000 people in the whole republic), with an average 48 jobless 
per vacancy both in the districts and on the nationwide scale. 
(Prague CTK in English 21 Jan 94 AU) 
   MARTIN ARMS FACTORY'S DEBT WRITTEN OFF:  The government has kept 
its promise and has written off 615 million korunas (Sk) from the 
debts of the ZTS (Heavy Engineering Works) Turcianske Strojarne 
Martin state enterprise.  On top of that, on 10 January the company 
received from the state Sk20 million for development programs.  ZTS 
Martin is owed more than Sk3 billion by its customers; $20 million 
of the company's claims are "frozen" in Iraq alone.  The partial 
debt write-off and the drawing of new credits will substantially 
improve the company's situation.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in 
Slovak 11 Jan 94 p 13 AU) 
   SLOW PROGRESS IN PRIVATIZING HEALTH CARE:  The Slovak Ministry of 
Health has thus far issued 307 permits to operate a private 
practice, of which 180 were for dentists, 49 for dental technicians, 
and 78 for other medical professions.  Only two of Slovakia's 413 
ophthalmologists, for example, operate private practices.  Because 
of a shortage of funds, the National Health Insurance is not 
concluding any contracts with private physicians, whose services 
must therefore be paid for in cash.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 
15 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   1993 INCOME FROM TOURISM:  Slovak National Bank (NBS) data shows 
that foreign exchange income from tourism reached $3O4.1 million by 
30 September 1993.  This was $151.1 million more than Slovak 
citizens spent on trips abroad.  The amount of foreign capital 
invested in tourism (catering and accommodation) facilities reached 
Sk527.2 million by the same date.  This was 5.2 percent of all 
foreign investment in Slovakia in the first three-quarters of 1993. 
(Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 17 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   STATE OF RAILROAD INFRASTRUCTURE:  The Slovak Republic's railroad 
network consists of 3,662 km of tracks (102 km of which are broad- 
gauge and 52 km narrow-gauge lines), 2,322 bridges, and 76 tunnels. 
More than two-thirds of the network are single-track lines.  One- 
third of the network is electrified.  Because of neglected 
investments in maintenance and modernization, the railroads are 
marked by a high degree of wear and tear and technological 
backwardness.  Experts estimate the "investment deficit of the 
railroad infrastructure" at Sk20 billion.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY in Slovak 18 Jan 94 p 3 AU) 
   WATCHTOWERS FOR UNPROFOR UNITS:  On 17 January Vojensky 
Opravarensky Podnik (Military Repair Shop) Trencin dispatched the 
first watchtowers for UNPROFOR peacekeeping units in former 
Yugoslavia.  The company will deliver a total of 125 watchtowers in 
three different heights to former Yugoslavia.  All watchtowers are 
provided with double-glazed windows, heating, electric 
installations, signalling devices, and a telephone.  (Bratislava 
REPUBLIKA in Slovak 18 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   UNDERVALUATION OF PROPERTY:  Following an inquiry, the Slovak 
Ministry of Justice has withdrawn the property evaluation license of 
the Interconsult Bratislava company, which used to carry out 80 
percent of all expert appraisals for the government.  The inquiry 
revealed, for example, that the value of the Stein brewery in 
Bratislava was understated by Sk332 million, that is, about 50 
percent.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 18 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   LIQUIDATION OF 10 STATE FARMS PROPOSED:  The Ministry of 
Agriculture is the sponsor of 301 state farms.  An analysis of the 
economic efficiency of these farms revealed that only 51 of them 
"have the prospect of further growth."  This was announced by Ivan 
Lachkovic of the ministry's Budget and Economic Policy Department. 
The analysis also showed that in some state farms it will be 
necessary to resort to the application of the law on bankruptcy and 
settlement.  The Ministry of Agriculture has therefore proposed that 
bankruptcy proceedings be initiated in 10 state farms that the 
analysis showed to be the least efficient.  (Bratislava SME in 
Slovak 18 Jan 94 p 14 AU) 
   MEASURES TO CONTROL SWINE FEVER:  The District Anti-Epidemiologic 
Commission in Prievidza, central Slovakia, adopted special measures 
against the spread of swine fever on 18 January, after the disease 
was discovered in the tissue of a boar shot in the area on January 
9.  District Veterinarian Jaroslav Hatapka told journalists that two 
protective belts had been set up within a 15-km and 25-km radius 
from where the disease was found.  The regulation orders reducing 
the number of boars by shooting them, then having every shot animal 
examined by a vet and samples of its tissue tested.  (Prague CTK in 
English 18 Jan 94)  Swine fever has been identified in four Slovak 
districts to date -- Nove Zamky, where 3,848 infected pigs have been 
slaughtered, Rimavska Sobota (138 pigs), Lucenec (10 pigs), and 
Prievidza, where only wild swine have been identified as carriers of 
the disease thus far.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 24 Jan 
94 p 9 AU) 
   BALANCE SHEET OF 1993 STOCK EXCHANGE TRADING:  A total of 1,383 
transactions with 138,251 shares and bonds in an aggregate volume of 
Sk177.38 million were realized at the Bratislava Securities Exchange 
(BCPB) between 6 April 1993, when the BCPB went into operation, and 
the end of the year.  The total turnover was thus lower than the 
turnover on a single day of trading at the Prague stock exchange.  A 
total of 17 different securities (shares in 9 companies, 3 state 
bonds, 2 bank bonds, 2 participation certificates, and one company 
bond) were registered on the BCPB's listed market and another 499 
securities (shares in 496 companies and 3 investment funds) on the 
unlisted market at the end of 1993.  Turnover in listed securities 
amounted to Sk1O6.72 million and turnover in unlisted securities to 
Sk7O.66 million. 
   The most liquid securities were the Vseobecna Uverova Banka bond 
(turnover of Sk44.748 million), state bond number O4 (Sk38.51 
million), Figaro shares (Sk33.6 million), Nafta Gbely shares 
(Sk24.88 million), and shares of the Slovnaf t refinery (Sk14.22 
million).  Some 9O percent of the shares registered on the unlisted 
market were not traded even once in the course of the year.  The 
BCPB had 25 registered members at the end of 1993, 17 of which were 
institutions based in the Slovak Republic (13 banks and insurance 
companies, three brokers, and the National Property Fund) and 8 
institutions based in the Czech Republic.  The Czech institutions do 
not yet possess a license for trading in securities in Slovakia, 
however.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY BURZOVE NOVINY in Slovak 13 
Jan 94 pp 5, 6; Bratislava SMENA in Slovak 18 Jan 94 p 4 AU) 
   BALANCE SHEET OF 1993 RM-SYSTEM TRADING:  Between its 
inauguration in March 1993 and 16 December 1993, the RM-System 
Slovakia electronic market in securities organized seven periodic 
auctions, during which 199,810 shares worth Sk41.786 million changed 
hands.  The number of registered issues increased from 497 in the 
first periodic auction to 548 in the seventh auction, but actual 
trading was restricted to a few issues.  The three most traded 
shares were those of VSZ (East Slovak Iron Works) Kosice with a 
turnover of Sk7.9 million, Slovnaf t (Sk4.05 million), and Vseobecna 
Uverova Banka (General Credit Bank, VUB) (Sk2.26 million). 
(Bratislava PRAVDA FINANCNE SPRAVODAJSTVO Supplement 26 Jan 94 pp 1, 
5 AU) 
   POPRAD BID FOR 20O2 OLYMPICS:  Jan Madar, mayor of Poprad, said 
after the 18 January meeting of the Slovak Government, which 
approved Poprad's bid to host the 2002 Winter Olympics, that 
expenditures on sports facilities would amount to Sk8.5 billion, 
while overall budgeted costs, including infrastructure improvements 
and construction, were projected at Sk27 billion.  The state budget 
would participate with about Sk3 billion in the project's financing. 
Proceeds from television rights, advertising, and ticket sales are 
estimated at Sk13 billion.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 19 Jan 94 p 2 
AU) 
   PEPSI-COLA INVESTMENTS:  Representatives of the Pepsi-Cola 
International company announced in Bratislava on 19 January that the 
firm intends to invest $30 million in Slovakia over the next five 
years.  The plans include the construction of at least three 
distribution and sales centers with three warehouses and a car pool 
of at least 100 vehicles.  This should create about 200 new jobs in 
Slovakia in the next two years.  (Bratislava PRAVDA in Slovak 20 Jan 
94 p 3 AU) 
   BANK PROJECT CRITICIZED:  A commentary in the Bratislava daily 
PRAVDA voiced serious objections to the National Property Fund's 
plan, promoted by Prime Minister Meciar, to set up Banka Slovakia in 
Banska Bystrica and, thereby, to establish Banska Bystrica as 
Slovakia's "second banking center."  Ivan Podstupka, the daily's 
economic commentator, asked why a second banking center needed to be 
set up at a time when "the first center, Bratislava, stands on feet 
of clay."  He pointed out that Slovakia's problem did not lie in the 
small number of banks, but in the shortage of capital, and 
criticized the further fragmentation of the banks' already scarce 
resources.  Podstupka also questioned the wisdom of "pressuring 
state-controlled financial institutions to make their deposits with 
Banka Slovakia where there is not the least guarantee of an 
efficient use of resources" and compared the entire project with 
"growing strawberries at Skalnate Pleso," the highest-altitude lake 
in the High Tatra mountains. 
   Speculating about the motives behind the project, Podstupka 
suggested that the ruling Movement for a Democratic Slovakia needed 
"an obedient bank" that would finance privatization and thereby help 
"lay the foundations for an ownership structure that will survive 
for at least decades."  Given these motives, Podstupka said, "it 
does not matter in the least that an inorganic and non-market 
element of the banking system is coming into being, one lacking in 
professional background and without the least chance of establishing 
itself abroad." (Bratislava PRAVDA in Slovak 20 Jan 94 p 5 AU) 
   GAS UTILITY CUSTOMERS FAIL TO PAY BILLS:  Customers of Slovensky 
Plynarensky Priemysel (Slovak Gas Industry, SPP) owe the gas 
distributor Sk1.237 billion.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovakia 
21 Jan 94 p 24 AU) 
   ELECTRICITY PRODUCTION, IMPORTS:  Slovensky Energeticky Podnik 
(Slovak Energy Company, SEP) is the largest generator of electricity 
in Slovakia.  In 1993, it generated 24.5 billion kilowatt hours of 
electricity (84 percent of Slovakia's overall production), about 
one-half of which was nuclear power.  In 1992 Slovakia imported 6 
billion kilowatt hours of electricity, 21 percent of total 
consumption.  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 24 Jan 94 p 12 
AU) 
   ZILINA HYDROELECTRIC PROJECT DELAYED:  The construction of a 
hydroelectric power plant in Zilina has been delayed because the 
state does not yet own all the land where it will be built, 
according to Julius Binder, the director of the state water 
construction enterprise Vodohospodarska Vystavba Bratislava.  The 
power plant is to be built on the Vah river, and its construction 
demands the relocation of residents in the villages Mojsova Lucka, 
Mojs, and Hrustina.  According to Binder, so far it has not been 
possible to purchase about one-half of the 700 plots of land 
included in the future building site.  The state is expected to 
exercise its right of expropriation and pay the current residents 
for the land.  An acceleration of the whole process could allow for 
the beginning of construction within the first half of the year. 
The entire project will cost Sk5 billion (some $170 million) 
invested over three years.  International financing is being sought 
for the project.  Once completed, the power plant will provide 
170,000 megawatt hours of electricity every year, which will cover 
the annual consumption of electricity of more than 50,000 households 
and help save 190,000 tons of coal.  (Prague CTK in English 25 Jan 
94; Bratislava SMENA in Slovak 25 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   TRADE WITH POLAND:  Trade turnover between Slovakia and Poland 
reached Sk6.9 billion in 1993, which made Poland Slovakia's eighth 
largest trading partner, after the Czech Republic, Germany, Russia, 
Austria, Hungary, Italy, and Ukraine.  The trade balance between the 
two countries showed a Slovak surplus of Sk1.191 billion.  A total 
of 122 Polish firms with an aggregate capital of SkIS million were 
registered in Slovakia at the end of September 1993.  (Bratislava 
SLOVENSKY DENNIK in Slovak 25 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   SHOE FACTORY TO BE SOLD TO EMPLOYEES:  JAS Bardejov, the second 
largest footwear manufacturer in Slovakia, will be privatized by 
means of direct sale to a shareholding company established by 4,527 
of the company's 4,980 employees.  The management will acquire 83.3 
percent of the shares, with the rest going to the other employees. 
The shareholding company proposes a purchase price of Sk510 million, 
which is slightly above the company's book value of Sk508 million, 
but it demands that Sk180 million in investments planned by 1996 be 
subtracted from this amount.  The terms of payments will be agreed 
with the National Property Fund.  JAS Bardejov made a profit of 
almost Sk2O million in 1993.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 26 Jan 
94 p 2 AU) 
   GOVERNMENT APPROVES SALE OF BANK SHARES:  At its meeting on 25 
January the Slovak Government approved the sale of 4,098 shares of 
the Tatra Banka (Tatra Bank), worth Sk4O.98 million, to the 
Raiffeisen Zentralbank Oesterreich AG Wien.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA 
in Slovak 26 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   EBRD CREDIT FOR ITALIAN-SLOVAK JOINT VENTURE:  The London-based 
European Bank for Reconstruction and Development (EBRD) approved a 
credit of more than 15 million German marks for the SLOVECA company, 
a joint venture formed by ENI, the Italian industrial group, and two 
Slovak state enterprises, to finance special equipment for the 
production of cleaning agents.  As the EBRD announced, this is the 
first EBRD credit for the Slovak petrochemical industry.  The total 
cost of the project is 28.1 million German marks.  (Bratislava 
PRAVDA FINANCNE SPRAVODAJSTVO Supplement in Slovak 26 Jan 94 p 1 AU) 
   RECESSION IN CONSTRUCTION INDUSTRY:  According to F. Slavik, 
president of the Association of Slovak Contractors, construction is 
one of the branches of the Slovak economy hardest hit by recession. 
The "alarming" situation is demonstrated by a 30-percent drop in the 
volume of building work and by the loss of another 16,000 jobs in 
1993.  According to Slavik, 40 building companies have gone bankrupt 
thus far, 22 of them in 1993.  The liquidation of at least another 
40 building companies is expected this year.  "Liquidation is thus 
almost becoming the main form of privatization in construction," 
Slavik said.  The branch employs about 105,000 people.  (Bratislava 
NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 27 Jan 94 p 13; Bratislava SMENA in Slovak 
27 Jan 94 p 5 AU) 
   HUNGARY SLOVAKIA' S FOURTH-LARGEST TRADING PARTNER:  Hungary is 
Slovakia's fourth largest trading partner, Hungarian ambassador to 
Slovakia Jeno Boross said on Slovak Radio.  He held a consultative 
meeting with Slovak Deputy Premier Sergej Kozlik on 31 January, 
before the meeting of Czech, Slovak, Polish, and Hungarian Economics 
Ministers in Prague on 3 February.  He and Kozlik discussed the 
possibility of bilateral investments, the foundation of a Hungarian- 
Slovak bank, the possibility of cooperation after the Adria oil 
pipeline was opened and the tourist industry.  Boross said he 
believed bilateral relations will not only be tied to Bratislava. 
Hungary is interested in opening a trading and marketing center in 
Kosice, east Slovakia.  Reacting to Slovak Premier Vladimir Meciar's 
earlier statement that there is too much Hungarian capital in south 
Slovakia, Boross said that investments by ethnic Hungarians must 
have been meant, as investments from the republic of Hungary were 
slight.  (Prague CTK in English 31 Jan 94 AU) 
   HEALTH-CARE SECTOR'S FINANCIAL PROBLEMS:  According to Engineer 
M. Janovicova, director of the Health Insurance Fund Administration, 
the 15.7 billion Slovak korunas (Sk) which the 1994 state budget 
approved for the Health Insurance Fund falls "at least Sk7.1 
billion" short of the fund's needs.  As Janovicova points out, the 
fund's "demonstrable need" is for Sk28.1 billion, while its "minimum 
variant of solvency" reckons with Sk22.5 billion.  The health 
sector's current debt is estimated at between Sk3.5 to 6 billion. 
Hospitals' unpaid bills alone amounted to Sk2.1 billion at the 
beginning of December.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 3 Jan 94 p 1 AU) 
   NOVEMBER CONSUMER PRICE DATA:  Consumer prices increased 1.1 
percent in November 1993 compared with October, the Slovak 
Statistical Office announced.  While food prices increased by 0.7 
percent, prices of manufactured goods went up 1.3 percent, the cost 
of restaurant meals increased by 1.6 percent, and the cost of 
services rose by 0.9 percent.  Compared with December 1992, November 
1993 consumer prices were 15.9 percent higher.  The greatest 
increase was in the cost of restaurant meals (27 percent).  Food 
prices, on the other hand, went up only by 12.3 percent in the first 
11 months of 1993.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY BURZOVE NOVINY in 
Slovak 3 Jan 94 p 5 AU) 
   BUDGET DEFICIT TO AFFECT CREDIT AVAILABILITY:  In an interview 
for the Slovak News Agency TA SR, Marian Jusko, vice governor of the 
Slovak National Bank, conceded that "1994 will not be an easy year 
in terms of the availability of credits."  As he observed, 
"obtaining credit will continue to be rather complicated because a 
considerable proportion of bank credits will be allocated to cover 
the state budget deficit." (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 
4 Jan 94 p 1 AU) 
   PUBLIC, PRIVATE SECTOR CREDIT:  The volume of credit in the 
Slovak economy increased from Sk236.0 billion at the beginning of 
1993 to Sk249.93 billion at the end of September 1993.  The bulk of 
it (Sk231.53 billion at the end of the third quarter of 1993) had 
been extended to the "enterprise sphere."  While the volume of 
credit extended to the "public sector" declined from Sk131.35 
billion on 1 January 1993 to Sk127.59 billion on 30 September 1993, 
the volume of credit extended to the "private sector," which 
includes cooperatives, increased over the same period from Sk79.31 
to Sk99.O3 billion.  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 4 Jan 
94 p 2 AU) 
   FINANCE MINISTRY'S 1994 PRICE POLICY:  The price policy of the 
Slovak Ministry of Finance in 1994 will follow up the liberalization 
steps taken in recent years, Eva Bonova, director of the ministry's 
Price Policy Department, announced.  Price regulation will be 
retained in branches where a competitive environment does not yet 
exist and in branches with a "natural monopoly," she said, adding 
that this applies mainly to energy and heat prices, 
telecommunications and postal rates, fares for passenger traffic, 
health services, housing rents, water and sewage rates, and the 
like.  (Bratislava SME in Slovak 4 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   SHELL BEGINS BUSINESS OPERATIONS:  The Shell Slovakia Ltd., a 
subsidiary of the London-based Shell Overseas Holding Ltd., began to 
operate in Slovakia on 1 January 1994.  The company will be engaged 
in the procurement, sale, and distribution of petrochemical products 
and in the construction and operation of gas stations.  By the end 
of 1994 it intends to open the first five to seven gas stations at 
an "international standard."  The company intends to invest $6 to $8 
million in Slovakia annually, which is equivalent to 5 percent of 
all foreign investment in Slovakia in 1993.  According to Wilhelm 
Weiss, general director of Shell Slovakia, the company's aim is to 
achieve a 10 percent market share in Slovakia.  (Bratislava 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 4 Jan 94 p 1; Bratislava HOSPODARSKE 
NOVINY in Slovak 12 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   FIRST FRENCH NUCLEAR SPECIALISTS ARRIVE IN MOCHOVCE:  The first 
eight French specialists who will participate in the completion of 
the Mochovce nuclear power station and their families arrived in 
Slovakia on 4 January.  Their new home will be the "French village 
EDF" near Tlmace, which was built in only five months.  Another 53 
French families are expected to arrive in Tlmace by mid-January. 
The French specialists, whose number will total about 70, will 
remain in Slovakia for five to six years.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in 
Slovak 5 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   HARD CURRENCY DEPOSITS:  The equivalent of Sk24.312 billion in 
hard currency was deposited in foreign exchange accounts in Slovakia 
at the end of August 1993, of which Sk19.432 billion were deposited 
by individuals.  At the beginning of the year, that is, prior to the 
currency split and the introduction of the Slovak koruna, foreign 
exchange deposits totalled only Sk14.746 billion.  (Bratislava 
REPUBLIKA in Slovak 5 Jan 94 p 3 AU) 
   FOOD IMPORTS FROM CZECH REPUBLIC:  Slovakia recorded an Sk1.014 
billion deficit in its trade with the Czech Republic in the first 
nine months of 1993, mainly as a result of food imports.  In the 
first half of the year, Slovakia imported from the Czech Republic 
Sk1.205 billion worth of agricultural commodities, while Slovak 
exports of these commodities to the Czech Republic reached only 
Sk379 million.  The 10 percent devaluation of the Slovak koruna in 
July helped to reduce the gap between Slovak imports and exports of 
food in the third quarter of the year.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in 
Slovak 5 Jan 94 p 4 AU) 
   CONTRACT FOR NUCLEAR WASTE PROCESSING CENTER:  Slovria, the 
Slovak subsidiary of the Kralovopolska a.s. (Karlovo Pole 
Engineering Works) in Brno, Moravia, won a tender to supply 
equipment for the nuclear waste processing center at Jaslovske 
Bohunice.  The contract is worth Sk500 million.  (Bratislava 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 5 Jan 94 p 1 AU) 
   SLOVAK COMPANY PLACES BONDS ON WESTERN CAPITAL MARKET:  For the 
first time ever, a Slovak company has issued bonds on international 
capital markets.  The issuer is the Calex Zlate Moravce a.s., the 
only manufacturer of freezers and refrigerators on the territory of 
the former CSFR.  The lead manager of the issue was the London-based 
Nomura International securities company.  The three-year, $21 
million "Eurodollar" bond carries an interest rate of 7.875 percent, 
and the issue price was 99.832 percent.  The spread is 3.25 percent 
above equivalent U.S. Government bonds.  The bonds issue is 
guaranteed by the Slovak Government.  The proceeds will be used to 
finance the completion of a production line for environment-friendly 
compressors (without CFCs).  (Bratislava HOSPODARSKE NOVINY BURZOVE 
NOVINY in Slovak 5 Jan 94 p 1; Bratislava SMENA in Slovak 25 Jan 94 
p 4 AU) 
   GOLD MINING:  About 200 kilograms of gold were mined in the area 
of Hodrus in 1993.  German and Canadian firms have shown interest in 
gold mining and processing in Hodrus and Kremnica, but their 
participation is conditional on the privatization of the Rudne Bane 
(Ore Mines) state enterprise, which is now "deadlocked."  Geological 
research has confirmed the presence of gold in ore around Pezinok as 
well, but available technology and environmental considerations do 
not permit the start of extraction.  (Bratislava REPUBLIKA in Slovak 
7 Jan 94 p 1 AU) 
   GABCIKOVO ELECTRICITY OUTPUT:  The controversial Gabcikovo 
hydroelectric power plant on the Danube generated 2 billion kilowatt 
hours (kWh) of electricity in 1993 and expects to increase its 
output to 2.5 billion kWh in 1994.  The entire project should be 
completed by the end of 1995 and will require an additional 
investment of Sk4.5 to Sk5 billion.  Proceeds from electricity sales 
would suffice to finance virtually all the investment required (the 
current procurement price is Sk1.lO per kWh).  (Bratislava 
HOSPODARSKE NOVINY in Slovak 12 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
   DUBNICA ARMS FACTORY'S DEBT WRITTEN OFF:  The long-awaited 
process of writing off the debts of the ZTS (Heavy Engineering 
Works) Dubnica nad Vahom state enterprise has started.  Vseobecna 
Uverova Banka (General Credit Bank) and Konsolidacna Banka 
(Consolidation Bank) confirmed on 13 January that Sk918 of the 
company's Sk962 million debt, caused by the conversion of arms 
production in Slovakia, have been written off.  The remaining Sk48 
million, which are owed to Investicni Banka (Investment Bank), are 
expected to be written off "in the next few days."  Despite a six- 
month delay (the government promised to write off ZTS debts in 
August 1993), P. Konciar, the company's director, "received the news 
with great gratitude."  (Bratislava NARODNA OBRODA in Slovak 14 Jan 
94 p 2; Bratislava SME in Slovak 14 Jan 94 p 2 AU) 
ELAG/09 March/ECONF/East Europe Division  cka 12/0446z  mar 

